{"post-70184": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1499153069000", "message": "Kojuro's rooms are located in the Hizashi family's private wing of the mansion. In the same simple style as the rest of the building, they open out along with the adjoining rooms, onto a small courtyard garden.\u00a0Entry by permission only.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Kojuro's rooms are located in the Hizashi family's private wing of the mansion. In the same simple style as the rest of the building, they open out along with the adjoining rooms, onto a small courtyard garden.\u00a0"}, "post-70196": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1499196842000", "message": "Kojuro returned from his practice with Anzen at the dojo, with not much time to spare before he would have to head out on his mysterious mission with Hosokawa-dono. While he was excited to be headed out, he couldn't help but think of yesterday, his trip up to the shrine with Nakatani and their conversation. Before he left, he wanted to see her. He still had that memory of her face imprinted behind his eyeballs, could still feel her hand resting in his, maybe that should have been enough for him. But if there was the chance for them to say goodbye for now, why not take it? He had briefly glimpsed her at the party when she had served sake to him and Lord Genji, then disappeared to other tasks. His suit of armour stood ready on its stand next to his sword rack. He would be expected to be fully prepared and without much time, so he would need somebody's help. It would be both a reason and an excuse to see her again. Stepping to the door, he asked one of the guards outside to send for Nakatani, then returned inside to begin getting changed. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Kojuro returned from his practice with Anzen at the dojo, with not much time to spare before he would have to head out on his mysterious mission with Hosokawa-dono. While he was excited to be headed out, he couldn't help but think of yesterday, his trip up to the shrine with Nakatani and their conversation. Before he left, he wanted to see her. He still had that memory of her face imprinted behind his eyeballs, could still feel her hand resting in his, maybe that should have been enough for him. But if there was the chance for them to say goodbye for now, why not take it? He had briefly glimpsed her at the party when she had served sake to him and Lord Genji, then disappeared to other tasks. "}, "post-70197": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1499197643000", "message": "Nakatani had spent a long night awake guarding Ketsueki against her nightmares and had been asleep only shortly before the guards knocked at her quarters. She would open the door and listen to their request, trying to subdue the obvious smile that was appearing on her face. She would bow and thank them before they left the room once again. She would finish refreshing herself before she appeared at Kojuro's room. She knocked softly on the door before sliding it open, she would be sitting on her knees and bowed her head down to him as was required of her. \"You requested my assistance, Kojuro-san?\" she said with a gentle voice. She was dressed in a very elegant kimono. Its colors were a light blue with pink Lotuses embroidered on it along with lines that suggested the swaying of water on the blue. The obi that accompanied it was a dark blue. Her hair had been undone in a simple bun with a few strand of hair resting along the sides of her face. A simple ornament of black and blue was the only decoration she had added. She would wait till he allowed her in the room before she would break her bow. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Nakatani had spent a long night awake guarding Ketsueki against her nightmares and had been asleep only shortly before the guards knocked at her quarters. She would open the door and listen to their request, trying to subdue the obvious smile that was appearing on her face. She would bow and thank them before they left the room once again. She would finish refreshing herself before she appeared at Kojuro's room. "}, "post-70258": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1499374050000", "message": "Nakatani appeared at his door not long after he had sent for her. Seeing her, he couldn't help but smile as his eyes ran over her tasteful kimono and soft black hair as she knelt with head bowed in the doorway. \"Nakatani-san. Yes there are a few things I need your help with. Come inside,\" he said, in a businesslike voice, since she still sat in the doorway well in earshot of anyone who was around. Once she had entered and closed the door, he met her gaze once she raised it. Kojuro was wearing a simple kosode and the mid-calf length hakama, dark red silk figured with a black pattern. It was the usual type of clothing worn under armour, but it gave the impression that he was not exactly fully dressed. \"It seems I will be going off to war today after all. Hosokawa-dono has sent for me,\" he told her with an almost apologetic smile. Although he was glad to be sent, he knew that Nakatani wouldn't necessarily be so happy about it. \"It seems to be somewhat urgent, so I thought maybe you could give me a hand\u2026\" There wasn't too much in the way of furniture out in Kojuro's rooms. A small writing desk with a few books on it and a floor cushion to sit on. Light entered the room through paper shoji doors that would lead out onto the veranda and the courtyard. He walked across the tatami mats to where sliding doors stood open into the adjoining room where armour was currently arranged on its stand, and his swords stood in the alcove, and above them on the wall was a calligraphy scroll, that Anzen had masterfully painted for him, with the phrase Kouun Ryusui in a cursive style. \"Have you had the occasion to help someone into their armour before?\" he asked Nakatani, in a breezy tone, but with a more knowing look in his eyes, as he spoke over his shoulder, half-teasing her. \"We might have to talk as we go along, but,\" he turned to Nakatani properly, \"I wanted to see you before I left. I hope I'm not distracting you for any important duties just for my own selfish reasons.\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": ["http://cdn.karatebyjesse.com/wp-content/uploads/2009/11/kounryusui-flowing.jpg"], "html": "Nakatani appeared at his door not long after he had sent for her. Seeing her, he couldn't help but smile as his eyes ran over her tasteful kimono and soft black hair as she knelt with head bowed in the doorway. \"Nakatani-san. Yes there are a few things I need your help with. Come inside,\" he said, in a businesslike voice, since she still sat in the doorway well in earshot of anyone who was around. Once she had entered and closed the door, he met her gaze once she raised it. Kojuro was wearing a simple kosode and the mid-calf length hakama, dark red silk figured with a black pattern. It was the usual type of clothing worn under armour, but it gave the impression that he was not exactly fully dressed. \"It seems I will be going off to war today after all. Hosokawa-dono has sent for me,\" he told her with an almost apologetic smile. Although he was glad to be sent, he knew that Nakatani wouldn't necessarily be so happy about it. \"It seems to be somewhat urgent, so I thought maybe you could give me a hand\u2026\" There wasn't too much in the way of furniture out in Kojuro's rooms. A small writing desk with a few books on it and a floor cushion to sit on. Light entered the room through paper shoji doors that would lead out onto the veranda and the courtyard. He walked across the tatami mats to where sliding doors stood open into the adjoining room where armour was currently arranged on its stand, and his swords stood in the alcove, and above them on the wall was a calligraphy scroll, that Anzen had masterfully painted for him, with the phrase Kouun Ryusui in a cursive style."}, "post-70260": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1499375644000", "message": "As Nakatani was given permission to enter she would break her bow, shuffle her way inside and close the door behind her. When her gaze was raised she needed a bit of time to adjust to the clothing he was wearing. No bare skin was shown, but the cloth showed the shapes of his body a lot more then his kimono had before. She could see the lines of his muscles and the shapes of the bones clearly. She averted her gaze down for one more second before she looked back up and made her way closer to him. \"It seems that things are moving fast now that the bandit activity is growing,\" she said, trying to keep a smile on her face. She was not going to show him her sadness. She had decided she would not become independent of him like she had before. She would be strong and would support him wherever he needed to go and be. This would not an exception. She was glad to hear that he wished to see her before leaving though. \"I have no had the occasion,\" she answered him with a smile. She would turn her head to look at the armor that was still on a stand in the room. It looked absolutely beautiful as it stood there glimmering in the sunlight. It had clearly been polished and cleaned for his next battle. She could also see the many straps there were meant to keep it to the wearers body, hoping she would be able to properly assemble it. \"You are indeed distracting me Kojuro-san.\" she giggled slightly before she continued. \"Though not from my duties.\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "As Nakatani was given permission to enter she would break her bow, shuffle her way inside and close the door behind her. When her gaze was raised she needed a bit of time to adjust to the clothing he was wearing. No bare skin was shown, but the cloth showed the shapes of his body a lot more then his kimono had before. She could see the lines of his muscles and the shapes of the bones clearly. She averted her gaze down for one more second before she looked back up and made her way closer to him. "}, "post-70273": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1499436648000", "message": "\"The bandits seem to be growing much bolder,\" he replied, \"We need to put a stop to their activity soon, and reassure the people of Kiyonai that they are safe under Hizashi clan rule.\" There was also the possibility that these co-ordinated bandit attacks were more than just the regular kind of criminals. It was almost as though someone was attempting to provoke the Hizashi. They would find out soon enough once they came into conflict. \"I don't think it will be too hard to learn,\" he replied once she said that she had never dressed anyone in armour before. He wasn't surprised by her answer, it probably wasn't in her list of usual duties. \"I'll just tell you what parts to tie where as we go along.\" Nakatani was already studying the various cords and laces from the armour on the stand and he was pleased she was already trying to understand the construction. Not only had it been polished and cleaned but parts of it had been completely replaced. \"Oh? Then what else am I distracting you from?\" he asked her, a grin spreading across his face. She didn't seem at all bothered about being summoned, in fact she looked quite happy. He would have felt mildly guilty if there really was something she was supposed to be doing for Lord Genji or the household. \"Did something happen last night?\" he asked her more seriously, \"I only caught a brief glimpse of you at the festival when you served sake to Lord Genji and me.\" The armour was put on from the feet upwards, so at first there wasn't too much for Nakatani to do, other than to pass Kojuro items that he asked for, describing what he meant if she didn't know the terms for all the seemingly many bits and pieces that went into the samurai's battle dress. His conversation lapsed entirely when he started tying the shin guards in place, the many knots he was having to deal with were already beginning to cause him to struggle a bit with his injured left hand. He frowned a little in frustration, it was harder than he thought it would be. He paused, and stretched out the fingers of his left hand with his right, giving the muscles a chance to relax. He liked to present the appearance that everything was fine to the outside world, but if there was anyone who was going to see him in a moment of weakness he would rather it was Nakatani than anyone else, which was partly why he had asked for her to help.  ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"The bandits seem to be growing much bolder,\" he replied, \"We need to put a stop to their activity soon, and reassure the people of Kiyonai that they are safe under Hizashi clan rule.\" There was also the possibility that these co-ordinated bandit attacks were more than just the regular kind of criminals. It was almost as though someone was attempting to provoke the Hizashi. They would find out soon enough once they came into conflict. "}, "post-70275": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1499438525000", "message": "She could only nod when he told her about the bandits. She agreed that the people of Kiyonai should be protected, but as a mere servant she was only picking up small details from what she overheard from the guards. She was not involved in the talks about the attacks and only had a vague idea of what was going on. The fact that they grew bolder did seem indeed true however. \"From many things Kojuro-san. Many things.\" she would smile at him as she handed him the first pieces of the armor that he required. She had never imagined how complicated the pieces were, or how many there were of them. There were many names she did not recognize for the pieces and whenever she tried to guess to look smart, she was usually wrong. Only when they were starting to mirror the legs she was grabbing a few right. She had the tendency to learn fast. When he asked her about the festival, she wasn't entirely sure what to tell him. Her encounter with Setoku had made her very uncomfortable, but she had no proof that he had been ill minded towards Ketsueki. She didn't want Kojuro to be suspicious of him for no reason. \"I was required elsewhere soon after. I am sure you have heard of our guest Ketsueki-san. The woman who got a pardon from your uncle. She is very mentally scared and I thought it might be best if she was served by a familiar face, so I ordered the household maidens to call upon me if she needed anything. It so happened that she required food right after I brought you and Lord Genji your drinks. So I went to prepare it.\" She would leave it at that as she didn't feel comfortable talking about the encounter with Setoku. She still hadn't made up her mind of exactly why she had been so weary of him. As they continued it didn't take her long to notice the struggle he was starting to get. She ignored it at first, trying not to make him feel weak in front of her, but when he started to stretch out his fingers she knew it was sorer then he would like to admit to himself. She would gently place her hand on the hand that he was stretching and smiled to him. \"Let me do it Kojuro-san. He summoned me to help you, so I will help you with whatever you need me.\" she would then proceed to take the strings from the shin guards and start to tie them in place under the instruction of Kojuro. \"Speaking of the festival, I meant to ask you something Kojuro-san. I met Setoku-san yesterday during the festivals. I learned that he was a guest in the mansion, however, I have never been introduced to him or heard of him. Lord Genji would usually have informed me, but he hasn't. What do you know about him?\" she figured that if she asked it this way she would have an answer without him knowing the story about what happened the night before first.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She could only nod when he told her about the bandits. She agreed that the people of Kiyonai should be protected, but as a mere servant she was only picking up small details from what she overheard from the guards. She was not involved in the talks about the attacks and only had a vague idea of what was going on. The fact that they grew bolder did seem indeed true however. "}, "post-70299": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1499530724000", "message": "\"Ketsueki-san? Not sure that I have\u2026 there are so many new people around it's hard to keep up.\" However, it sounded just like Nakatani to want to personally take care of someone who needed her kindness. \"That has to be a better use of your time than just watching a bunch of samurai getting drunk and listening to Uncle Genji's terrible jokes. I'm sure she'll be feeling better with you looking after her,\" he added with a smile. There had been such a strange atmosphere last night at the party, he was glad it's pall seemed to have left the mansion this morning and that there had been no ill consequences. When she took his hand, and asked to let her assist him, he was a little embarrassed to need help with something that any child could do, that a few weeks ago he wouldn't even have thought about.  He was about to refuse, for some reason almost feeling the urge to apologise, but stopped himself. As she continued and offered to help with \"whatever he needed\", coupled with the almost electric sensation of her hand touching his, he almost choked as his face turned red, this time without the benefit of a hat to cover it or an exciting direction to suddenly turn and look in. His mind flashed through all kinds of possible scenarios.  Whatever he needed\u2026 why did she have to phrase it like that?  He laughed at his own reaction, easing the tension he felt. \"Thank you,\" he said, with almost a sigh of relief, shooting a genuine smile her way, letting her assist him. \"This should get easier as I get used to it.\" \"Setoku? He's a strange one. A former ronin I'm led to believe. Obviously picked up some peculiar habits on his travels. I haven't met him myself but my sister Anzen seems to have talked to him more than once. She told me she was teaching him to use some of her healing abilities. What makes you mention him? Has he done anything out of the ordinary?\" The last he had seen of Setoku was him wandering around the festival with his top off, and the first had been him heading off to the guest rooms with a woman. He was certainly good at getting himself noticed whatever else one could say about the man.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Ketsueki-san? Not sure that I have\u2026 there are so many new people around it's hard to keep up.\" However, it sounded just like Nakatani to want to personally take care of someone who needed her kindness. \"That has to be a better use of your time than just watching a bunch of samurai getting drunk and listening to Uncle Genji's terrible jokes. I'm sure she'll be feeling better with you looking after her,\" he added with a smile. There had been such a strange atmosphere last night at the party, he was glad it's pall seemed to have left the mansion this morning and that there had been no ill consequences. "}, "post-70302": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1499541460000", "message": "\"I hope she does feel better. She still seems very emotionally disturbed, but at least I was able to help her sleep with some herbs. I hope that if her body is rested, her mind will be easier to control.\" she tried to smile, but a certain sadness was still showing. Nakatani had find it easy to share in someone emotions, and Ketsueki's didn't leave her cold. Just thinking about the things she had to have gone through was hard for her. She did notice his redness as she touched his hand, but decided to not say a word about it. She silently enjoyed. In her time as a geisha, she had often made men blush. But those were men she did not care about. This was different and her heart pounded faster as a reaction to it. \"You are welcome,\" she said and bowed her head, making sure to not forget her duties as his servant. By then the armor had been finished up till his knees and the thigh guards were the next to be attached. She picked them from the stand in the room and walked back towards Kojuro. They needed to be attached to a belt that would hang from his waist. \"Excuse me Kojuro-san.\" she would say, a slight blush on her face as she wrapped her arms around him and pulled the belt around his waist. Her face would be close to his chest and if she held her breath she could hear his heart beating softly against her ear. She closed her eyes for just a second acting as if she was having trouble to tie the knot just to make it last a small bit longer. To embarrassed to show him how much she was enjoying it. Only then she opened her eyes and let go of him. She just hoped she had not been too bold. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"I hope she does feel better. She still seems very emotionally disturbed, but at least I was able to help her sleep with some herbs. I hope that if her body is rested, her mind will be easier to control.\" she tried to smile, but a certain sadness was still showing. Nakatani had find it easy to share in someone emotions, and Ketsueki's didn't leave her cold. Just thinking about the things she had to have gone through was hard for her. "}, "post-70609": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1500307215000", "message": "Both of them seemed to completely forget any thread of conversation about others, as Nakatani encircled her arms around Kojuro's waist, helping him on with the thigh guards. He couldn't think of anything but the nearness of her. Her face was so close to his body, almost touching. He could feel the heat of her skin through the light fabric of his clothing, and her soft, dark hair smelt wonderfully clean, floral, with just a hint of green tea. A few strands of it rested on his chest. Kojuro felt desire for her flood his entire body, her closeness without touching almost unbearable. Now was not the time to be having such feelings, he tried to regret asking her here as she was far too distracting a presence for someone supposedly focusing on going off to war, but he couldn't bring himself to. Just as she was about to let go, he brought his hand up to the small of her back and just drew her that tiny bit closer towards him, closing the gnat's wing gap that she had left, so that her body rested against his, her head near to his heart. He held her there gently, if she wanted to let go or pull free, nothing was stopping her. \u201cNakatani-san,\u201d Kojuro spoke almost in a whisper as he lowered his head towards hers, strands of stray hair falling about his face, as he breathed in the scent of her. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Both of them seemed to completely forget any thread of conversation about others, as Nakatani encircled her arms around Kojuro's waist, helping him on with the thigh guards. He couldn't think of anything but the nearness of her. Her face was so close to his body, almost touching. He could feel the heat of her skin through the light fabric of his clothing, and her soft, dark hair smelt wonderfully clean, floral, with just a hint of green tea. A few strands of it rested on his chest. Kojuro felt desire for her flood his entire body, her closeness without touching almost unbearable. Now was not the time to be having such feelings, he tried to regret asking her here as she was far too distracting a presence for someone supposedly focusing on going off to war, but he couldn't bring himself to. "}, "post-70611": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1500313881000", "message": "Just as she was about to take her hands back, knowing she had kept them there too long already, Kojuro suddenly pulled her closer to his chest. She would suddenly find her cheek against the fabric of his shirt and her ear pressed against the very place where his heart must have been. She could feel and hear the beating of his heart, which was going a tad fast for someone in rest. His hands were softly caressing the very top of her naked neck. She once again closed her eyes. Her hands would leave the knot of the belt and moved to his back, holding him just as gently as he holds her. She felt the blush on her cheeks return and knew that if she looked up now she would have been as red as a tomato. She would keep her head against his, deciding to hide behind the few strand of hair that had started to cover her face. A part of her wanted to let go. To tell him that they would and never could be together. Someone of Kojuro's rank was not supposed to be romantic with just a servant. Maybe if she had still been a geisha, she could have asked for his companionship, but she wasn't a geisha anymore. But once he whispered her name, that part of her completely vanished. After a bit she would pull back from his slowly, her hands brushing along his sides before she placed them on her own lap. Her face would still be warm and a hot pink when she would turn to look at him. A few strands of her hair were still hanging in front of her face before she would brush them behind her ear. The look in the eyes that would meet Kojuro's was filled with longing, shyness and just a slight hint of fear. The fear coming from her being scared to once again get this intimate with another. She wanted to say his name back, but somehow the words got stuck in her throat. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Just as she was about to take her hands back, knowing she had kept them there too long already, Kojuro suddenly pulled her closer to his chest. She would suddenly find her cheek against the fabric of his shirt and her ear pressed against the very place where his heart must have been. She could feel and hear the beating of his heart, which was going a tad fast for someone in rest. His hands were softly caressing the very top of her naked neck. "}, "post-70620": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1500408167000", "message": "She didn't seem as though she wanted to pull back or let go, and as her arms held him he found his hand moving up her back over the smooth silk of her kimono, into her lustrous hair, and his fingers came to rest on the soft pale skin of the nape of her neck. For a while neither of them moved except to experience the feeling of each other's bodies. He wanted her in a way that he had never experienced before, completely different to his various dalliances with women of the night. He couldn't say precisely what it was, and at the moment, he had no intention of analysing it. He merely enjoyed the presence of her. Eventually she pulled back, and he slid his hand away from her hair, already missing the press of her body against his. He looked down at her, his own hair hanging loose about his face, a little disheveled but he did nothing to adjust it, instead he took the chance to help her by brushing one of those stray locks of hair that he had disturbed away from her face and gently behind her ear, much as she had done on the other side. He searched her eyes, wondering at the expression he found there, not quite understanding it at first, but then, thinking back to their conversation in the tea house, and later at the shrine. How thoughtless he had been. She didn't want to become attached to someone like him, someone who would undoubtedly make her unhappy when he went away to fight and didn't come back, or was ordered to start a household elsewhere, or in following any of his Lord's commands that might separate them. Why was he encouraging her when it would only lead to her sadness and pain in the end? He felt suddenly very foolish, that he had made a bad error of judgement. And yet despite that guilt, the feeling between them was undeniable. \"\u2026 This is unwise\u2026\" he said at last with a kind of sigh, but seemed to lack conviction in his words. \"I don't want you to get hurt.\" This time his gaze met hers unwaveringly. It was the truth yet, he had no idea what to do about it. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She didn't seem as though she wanted to pull back or let go, and as her arms held him he found his hand moving up her back over the smooth silk of her kimono, into her lustrous hair, and his fingers came to rest on the soft pale skin of the nape of her neck. For a while neither of them moved except to experience the feeling of each other's bodies. He wanted her in a way that he had never experienced before, completely different to his various dalliances with women of the night. He couldn't say precisely what it was, and at the moment, he had no intention of analysing it. He merely enjoyed the presence of her. "}, "post-70623": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1500409328000", "message": "Even just the touch of his hand to brush her hair away once again made her long for the touch that she had just pulled herself away from. His eyes would stare deeply into hers and the more she stared back the more confusion started to take over her mind. Her thoughts would start to run free, to try and convince herself that she didn't want him in the way that she did. But nothing could change the feeling she was experiencing. She could feel her own heartbeat beating in her chest and throat, the warmth on her cheeks from her blush. Only when he talked back to her she could break herself away from his eyes. She would stare down at her hands, her fingers fumbling with one of the sleeves of her kimono and start to softly bite her own lip like she did when she felt unsure or upset. \"Very unwise..\" was all she could manage when she finally found a way to form the words. Suddenly a single tear would start to roll down her cheek. Frustrated by being unable to decide if she did or did not want him. Before Kojuro could move in to comfort her she would turn quickly to the table next to them, grabbing for the teapot. Trying to just find anything that would distract her from her feelings. But with the blur of the tears still in her eyes, she misjudged the distance and instead of grabbing the ear of the pot, it came tumbling down the table. Soon they would both be splattered by lukewarm tea and the pot would shatter in many shards among the floor. \"I-I.. I'm so sorry! I will clean it right away! I will!\" she suddenly panicked, starting to pick up the shards. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Even just the touch of his hand to brush her hair away once again made her long for the touch that she had just pulled herself away from. His eyes would stare deeply into hers and the more she stared back the more confusion started to take over her mind. Her thoughts would start to run free, to try and convince herself that she didn't want him in the way that she did. But nothing could change the feeling she was experiencing. She could feel her own heartbeat beating in her chest and throat, the warmth on her cheeks from her blush. "}, "post-70625": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1500411976000", "message": "How had he managed to make her cry already? \"Nakatani--\" he began to say but then stopped as she moved away, pouring some tea as a displacement activity while he stood, half dressed in his armour, unsure of what to make of his feelings, of her actions, of the whole situation. He turned to the armour stand and picked up one of the kote gloves. Hearing the crash of the teapot shattering he turned back to her, to see her frantically trying to pick up pieces of broken pottery from the floor. He crouched next to her, and placed his hand on her arm as she reached for one of the shards. \"I've done more unwise things than this,\" he said, a cautious smile forming on his face, \"and I will do again, I'm sure. We'll just have to think about just how unwise we want to be,\" he added with a knowing glint in his eye as he grinned. \"Leave that for now,\" he said, waving away the smashed pottery. \"Let's finish the task at hand.\" He got to his feet, helping her to hers. \"Nakatani-san, I can't guarantee never to hurt you. Like yours, my life belongs to Genji-dono and my duty may lead me to places you can't  follow, but I think I can make you happy too, when duty allows us to be together. I want to be with you, and if you want the same, then you just need to decide:  Does the risk outweigh the reward?\" He gave her a steady look as though trying to imprint the idea into her mind. \"Not now\u2026 but perhaps when I return, you might have had time to think about it.\" He pulled the armoured glove onto his left hand, one of the completely new pieces of armour, and held it out for her to assist him with the ties. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "How had he managed to make her cry already? \"Nakatani--\" he began to say but then stopped as she moved away, pouring some tea as a displacement activity while he stood, half dressed in his armour, unsure of what to make of his feelings, of her actions, of the whole situation. He turned to the armour stand and picked up one of the kote gloves. Hearing the crash of the teapot shattering he turned back to her, to see her frantically trying to pick up pieces of broken pottery from the floor. He crouched next to her, and placed his hand on her arm as she reached for one of the shards. \"I've done more unwise things than this,\" he said, a cautious smile forming on his face, \"and I will do again, I'm sure. We'll just have to think about just how unwise we want to be,\" he added with a knowing glint in his eye as he grinned. \"Leave that for now,\" he said, waving away the smashed pottery. \"Let's finish the task at hand.\" "}, "post-70661": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1500494313000", "message": "She felt clumsy as she started to pick up the shards. All the while telling herself how stupid she was for getting nervous. Her mind was lost in thoughts and only stopped when Kojuro reached out for her hand. She immediately looked up at him, one of the shards still between her fingers. She would listen to the words he said and soon the shard she was holding would drop back to the floor. A slight cling could be heard as it crashed into one of the other pieces. What was he saying? Did he really want her the way that she wanted him? She wanted to cry again, but this time she held back her tears. Not knowing what she needed to say back to him. She would get to her feet uneasy when he lifted her, the shards still all around their feet. She would look him deep in the eyes and he continued to talk. She wanted to hold him, wanted to feel his lips on hers, wanted to put her hands through his hair and caress his neck and cheeks. But her body seemed frozen, unable to move by her dis belief of his feelings. She must have been dreaming. Would he really be with her? Would he really love her even if his status was so unlike her? He could marry a proper wife and he probably still would have too. What was really in their future together? Only when he reached the armored glove out to her she was able to snap out of her thoughts. She would stare at it for a full second, like she did not understand what was happening before she realized that she had been helping him put on his armor just a few moments ago. Her hands would reach out for the ties, still slightly clumsy as she found it hard to concentrate on her task. She would find herself taking small steps closer to him. \"Kojuro-san...\" she stopped, biting her lip. She couldn't find the words she wanted to say, her mind still conflicted about whether this was a good or a bad plan. \"You can get a better wife, with a better lineage. You will become a lord, maybe even a Daimyo one day. Why would you choose me to love if you could pick any woman?\" she needed to ask.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She felt clumsy as she started to pick up the shards. All the while telling herself how stupid she was for getting nervous. Her mind was lost in thoughts and only stopped when Kojuro reached out for her hand. She immediately looked up at him, one of the shards still between her fingers. She would listen to the words he said and soon the shard she was holding would drop back to the floor. A slight cling could be heard as it crashed into one of the other pieces. What was he saying? Did he really want her the way that she wanted him? She wanted to cry again, but this time she held back her tears. Not knowing what she needed to say back to him. "}, "post-70864": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1500826601000", "message": "Kojuro remained silent for a few moments, as Nakatani continued to help with his armoured sleeves. They had lacings all the way up the inside of the arm to make sure that they fitted snugly, and Kojuro pulled the lacings through, as Nakatani tied various knots. While he said nothing, he thought through his reply to her, not wanting to instantly dismiss her concerns. \"Nakatani-san, your life and mine both belong to our lord, as I said,\" he began slowly, before looking her in the eyes. \"That means, that unless I get killed first, I will marry whoever Lord Genji decides for me. To do otherwise would not only be disloyal, but it would lose the clan a great advantage. I can't offer to make you my wife,\" he continued in very low tone, and softly, \"it would be impertinent. Even if it was my decision, I would have to put the clan before my own preferences.\" It wasn't easy to say this to her as he suspected she might cry again, but there was no way to pretend that this wasn't the case. If she was really going to take a risk for him, she had to know what it was she was putting at stake. \"But that doesn't mean that you and I still can't \u2026 be with each other. Although it would probably  mean you putting aside your own chance of being married, perhaps to someone more suitable\u2026\" It was a lot to ask of her. A samurai man having a wife and lover, even several, was not seen as unusual or even notable, but a woman was expected to be loyal, even if her lover was married to someone else. The more he thought about it, the more unlikely it seemed that he and Nakatani would be able to be together. \"I'm being very selfish even suggesting it,\" he said, with something like a sigh, as he looked aside. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Kojuro remained silent for a few moments, as Nakatani continued to help with his armoured sleeves. They had lacings all the way up the inside of the arm to make sure that they fitted snugly, and Kojuro pulled the lacings through, as Nakatani tied various knots. While he said nothing, he thought through his reply to her, not wanting to instantly dismiss her concerns. \"Nakatani-san, your life and mine both belong to our lord, as I said,\" he began slowly, before looking her in the eyes. \"That means, that unless I get killed first, I will marry whoever Lord Genji decides for me. To do otherwise would not only be disloyal, but it would lose the clan a great advantage. I can't offer to make you my wife,\" he continued in very low tone, and softly, \"it would be impertinent. Even if it was my decision, I would have to put the clan before my own preferences.\" It wasn't easy to say this to her as he suspected she might cry again, but there was no way to pretend that this wasn't the case. If she was really going to take a risk for him, she had to know what it was she was putting at stake. \"But that doesn't mean that you and I still can't \u2026 be with each other. Although it would probably  mean you putting aside your own chance of being married, perhaps to someone more suitable\u2026\" It was a lot to ask of her. A samurai man having a wife and lover, even several, was not seen as unusual or even notable, but a woman was expected to be loyal, even if her lover was married to someone else. The more he thought about it, the more unlikely it seemed that he and Nakatani would be able to be together. \"I'm being very selfish even suggesting it,\" he said, with something like a sigh, as he looked aside. "}, "post-70919": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1500889581000", "message": "Nakatani would keep her eyes lowered and focused on the task of tying the knots, making sure they would not come undone during any of his battles. She would listen to his words and the way he was saying them, all the while her mind going rapid to try and figure out her own feelings and thoughts. It all made sense, of course he couldn't marry her. He was noblemen, someone of a high birth and his legacy would be more important than anything. A good bloodline to give him good children. It was only when he mentioned her marrying someone else that something in her mind took a turn. She would find her hands leaving one of the strings that had not even been tied yet and her body moving forward to his. Those very same hands would move to his chest and lean on it slowly. And soon after that, their lips would meet. She knew she shouldn't have done it and yet her body had moved on its own. She would kiss him gently, enjoying the feeling of his soft lips against hers. Her heartbeat was rising once again. She could only hope he would not push her away. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Nakatani would keep her eyes lowered and focused on the task of tying the knots, making sure they would not come undone during any of his battles. She would listen to his words and the way he was saying them, all the while her mind going rapid to try and figure out her own feelings and thoughts. It all made sense, of course he couldn't marry her. He was noblemen, someone of a high birth and his legacy would be more important than anything. A good bloodline to give him good children. It was only when he mentioned her marrying someone else that something in her mind took a turn. "}, "post-71061": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1501281905000", "message": "He turned back to her, in the moment he had looked away she had stepped towards him, her hands placed on his chest. He was surprised, expecting her to see sense and decline, or at least to take time to consider it, but it seemed she had made her decision to be unwise, and Kojuro had no desire or reason to dissuade her. Her head was tilted towards him, her lips seeking his own. He bent his head towards hers, as he returned her kiss, more insistently, as his arm wrapped around her and pulled her closer still. Her lips were soft and velvety as flower petals, but now he wanted to touch more of her, and drew back his lips from hers, only to place them on the side of her bare neck, where the collar of her kimono pulled away from her skin. The taste and the scent of her was intoxicating, and the touch of skin to skin seemed to him to produce sparks like flint and tinder where they touched. His right hand, that had been between her shoulder blades, had moved up to the back of her head, to feel the silk of her hair, as he kissed her neck, but now, it slid down her back to where the heavy silk obi cascaded out in its elaborate knotted design. He felt for the way the layers of cloth threaded through itself and over, trying to figure out through feel alone how it could be unwrapped, imagining her unsecured kimono sliding apart, silk slipping from her shoulders and revealing her naked form. All thought of armour and forthcoming battle had fled from his mind like fleeting clouds. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "He turned back to her, in the moment he had looked away she had stepped towards him, her hands placed on his chest. He was surprised, expecting her to see sense and decline, or at least to take time to consider it, but it seemed she had made her decision to be unwise, and Kojuro had no desire or reason to dissuade her. Her head was tilted towards him, her lips seeking his own. He bent his head towards hers, as he returned her kiss, more insistently, as his arm wrapped around her and pulled her closer still. Her lips were soft and velvety as flower petals, but now he wanted to touch more of her, and drew back his lips from hers, only to place them on the side of her bare neck, where the collar of her kimono pulled away from her skin. The taste and the scent of her was intoxicating, and the touch of skin to skin seemed to him to produce sparks like flint and tinder where they touched. "}, "post-71096": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1501391715000", "message": "She was surprised when he kissed her back, she had expected to be turned away from him. But that surprise soon left her and only made way for desire. When his lips started to part from hers, she wanted to lean back in. But as soon as his lips touched her neck, she felt her limbs turning weak. She felt more sensitive than she had ever before and small goose bumps were starting to form on her skin as his touch lingered. Her hair would start to part ways as she felt his hand against her scalp. The comb ornament that had been there falling to the ground and made a clanking noise, but neither of them seemed to even notice it. More and more strands starting to fall aside her face. Her hands, in turn, would seek for his hair as well. She would entangle her slender fingers into it and hold his head gently towards her, not wanting him to pull away. Her body soon would start to feel like she had a hot fire burning inside of her, it was anything than what she had ever felt before. She would grasp her fingers more firmly in his hair and exhale softly against his ear. \"K-kojuro-san...\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She was surprised when he kissed her back, she had expected to be turned away from him. But that surprise soon left her and only made way for desire. When his lips started to part from hers, she wanted to lean back in. But as soon as his lips touched her neck, she felt her limbs turning weak. She felt more sensitive than she had ever before and small goose bumps were starting to form on her skin as his touch lingered. Her hair would start to part ways as she felt his hand against her scalp. The comb ornament that had been there falling to the ground and made a clanking noise, but neither of them seemed to even notice it. More and more strands starting to fall aside her face. "}, "post-71112": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1501429376000", "message": "Kojuro felt her stance weakening and supported her with his arm around her. He felt her skin start to turn into goosebumps as he kissed her, and took that as a sign that she was enjoying the touch of his lips, so he made no move to stop. Feeling her hands entangle in his hair, he moved his lips back to hers, in time to feel her breath as she murmured his name softly. The longer they touched one another, the more he felt his desire for her rise. He became gradually aware of an instant voice of a guard at the door of his room. \"Kojuro-sama. Is everything alright in there? Should I come in? It's just - I heard a crashing noise - and then everything went silent.\"  Kojuro reluctantly pulled his head away from Nakatani, though still kept his arm around her. \"Everything is fine!\" he called back. \"Really, fine. I just very clumsily broke something. Nothing to worry about.\" He looked at Nakatani with a conspiratorial smile and held a finger to her lips. There was a moment of silence, before the guard replied, \"I thought you should know, Lord Hosokawa is readying everything to leave very shortly. He's already assembling troops in the courtyard.\" he wasn't exactly telling Kojuro to get a move on, but he got the impression that the guard was concerned he would be late. Even though time had seemed to stand still for Kojuro, it moved mercilessly on outside, apparently. He dismissed the guard with a word, and returned his attention to Nakatani with a small sigh. \"Duty calls,\" he said in a far more businesslike tone than they had been sharing in the last few minutes. \"Now, we definitely need to finish putting this armour on, if you don't mind. Try not to think of anything distracting\u2026 \" he was grinning to himself as he said it, still with a conspiratorial look in his eye, as he held out the arm with the sleeve half tied and half loose. \"Please, Nakatani-san.\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Kojuro felt her stance weakening and supported her with his arm around her. He felt her skin start to turn into goosebumps as he kissed her, and took that as a sign that she was enjoying the touch of his lips, so he made no move to stop. Feeling her hands entangle in his hair, he moved his lips back to hers, in time to feel her breath as she murmured his name softly. The longer they touched one another, the more he felt his desire for her rise. "}, "post-71123": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1501448609000", "message": "She would lean into him when his lips turned her once more, her mind lost in the feelings that rushed through her body. Only when Kojuro pulled back from her she got pulled out and became aware of the voice that was coming from the door. When Kojuro made a shushing motion towards her, she could only put her hands over her mouth and give a nervous giggle, as softly as she could manage. Her hair was a mess, a really saggy bun now hanging close to her neck and strands of hair surrounding her round face on all sides. Her kimono had fallen off one of her shoulders slightly and her obi was visually loosened by the touching that Kojuro had done to it. Still, she did not care. She touched her own lips while Kojuro was talking to the guard. They still tingled slightly and when she closed her eyes she could feel his lips kiss her once again. She had never kissed anyone before and had never imagined it would be this intense or this sudden, even when she was the one that had moved first. The flames that had filled her body were slowly fading away and she knew that soon they would disappear as well, even when she did not want them too. When Kojuro put the half tied sleeve towards him she couldn't help but giggle again. That was right, she had come here to put on armor. \"Yes, Kojuro-san,\" she said with a warm smile, her whole face still slightly flushed this time, not just her cheeks. She would start to fasten the rest of the ties and help him put on the rest of his armor.  ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She would lean into him when his lips turned her once more, her mind lost in the feelings that rushed through her body. Only when Kojuro pulled back from her she got pulled out and became aware of the voice that was coming from the door. When Kojuro made a shushing motion towards her, she could only put her hands over her mouth and give a nervous giggle, as softly as she could manage. "}, "post-71182": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1501617977000", "message": "Kojuro let her finish the one sleeve, but before she went any further with the rest of the armour pieces, he put his hand and on her arm to stop her. He crouched down to pick up the comb she had dropped earlier when he had been running his hands through her hair. \"Nakatani-san,\" he said, \"I'm not the only one who needs to finish off their outfit.\" Perhaps she hadn't noticed, but her hair and kimono looked in a little disarray. Not so much as made her appearance indecent, but enough for anyone to wonder what she had been up to to get that way. Kojuro ran his hand down the collar of her kimono as he looked softly into her eyes, and gently tugged it back into position. It wasn't something she couldn't do herself, but the opportunity to touch her again was too good to miss, even if it was just a kimono collar. He looked aside from her eyes, stroking a tendril of hair that was hanging loose. \"Let me do this, once the gloves are on, it will be too late. Turn around,\" he whispered close in her ear, putting his hands on her upper arms and encouraging her to turn her back to him. If Nakatani had no objections, Kojuro slid the ribbon form her hair that was still half holding onto her bun, though most of the hair had escaped, and smoothed her hair straight, before he started slowly and carefully untangling it with the comb she had dropped. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Kojuro let her finish the one sleeve, but before she went any further with the rest of the armour pieces, he put his hand and on her arm to stop her. He crouched down to pick up the comb she had dropped earlier when he had been running his hands through her hair. \"Nakatani-san,\" he said, \"I'm not the only one who needs to finish off their outfit.\" Perhaps she hadn't noticed, but her hair and kimono looked in a little disarray. Not so much as made her appearance indecent, but enough for anyone to wonder what she had been up to to get that way. Kojuro ran his hand down the collar of her kimono as he looked softly into her eyes, and gently tugged it back into position. It wasn't something she couldn't do herself, but the opportunity to touch her again was too good to miss, even if it was just a kimono collar. He looked aside from her eyes, stroking a tendril of hair that was hanging loose. \"Let me do this, once the gloves are on, it will be too late. Turn around,\" he whispered close in her ear, putting his hands on her upper arms and encouraging her to turn her back to him. If Nakatani had no objections, Kojuro slid the ribbon form her hair that was still half holding onto her bun, though most of the hair had escaped, and smoothed her hair straight, before he started slowly and carefully untangling it with the comb she had dropped. "}, "post-71185": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1501620134000", "message": "She was more than just a bit surprised when he stopped her, after all, it was him who had asked her to start putting his armor on again. Only when he started to explain herself she was made to look down at the disarray that was her kimono and brought up a hand to feel the mess that her hair had become. She gave a small giggle as he started to readjust her kimono. When he had straightened the collar she would tuck some of the fabric into her obi so it would not move again. Then she would turn around, a slight blush on her face as she smiled. A geishas kimono was always tucked slightly down at the neck. She had been taught that showing that part of your skin to any man was a very intimate gesture. Even now it felt like she was once again showing a part of herself to Kojuro that she had not shown to many others. It would not last long however, as her hair was soon tumbling down around her shoulders and the naked skin was covered once again. The comb ornament was usually not meant to actually comb someone's hair with. The comb pins were there to make it stick into someone's hair, but for now, it seemed to serve its purpose. She closed her eyes as she could feel the pins massage her scalp gently and from time to time Kojuro's hand would brush the skin of her neck. It was very soothing and relaxing, a very serene feeling where she could empty her head from all the thoughts that had run through it in the past half hour that she had been with Kojuro. She knew the combing would not last long, as they still needed to put a lot of the armor on. She could only hope that it would last just a few minutes more. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She was more than just a bit surprised when he stopped her, after all, it was him who had asked her to start putting his armor on again. Only when he started to explain herself she was made to look down at the disarray that was her kimono and brought up a hand to feel the mess that her hair had become. She gave a small giggle as he started to readjust her kimono. When he had straightened the collar she would tuck some of the fabric into her obi so it would not move again. "}, "post-71188": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1501622283000", "message": "Kojuro wished they had longer together as he combed Nakatani's hair much to her apparent enjoyment. However, he made sure not to linger over it as much as he wanted to. It was an innocent thing, to comb a woman's hair, and yet incredibly intimate. On some other occasion, maybe they would have time to make such a moment last. He ran his hand one last time over the length of her hair, relishing its soft and silky texture on his fingertips. Once he had finished, he gently turned her back towards him, and held out the comb to her for her to take, with a smile. If she was going to put her hairstyle back as it was, she would have to do the rest herself. \"Now we should finish what we started,\" he said, taking hold of the second sleeve and sliding his right arm into it, letting Nakatani adjust the lacings, using the left arm as a guide. From now on the armour proved a barrier to him to touching her again, which was just as well, seeing as how incredibly distracting her presence and nearness was to him. Once that was done, he would offer instructions as to how the rest of the armour went on, the next part was the do, which covered the body down to the waist, and from there down armoured flaps hung which overlapped the thigh guards, and fastened to the side with cords. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Kojuro wished they had longer together as he combed Nakatani's hair much to her apparent enjoyment. However, he made sure not to linger over it as much as he wanted to. It was an innocent thing, to comb a woman's hair, and yet incredibly intimate. On some other occasion, maybe they would have time to make such a moment last. He ran his hand one last time over the length of her hair, relishing its soft and silky texture on his fingertips. Once he had finished, he gently turned her back towards him, and held out the comb to her for her to take, with a smile. If she was going to put her hairstyle back as it was, she would have to do the rest herself. "}, "post-71189": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1501622780000", "message": "When he stopped, she couldn't help but sigh. It was always too short. She would turn around and take the string from Kojuro and tie her hair up once again. She was quite practiced at it and before long a gentle but simple bun was once again on the back of her head, only a few strands of hair escaping as they always seemed to and shape around her face. When he offered her back the comb, she would look at it for a few seconds. She would take it in her hands, but instead of tucking it in her hair, she would teasingly place it in Kojuro's hair. \"Take it with you, to remind you to return to me,\" she said with a gentle smile. When Kojuro mentioned that they should finish what they started, Naka giggled slightly. For just a moment her mind ran to the thought of kissing him, to finish what she had started, but it wasn't the time to fool around any longer. She would start following his instructions again and help him into the armor that would hopefully protect him from any harm that could possibly come to him. He was soon covered in a thick layer of protection, the shapes of his body completely swallowed by it. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "When he stopped, she couldn't help but sigh. It was always too short. She would turn around and take the string from Kojuro and tie her hair up once again. She was quite practiced at it and before long a gentle but simple bun was once again on the back of her head, only a few strands of hair escaping as they always seemed to and shape around her face. When he offered her back the comb, she would look at it for a few seconds. She would take it in her hands, but instead of tucking it in her hair, she would teasingly place it in Kojuro's hair. \"Take it with you, to remind you to return to me,\" she said with a gentle smile. "}, "post-71192": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1501624035000", "message": "He laughed, taking the comb out of his hair and holding it in his hand. \"I couldn't possibly forget you,\" he replied, \"The hard thing will be to not think about returning to you, Nakatani-san\" He tucked the comb somewhere inside the lacing of his armoured sleeve, where it couldn't be seen and wouldn't get in the way, yet he would know it was there. She helped him on with the rest of the parts of his armour, and then the kabuto helmet. Kojuro tucked the tanto securely into the front of the belt and hung the tachi on his left side, and finally was completely dressed and ready to present himself for his mission. Once everything was done and checked over a final time, he stood facing Nakatani once again. \"Thank you for your help today,\" he said, \"Keep yourself safe while I\"m gone.\" He smiled softly, \"And I forbid you to worry about me,\" he grinned impishly, then his smile faded as he looked into her eyes, and he leaned down to plant a final kiss upon her lips. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "He laughed, taking the comb out of his hair and holding it in his hand. \"I couldn't possibly forget you,\" he replied, \"The hard thing will be to not think about returning to you, Nakatani-san\" He tucked the comb somewhere inside the lacing of his armoured sleeve, where it couldn't be seen and wouldn't get in the way, yet he would know it was there. She helped him on with the rest of the parts of his armour, and then the kabuto helmet. Kojuro tucked the tanto securely into the front of the belt and hung the tachi on his left side, and finally was completely dressed and ready to present himself for his mission. Once everything was done and checked over a final time, he stood facing Nakatani once again. \"Thank you for your help today,\" he said, \"Keep yourself safe while I\"m gone.\" He smiled softly, \"And I forbid you to worry about me,\" he grinned impishly, then his smile faded as he looked into her eyes, and he leaned down to plant a final kiss upon her lips. "}, "post-71204": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1501658590000", "message": "So this was it, he really would need to leave now and it would be a while before she could see him again. They finally had found out their feelings for each other and would already need to put it in the back of their minds. She would look him over when his armor had been finished. He truly looked like a leader, like someone who could one day rule the whole place, someone was ready to face the world. All the while she would stay in the mansion, cooking food, cleaning rooms. Compared to his life hers seemed a lot less excited. She still smiled at him though, and when he forbid her to worry she could only giggle to him once again. \"Yes, my Lord,\" she said with a bit of a teasing tone, right before his lips once again touched her. She leaned in back to him and tilted her head, kissing him back. His scent once again filled her nose and her heart rose in her chest. She wanted to grab his hair once again, but his helmet proved in the way. Maybe that was for the better, otherwise, they would just get lost in each other once again. Now they just had to wait to see who would find the strength to pull away first. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "So this was it, he really would need to leave now and it would be a while before she could see him again. They finally had found out their feelings for each other and would already need to put it in the back of their minds. She would look him over when his armor had been finished. He truly looked like a leader, like someone who could one day rule the whole place, someone was ready to face the world. All the while she would stay in the mansion, cooking food, cleaning rooms. Compared to his life hers seemed a lot less excited. "}, "post-71254": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1501789071000", "message": "He brought the kiss to an end far more swiftly than the first time, it barely seemed to last more than a moment. Kojuro stood back from her and smiled. Despite not wanting to leave Nakatani, he was glad to be sent out on an official mission, to have a chance to prove himself again. He found that now he was dressed for battle, his mind had become more focused on the outside world, and duty. \"Well, I shouldn't keep Hosokawa-dono waiting,\" he said, lingering a moment despite his words. He drank in the sight of her briefly, one last time. \"Fare well until I return, Nakatani-san,\" he bade her cheerfully, and then he stepped out, on his way to the courtyard and duty. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "He brought the kiss to an end far more swiftly than the first time, it barely seemed to last more than a moment. Kojuro stood back from her and smiled. Despite not wanting to leave Nakatani, he was glad to be sent out on an official mission, to have a chance to prove himself again. He found that now he was dressed for battle, his mind had become more focused on the outside world, and duty. \"Well, I shouldn't keep Hosokawa-dono waiting,\" he said, lingering a moment despite his words. He drank in the sight of her briefly, one last time. \"Fare well until I return, Nakatani-san,\" he bade her cheerfully, and then he stepped out, on his way to the courtyard and duty. "}, "post-71255": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1501789956000", "message": "\"Until you return, Kojuro-san.\" she would say after him. She would watch his back as he left the room, she let a sigh escape her lips as she sat on the tatami floor of his room. She would linger there for moments before she found the strength to get up on her legs. Her resolve was set however, she would not become attached to him to the point where he was all she had. First things first, she would return to cleaning up the mess from the fallen teapot and make sure nothing was left on the table. Only then she would leave the room and resume her tasks around the mansion.In the following days, she would allow herself one moment every day to pray for his return. She would go to his room, refresh the linen on the bed and clean what needed to be cleaned. Last she would bring a single flower, the most beautiful flower that she could find that day in the gardens around the mansion and leave it in a vase on the table that was in the middle of the room. This way even if he returned without her knowing, there would be a momentum in the room to remind him of her. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Until you return, Kojuro-san.\" she would say after him. She would watch his back as he left the room, she let a sigh escape her lips as she sat on the tatami floor of his room. She would linger there for moments before she found the strength to get up on her legs. Her resolve was set however, she would not become attached to him to the point where he was all she had. First things first, she would return to cleaning up the mess from the fallen teapot and make sure nothing was left on the table. Only then she would leave the room and resume her tasks around the mansion."}, "post-75232": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1510409520000", "message": "Yasuke groaned as he carried Kojuro to his room with one arm over his shoulder and halfway on Yasuke's back. The wound was bleeding again after having been contained pretty well during the ride home. \"Come on, somebody get lord Hizashi's sister here..!\" Yasuke roared a second time, as the guards seemed frozen and unable to act by the sight that met them. Yasuke grabbed a guard by the the arm on the hallway and dragged him along too. \"Not you! You come with me..!\" he said as he kicked open the door to Kojuro's private room. \"Support him under the other arm and lets get him into the bed!\" Yasuke commanded, as they got him laying down. Kojuro's sister Anzen Hizashi hadn't arrived yet, and Yasuke was looking at Kojuro and decided that time was of the essence. He rolled up his sleeves and looked at Nakatani. \"We need the bandages changed. Go get water and new bandages as fast as possible!\" Yasuke said and turned to Kojuro. The noble looked pitiful as he lay there and for a brief moment his mind flashed back and he thought it was cruious that this time he was saving one. \"Okay calm down and breath, Hizashi-dono. If you see a bucket, don't freakin' kick it. It's full of piss, I guarantee it!\" he said with a wry smile as he ripped Kojuro's clothes open at the stomach area as well as removing the bandages. He then curled together the cloth he had used to fasten around Kojuro and applied it to Kojuro's wound with a firm push. \"I know how you look at her, Hizashi-dono. Don't worry, that secret will be safe with me. And I promise you, that we will get the cloaked guy who started all this - and you'll be alive to punish him good.\" Yasuke said, making sure only Kojuro heard that. ", "link_list": ["/user/2331"], "image_list": [], "html": "Yasuke groaned as he carried Kojuro to his room with one arm over his shoulder and halfway on Yasuke's back. The wound was bleeding again after having been contained pretty well during the ride home. "}, "post-75355": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1510843831000", "message": "The rest of the ride had seemed a blur to Nakatani. Her head was still not in the place where she wanted it to be, small flashes of her captors mask appearing in front of her eyes from time to time. The only thing that seemed to keep her from freaking out was the comfort of Kojuro close to her. It was only when Yasuke started to shout orders towards her that she snapped back to her usual self. She noticed the stares, the stares that followed both Kojuro and herself. She was dirty, her kimono was in disarray and her hair was tangled. It was a sight that nobody had ever expected to see from Nakatani. The proper servant who was always nicely dressed. But she had no time to worry about herself, her bruises would heal and she could clean herself later. Now it was al about Kojuro. She would rush out to the servants quarters and gathered an array of bandages and ointments before rushing to the bath area to get as sterile warm water as she possibly could get and soon returned to the room. She would be breathing heavily from the rushing that she had done to come back, making every breath she took incredible painful on her bruised ribs. \"I got the water and bandages.\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The rest of the ride had seemed a blur to Nakatani. Her head was still not in the place where she wanted it to be, small flashes of her captors mask appearing in front of her eyes from time to time. The only thing that seemed to keep her from freaking out was the comfort of Kojuro close to her. "}, "post-75389": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1510957247000", "message": "Kojuro was barely hanging onto consciousness as Yasuke half carried him through the mansion. The guards were impressed enough by Yasuke's taking command of the situation to follow his orders and let him through without trouble. He was aware of Yasuke yelling orders, and not too much more, and then he was taken hold of by another set of hands and lowered down onto a futon. Once he was lying down, he almost closed his eyes and let go of the waking world to find some relief from the pain and exhaustion but for Yasuke talking to him emphatically about something that seemed incomprehensible about buckets full of piss, and then opening up his clothing. He was still wearing the outfit he had been training in in the dojo that morning, now rather ruined with other people\\s blood and his own, and the hole that the knife had put through it. He gave a cut-off yelp of pain at the sudden pressure on his wound. Yasuke was much stronger than Nakatani and none too gentle. His words barely registered with Kojuro, it seemed like the time for conversation had passed for now. He just nodded briefly in response.  From the pain, the blood loss that made him light-headed and nauseous, and now Yasuke pushing down hard on his upper abdomen, Kojuro lost the battle of willpower he had been fighting against his own body and he suddenly and completely voided the contents of his stomach all over Yasuke's lap. \"Sorry,\" he said in a faint voice, before his body went limp as he passed out. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Kojuro was barely hanging onto consciousness as Yasuke half carried him through the mansion. The guards were impressed enough by Yasuke's taking command of the situation to follow his orders and let him through without trouble. He was aware of Yasuke yelling orders, and not too much more, and then he was taken hold of by another set of hands and lowered down onto a futon. Once he was lying down, he almost closed his eyes and let go of the waking world to find some relief from the pain and exhaustion but for Yasuke talking to him emphatically about something that seemed incomprehensible about buckets full of piss, and then opening up his clothing. He was still wearing the outfit he had been training in in the dojo that morning, now rather ruined with other people\\s blood and his own, and the hole that the knife had put through it. "}, "post-75651": {"user": "Anzen Hizashi", "user_num": 2331, "timestamp": "1511587656000", "message": "The not knowing was the worst part. The wait, second. The guilt of having stayed behind and the worry for his life ate at the older Hizashi sibling as she continued to pace, chancing wearing a trench into the floor at her inability to sit still. In Kojuro's absence, Anzen had packed and re-packed a medical bag for at least a dozen different things that could have gone wrong and even now, as she paced, the pack was never more than a couple footsteps away.Anzen's fingers were wrapped tightly around her favored piece of bamboo, holding it ready as her eyes moved over the same paragraph in the book she held in her opposing hand. Despite having read the same lines over and over again, none of the information seemed to be sticking. Just as she snapped her book closed in frustration, her door burst open.The look on the guard's pale, green-tinged face spoke volumes. Before any words left his mouth, Anzen had dropped her book to the floor, grabbed her bag, and in a very un-lady-like fashion, took off running to her brother's room. She would arrive it seemed right as he finished emptying the contents of his stomach and fell into unconsciousness. From the doorway, looking in on his now limp body, Anzen fought tears and the need to stay composed, her lower lip trembling as she called out. \"Kojuro? Kojuro!\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The not knowing was the worst part. The wait, second. The guilt of having stayed behind and the worry for his life ate at the older Hizashi sibling as she continued to pace, chancing wearing a trench into the floor at her inability to sit still. In Kojuro's absence, Anzen had packed and re-packed a medical bag for at least a dozen different things that could have gone wrong and even now, as she paced, the pack was never more than a couple footsteps away."}, "post-75653": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1511610478000", "message": "As Yasuke kept the pressure firmly on his wound to stop the bleeding he noticed Kojuro was making odd noises as his faced paled. Suddenly the contents of Kojuro's stomach came up and landed on Yasuke's lap. This was was expected, and Yasuke didn't refrain from keeping pressure on Kojuro's wound. \"That's what you get for being that reckless, Hizashi-dono..!\" Yasuke said with a slightly sneering voice. He couldn't yet completely comprehend why he had thrown himself in front of Yasuke, and he still needed time to digest his actions. For now 'reckless and stupid' was a sufficient explanation. \"Sorry yeah... Oh hey, don't frickin' pass out!\" Yasuke said as he gave Kojuro a few slaps to his cheek, hoping that would wake him up. At that moment Nakatani returned with bandages and water, and Yasuke stretched out his one arm and received the bandages and water while keeping pressure on the wound with the other. With a sponge Yasuke cleaned his wound quickly.\"I need your help again!\" Yasuke said and turned to Nakatani. \"Get on other side and rolled the bandages around his stomach while I lift him up so you can it around him.\" Yasuke said firmly, as Nakatani seemed composed enough to still be of help. If Nakatani agreed to help, Yasuke would lift Kojuro's torso just enough for her to roll the bandages around him a couple of times. In these circumstances Yasuke's stamina would show and he wouldn't even tremble slightly as he held most of Kojuro's body weight up while Nakatani applied the bandages. Hopefully this would contain his blood loss better. \"Keep them tight, gentleness won't help right now..!\" Yasuke instructed in his own commanding manner. Yasuke heard a woman calling out Kojuro's name. This time it wasn't Nakatani because it came from the doorway and as he saw the worried woman, he recognized her to be Kojuro's sister. \"Hizashi-sama! I'm afraid your brother has been injured by a stab wound to the abdomen.\" Yasuke explained, ready to step back if she approached with the intention of treating Kojuro. \"I think I have done what I can do now...\" Yasuke conceded looking at Kojuro who was still looking none too good. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "As Yasuke kept the pressure firmly on his wound to stop the bleeding he noticed Kojuro was making odd noises as his faced paled. Suddenly the contents of Kojuro's stomach came up and landed on Yasuke's lap. This was was expected, and Yasuke didn't refrain from keeping pressure on Kojuro's wound. "}, "post-76088": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1512391421000", "message": "Nakatani would listen to anything she was being said. Her head was to much in a haze to question anything and she just wanted Kojuro to live. She had taken care of a wound many times before but had never been needed to do the critical care that was required for a wound this extensive and fresh. She would wrap the bandage as tightly as she dared around Kojuro's waist at least a couple of times. Having Yasuke so close to her still gave her the feeling of wanting to run away, but the feeling of staying by Kojuro's side was stronger for now. She was still unsure why she felt the way she did, blaming herself for being needlessly scared and foolish. And even if she had wanted to make sense of it, she couldn't bring up the energy to concentrate enough to rearrange her feelings. When his name was shouted, Yasuke wasn't the only one who looked up from his work. The moment she laid eyes on Anzen tears started to fill her eyes. She was so glad to see her. Anzen would know what to do, she would be able to take care of her brother in a way that nobody else could. \"Anzen-sama.. I am so glad to see you.\" she could only whisper as she scooted away, making way for Anzen to get closer to him. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Nakatani would listen to anything she was being said. Her head was to much in a haze to question anything and she just wanted Kojuro to live. She had taken care of a wound many times before but had never been needed to do the critical care that was required for a wound this extensive and fresh. She would wrap the bandage as tightly as she dared around Kojuro's waist at least a couple of times. Having Yasuke so close to her still gave her the feeling of wanting to run away, but the feeling of staying by Kojuro's side was stronger for now. She was still unsure why she felt the way she did, blaming herself for being needlessly scared and foolish. And even if she had wanted to make sense of it, she couldn't bring up the energy to concentrate enough to rearrange her feelings. "}, "post-76473": {"user": "Anzen Hizashi", "user_num": 2331, "timestamp": "1513122017000", "message": "Anzen rushed in, her eyes bright with un-shed tears. Too many times had her brother's recklessness put him into her medical care and she was seriously debating being the reason next time.. As she quickly approached her brother, she took the briefest of moments to touch Nakatani's shoulder to reassure the girl and to silently welcome her back home. Anzen did not plan on either of them losing a loved one tonight, she would put her all into this boy's survival.\"How deep is the wound?\" The fact that Kojuro had vomited worried her greatly. Placing her bag next to her brother, she began her care by placing one hand against his forehead to feel the heat that radiated then slowly and gently pulling each of his eyes open just enough to judge the how his pupils reacted.Turning her head to look at Yasuke, the poor soul covered in sick, she grimaced but pointed to the water that Nakatani had brought before pulling a fresh cloth from her own bag. If given the water, she would soak the rag before wringing it out and placing it on her brother's feverish forehead. \"How much blood has he lost? How long has he been bleeding?\" She asked rapid-fired questions, hoping to learn exactly what kind of intervention her brother needed. The wrappings that were blossoming red only told her so much, but at least they would slow his loss of life.. even if it was only by a little. \"Was he delirious or comprehensible?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Anzen rushed in, her eyes bright with un-shed tears. Too many times had her brother's recklessness put him into her medical care and she was seriously debating being the reason next time.. As she quickly approached her brother, she took the briefest of moments to touch Nakatani's shoulder to reassure the girl and to silently welcome her back home. Anzen did not plan on either of them losing a loved one tonight, she would put her all into this boy's survival."}, "post-76488": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1513153434000", "message": "Yasuke tried remembering how long the knife was. He had brought it back and it was currently packed on the horse as it seemed like a pretty neatly forged dagger that could well be worth a bit of money despite it being a coward's weapon. Yasuke would frown and try to show the Hizashi sister with his hands approximately how long and wide it was not even noticing her grimacing about him being covered in sick. \"Soo... about this long and this wide. It's kind of a weak man's dagger designed to stab deep but not very apt at cutting.\" Yasuke explained, as by his hand measurements you could deduct it being about 15 cm long but no wider than 2 og 3 cm. \"It isn't jagged, it's just straight.\" Yasuke added. Kojuro's sister kept the questions coming and Yasuke tried keeping up with exact answers as he was able.\"How much blood..? I dunno, the horse isn't completely painted red, but he did suffer a bit on the way home. So I would saaay... a lot.\" Yasuke answered and nodded. \"He's been bleeding for a few hours now, but only a lot for a short moment. I managed to stop the bleeding by for the most part by applying bandages.\" he said and wondered if this was the time to crack the old joke 'Why... Kojuro? He's never really comprehensible! Haha!', but Yasuke bit his tongue in the last moment. \"He was comprehensible until I reapplied the bandages a few moments ago.\" he said and was curious to see what kind of treatment she would give Kojuro based on this information. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Yasuke tried remembering how long the knife was. He had brought it back and it was currently packed on the horse as it seemed like a pretty neatly forged dagger that could well be worth a bit of money despite it being a coward's weapon. Yasuke would frown and try to show the Hizashi sister with his hands approximately how long and wide it was not even noticing her grimacing about him being covered in sick. "}, "post-76557": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1513370714000", "message": "Indeed, it was only a few short months ago that Kojuro had arrived back from a mission bleeding from multiple sword cuts requiring Anzen's attention having barely escaped with his life from a three against one battle with some bandits. At that time he had no doubt apologised for worrying her before he had gone out once again to return home in dire need of her services. In response to Yasuke's slaps a fleeting expression halfway between pain and annoyance ran across Kojuro's face but while he didn't wake up, he didn't appear to be completely dead to the world either. The guard stepped forward with his hand on his sword hilt, not pleased by Yasuke striking the young lord's face, but at the same time, he did nothing more, seeing as Yasuke seemed to be attempting to save Kojuro's life. As Yasuke lifted him and Nakatani wound the bandages, he seemed to register the pain but otherwise seemed completely insensible.Oblivious to the activity going on around him, Kojuro just lay there. His pupils dilated normally as they reacted to the light when Anzen opened his eyelids, and as she examined him and tried to judge the extent of his injuries she would notice the entry wound an inch or so under his ribs on the left side. Deep bruising had risen to the surface of his add omen, showing that he had been bleeding internally, but fortunately there was no indication that the blade had punctured any of his organs. The cool cloth she placed on his head made a little of the tension in his face relax off a little, but unsurprisingly he still seemed to be in quite a lot of pain.  ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Indeed, it was only a few short months ago that Kojuro had arrived back from a mission bleeding from multiple sword cuts requiring Anzen's attention having barely escaped with his life from a three against one battle with some bandits. At that time he had no doubt apologised for worrying her before he had gone out once again to return home in dire need of her services. "}, "post-76820": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1513795893000", "message": "When Anzen started to focus on the place where the wound was, Nakatani slowly scooted back towards him, still making sure she wasn't in the way of anything. Her face was full of worry, but she couldn't bring herself to shed any more tears then she already had today. Her own mind was still in shambled and she found it hard to concentrate on what was going on. Her finger would softly caress Kojuro's cheeks and chin, hoping it would bring him comfort, even if just a little bit. Her own body felt sore and bruised, but at this moment she did not care much about it. The words that were being said swept by her and none of them seemed comprehensible to her. It was almost as if they were talking in another language that she couldn't understand. The only thing she could see now was Kojuro's face and the feeling of his skin against her fingers. It almost felt as if she was already preparing herself for the worst possible outcome. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "When Anzen started to focus on the place where the wound was, Nakatani slowly scooted back towards him, still making sure she wasn't in the way of anything. Her face was full of worry, but she couldn't bring herself to shed any more tears then she already had today. Her own mind was still in shambled and she found it hard to concentrate on what was going on. Her finger would softly caress Kojuro's cheeks and chin, hoping it would bring him comfort, even if just a little bit. Her own body felt sore and bruised, but at this moment she did not care much about it. "}, "post-77368": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1515091938000", "message": "In the days that followed, Kojuro lay in bed. At first unconscious, then with restless fever dreams, and finally in a simple deep sleep as his body started to build on the work Anzen had had begun and slowly heal itself. His life was no longer in any danger after she had worked her magic, but he would need time to recover. After the third day, Kojuro slowly began to wake up, an unknown dream already faded, as he became aware once again of being in his own body, the weight of his limbs, his breath, the searing pain from his wound, which was by far the strongest sensation. Without that, he could easily have dropped back into exhausted sleep again. He thought he heard the sound of someone else in the room, and began to open his eyes, letting the world come into focus once more. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "In the days that followed, Kojuro lay in bed. At first unconscious, then with restless fever dreams, and finally in a simple deep sleep as his body started to build on the work Anzen had had begun and slowly heal itself. His life was no longer in any danger after she had worked her magic, but he would need time to recover. After the third day, Kojuro slowly began to wake up, an unknown dream already faded, as he became aware once again of being in his own body, the weight of his limbs, his breath, the searing pain from his wound, which was by far the strongest sensation. Without that, he could easily have dropped back into exhausted sleep again. He thought he heard the sound of someone else in the room, and began to open his eyes, letting the world come into focus once more. "}, "post-77369": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1515092346000", "message": "The last few days Nakatani had been inside of this room the most that she could. She would clean Kojuro's sheets, bath his body with damp clothes and make sure he was warm enough under the blankets. During his fever dreams, she had softly petted his forehead and hands as it had seemed to sometimes calm him down. She did have tasks she had needed to do, but every time she would find herself back by his side as soon as she was able too. She had even been caught falling asleep right next to Kojuro on the floor one time. Lucky for her it had been Anzen who had found her and brought her back to her own quarters. So it was no surprise that when Kojuro woke up for the first time, Nakatani was found in the room. She was sitting at the table in the middle, a cup of tea in hand and a pot of fresh flowers sitting in front of her. She was poking at the small flower petals with one of her fingers. She seemed to be lost in thoughts and if someone would look closely, her eyes looked very tired with dark rings under them. Because of her being lost in thought, she failed to notice Kojuro's awakening. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The last few days Nakatani had been inside of this room the most that she could. She would clean Kojuro's sheets, bath his body with damp clothes and make sure he was warm enough under the blankets. During his fever dreams, she had softly petted his forehead and hands as it had seemed to sometimes calm him down. She did have tasks she had needed to do, but every time she would find herself back by his side as soon as she was able too. She had even been caught falling asleep right next to Kojuro on the floor one time. Lucky for her it had been Anzen who had found her and brought her back to her own quarters. "}, "post-77370": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1515096955000", "message": "He turned his head towards the sound and saw Nakatani there. Even though she looked a little dejected poking at the flower petals, she was still the best sight that Kojuro could have hoped to wake up to. He tried to speak, and found his mouth very dry. He licked his lips, and tried again. \u201cNaka-chan,\u201d he said, his voice weak but still loud enough for her to hear, and he didn't take his eyes off her.  ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "He turned his head towards the sound and saw Nakatani there. Even though she looked a little dejected poking at the flower petals, she was still the best sight that Kojuro could have hoped to wake up to. He tried to speak, and found his mouth very dry. He licked his lips, and tried again. \u201cNaka-chan,\u201d he said, his voice weak but still loud enough for her to hear, and he didn't take his eyes off her.  "}, "post-77371": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1515097396000", "message": "Nakatani was immediately snapped out of her thoughts and her head moved to the side as fast as it could, making her ponytail almost twirl around her neck. \"Kojuro!\" she shouted, worry and excitement in her voice. She immediately grabbed a cup and poured some water in it for him before she rushed over to him. She gently helped him sit up a little bit and put her lap behind him so he didn't have to strain himself before she handed him the water. \"Here, drink.\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Nakatani was immediately snapped out of her thoughts and her head moved to the side as fast as it could, making her ponytail almost twirl around her neck. \"Kojuro!\" she shouted, worry and excitement in her voice. She immediately grabbed a cup and poured some water in it for him before she rushed over to him. She gently helped him sit up a little bit and put her lap behind him so he didn't have to strain himself before she handed him the water. \"Here, drink.\" "}, "post-77374": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1515100808000", "message": "A small smile appeared on his face as she called out his name and rushed over. Letting her help him, he put up his hand to steady the cup as he drank, his fingers brushing against Nakatani's as she held it. He had never felt quite this thirsty before. The water tasted good and fresh, and he drank quite a lot of it before his hand dropped back to his side and he rested his head on her lap. \u201cThanks,\u201d he said, with a soft sigh, and closed his eyes for a moment or two. It was the simplest thing but he felt exhausted already. Nevertheless, he wasn't ready to go back to sleep just yet. He looked back up at Naka's face, and remenbered her promise not to leave his side. \u201cThank you for being here,\u201d he said. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "A small smile appeared on his face as she called out his name and rushed over. Letting her help him, he put up his hand to steady the cup as he drank, his fingers brushing against Nakatani's as she held it. He had never felt quite this thirsty before. The water tasted good and fresh, and he drank quite a lot of it before his hand dropped back to his side and he rested his head on her lap. \u201cThanks,\u201d he said, with a soft sigh, and closed his eyes for a moment or two. It was the simplest thing but he felt exhausted already. Nevertheless, he wasn't ready to go back to sleep just yet. He looked back up at Naka's face, and remenbered her promise not to leave his side. \u201cThank you for being here,\u201d he said. "}, "post-77375": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1515101131000", "message": "A genuine smile was on her face the whole time as she watched him drink the water. She knew how thirsty he must have been and possibly hungry, but she wasn't sure if she was allowed to offer him food just yet. Water was the best thing she could do for him and also one of the things Anzen had instructed her to give to him if he might wake up. \"Of course I am here,\" she whispered to him softly, as if the sound would be painful to his ears. She took the cup from his hands and put it away to her side. \"Is there anything else I can do for you?\" she asked, wondering if he was feeling uncomfortable. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "A genuine smile was on her face the whole time as she watched him drink the water. She knew how thirsty he must have been and possibly hungry, but she wasn't sure if she was allowed to offer him food just yet. Water was the best thing she could do for him and also one of the things Anzen had instructed her to give to him if he might wake up. \"Of course I am here,\" she whispered to him softly, as if the sound would be painful to his ears. She took the cup from his hands and put it away to her side. \"Is there anything else I can do for you?\" she asked, wondering if he was feeling uncomfortable. "}, "post-77376": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1515101904000", "message": "He smiled more as she whispered to him confirming that she was there, and seeing her face lose that worried expression it had when he first woke up. He reached for her hand and took gently in his. \u201cMm.. no... just stay here like this,\u201d he replied. He was in pain but as long as he didn't have to move, it was bearable, and to lie with his head on Nakatani's lap felt good regardless. \u201cNaka-chan,\u201d he said, \u201cI'm sorry to make you have to worry about me.\u201d He remembered how she had cried, and the bruises on her wrists, and how he had only caused her to suffer more when she should have felt safe and protected.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "He smiled more as she whispered to him confirming that she was there, and seeing her face lose that worried expression it had when he first woke up. He reached for her hand and took gently in his. \u201cMm.. no... just stay here like this,\u201d he replied. He was in pain but as long as he didn't have to move, it was bearable, and to lie with his head on Nakatani's lap felt good regardless. \u201cNaka-chan,\u201d he said, \u201cI'm sorry to make you have to worry about me.\u201d He remembered how she had cried, and the bruises on her wrists, and how he had only caused her to suffer more when she should have felt safe and protected."}, "post-77377": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1515102255000", "message": "Her thumb would stroke over his hand gently as he was holding her and her other hands were softly combing out a few knots that had formed in it, making sure that at no point she was pulling on it too much. \"Don't worry about it...\" she hesitated, her cheeks turned a bright pinkish color as she spoke. \"Kojuro-kun.\" her eyes sparkled as she said it. For some reason it felt very special to her to be able to call him with such familiar terms. \"The most important thing is that everyone is safe.\" She decided to make sure her wrists would stay hidden from him for now, it wasn't the time for him to have to worry about her. He would need all his energy to recover. \"Are you warm enough?\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Her thumb would stroke over his hand gently as he was holding her and her other hands were softly combing out a few knots that had formed in it, making sure that at no point she was pulling on it too much. \"Don't worry about it...\" she hesitated, her cheeks turned a bright pinkish color as she spoke. \"Kojuro-kun.\" her eyes sparkled as she said it. For some reason it felt very special to her to be able to call him with such familiar terms. \"The most important thing is that everyone is safe.\" She decided to make sure her wrists would stay hidden from him for now, it wasn't the time for him to have to worry about her. He would need all his energy to recover. \"Are you warm enough?\" "}, "post-77379": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1515107490000", "message": "He knew he would still worry about it, but for now, he put those worries aside. Nakatani looked genuinely happy, and there would be plenty of time to think about such things later. When she called him \u201cKojuro-kun,\u201d he looked startled for the brieftest moment. Then seeing the cheeky look in her eyes, he chuckled, but that quickly ended a wince of pain as the movement jarred his wound. He quickly moved his hand over it and waited a moment or two for the pain to recede a little. How bad was it anyway? He remembered Yasuke had been yelling at him not to die. Was that just over-reaction or had he really come so close? \u201cDon't tease me, Naka-chan, I can't fight back right now,\u201d he said quietly, though he smiled as he looked back up at her. She was right, everyone was safe, everything else could be analysed later. \u201cI'm quite warm just from the heat from your face,\u201d he replied, her blush had had not gone unnoticed, and he hoped he might see it again. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "He knew he would still worry about it, but for now, he put those worries aside. Nakatani looked genuinely happy, and there would be plenty of time to think about such things later. When she called him \u201cKojuro-kun,\u201d he looked startled for the brieftest moment. Then seeing the cheeky look in her eyes, he chuckled, but that quickly ended a wince of pain as the movement jarred his wound. He quickly moved his hand over it and waited a moment or two for the pain to recede a little. How bad was it anyway? He remembered Yasuke had been yelling at him not to die. Was that just over-reaction or had he really come so close? \u201cDon't tease me, Naka-chan, I can't fight back right now,\u201d he said quietly, though he smiled as he looked back up at her. She was right, everyone was safe, everything else could be analysed later. \u201cI'm quite warm just from the heat from your face,\u201d he replied, her blush had had not gone unnoticed, and he hoped he might see it again. "}, "post-77387": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1515149307000", "message": "The worry would return as soon as Kojuro let out a wince. She knew the wound would still be painful and made a mental note to made sure that she would tell Anzen to give him something for the pain as soon as she was able to pull herself away from him. Quite frankly, she didn't want to leave him even more than she had when he was still asleep. \"Don't move too much,\" she said, stroking a bit of hair behind his ear. When he talked about her blush her expression changed to embarrassment once again and the blush returned in its full force. Sometimes she really wished she had more control over it then she did. Even the slightest change was usually visible on her cheeks. \"I thought you just said no teasing,\" she said as she looked away from him a little bit as if that would hide her blush. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The worry would return as soon as Kojuro let out a wince. She knew the wound would still be painful and made a mental note to made sure that she would tell Anzen to give him something for the pain as soon as she was able to pull herself away from him. Quite frankly, she didn't want to leave him even more than she had when he was still asleep. \"Don't move too much,\" she said, stroking a bit of hair behind his ear. "}, "post-77650": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1515445558000", "message": "\u201cMm- I\u2019ll try not to,\u201d he agreed, resigning himself to having to lie here for quite a while longer while his wound healed. Not that it would be so bad to do that if Nakatani was here like this the whole time. He didn\u2019t expect that of course, she must have better things to do with her time than be here constantly. \u201cNo\u2026 I said you weren\u2019t allowed to tease me,\u201d he smirked a little with his eyes closed as he still rested his head on her lap, and then reached up his hand to touch her cheek, feeling the warmth of it. Even though he wasn\u2019t looking he could tell she was still blushing. A moment later, he dropped his hand from her face, and just lay quietly for a while. Perhaps he had even dropped back off to sleep. When he re-opened his eyes again, he looked back up to her. Perhaps she had really thought it was enough that everyone was safe, or perhaps she was just trying to ease the situation for one or both of them, but Kojuro felt like he couldn\u2019t quite accept that for once. He remembered those bruises on her wrists, and hoped that was all, but he didn\u2019t want her to hide her suffering behind a mask for his sake. \u201cNaka-chan, are you alright? Did they hurt you?\u201d he asked her in a soft voice. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cMm- I\u2019ll try not to,\u201d he agreed, resigning himself to having to lie here for quite a while longer while his wound healed. Not that it would be so bad to do that if Nakatani was here like this the whole time. He didn\u2019t expect that of course, she must have better things to do with her time than be here constantly. \u201cNo\u2026 I said "}, "post-77699": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1515525281000", "message": "He was wrong. Something really special would need to happen to be able to pull Nakatani away from him now. She was going to stay here until someone commanded her to leave. She was determined that in the state he was in, he should not be alone with his thoughts. She herself knew how hard the nights had been where she had been alone in her covers. Perhaps Kojuro wouldn't be as sensitive to what had happened when she was, but his fever dreams had already proven to be rough. She didn't want the dreams that followed to be any worse. She wanted to call him silly when he brushed her cheek with her hand, but she just stayed silent and smiled at him. She watched his face as his eyes were closed, a soft smile on his cheeks. She was happy to be able to see him smile again. But that smile soon faded when he started to ask her questions. She considered her answer for a moment. \"Not much.\" she said, which was truthful. Her body was sore and slightly bruised but she had sustained no big injuries. Nothing that needed further care, she just needed to heal. She couldn't possibly tell him about the mental toll it had taken on her though, not now his own health was still so fragile. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "He was wrong. Something really special would need to happen to be able to pull Nakatani away from him now. She was going to stay here until someone commanded her to leave. She was determined that in the state he was in, he should not be alone with his thoughts. She herself knew how hard the nights had been where she had been alone in her covers. Perhaps Kojuro wouldn't be as sensitive to what had happened when she was, but his fever dreams had already proven to be rough. She didn't want the dreams that followed to be any worse. "}, "post-77767": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1515624524000", "message": "\"Not much?\" he repeated, somewhat aghast at her reply. \"That means they did.\" He frowned, unable to keep himself from worrying about her even more now. \"I'm sorry \u2026 if I could have got there any sooner\u2026\" But there was nothing to be done. Yasuke had come straight back, they had left immediately and swiftly. Maybe, it could be said, he had rushed into things a little too much. He realised there was a lot he didn't know. Why they had taken Nakatani and for what purpose. Who the masked ronin even was. Whether anyone had found him yet. It all seemed to much to think about right now. He just felt so exhausted. \"If you need anything, you should ask Anzen. Please don't think of it as bothering her.\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Not "}, "post-77778": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1515669189000", "message": "She bit her lip when he started to apologize. She didn't want him to start apologizing to her. If anything she was the one who wanted to say she was sorry, sorry for being silly enough to go out to a place where they could have so easily grabbed her. Sorry for him being injured and almost dying. Sorry that she wasn't stronger and could have defended herself. But she wasn't about to let her emotions run loose, not now. She had to take care of him, make sure he rested and that he healed. So instead she swallowed her emotions away and just smiled at him. \"Don't worry about it, Kojuro. You came to my aid as fast as you could.\" she petted his forehead softly, hoping that would lul him back to sleep. \"I will.\" she answered to the question about Anzen. But Anzen had already taken a look at her and all there was left was for the bruises to heal. She would reach for the table behind her, his head still on her lap as she just bend her upperbody back and filled the cup once more to see if he might want to drink more. \"You sure did scare us, Kojuro.\" she said with a small laugh, hoping to lighten the mood in the room that had started to grow heavy. \"Next time you might prepare yourself better. We can't have the lord of the house dying now that Genji-sama is still ill.\" she meant it as a joke. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She bit her lip when he started to apologize. She didn't want him to start apologizing to her. If anything she was the one who wanted to say she was sorry, sorry for being silly enough to go out to a place where they could have so easily grabbed her. Sorry for him being injured and almost dying. Sorry that she wasn't stronger and could have defended herself. But she wasn't about to let her emotions run loose, not now. She had to take care of him, make sure he rested and that he healed. So instead she swallowed her emotions away and just smiled at him. \"Don't worry about it, Kojuro. You came to my aid as fast as you could.\" she petted his forehead softly, hoping that would lul him back to sleep. \"I will.\" she answered to the question about Anzen. But Anzen had already taken a look at her and all there was left was for the bruises to heal. "}, "post-77795": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1515704696000", "message": "Kojuro went quiet as those words hung in the air. Maybe she had meant it light-heartedly but it hit a little too close to home. He sighed. \u201cSometimes,\u201d he said in low voice, \u201cI scare myself too. I think \u2013 I\u2019m starting to think \u2013 there\u2019s something wrong with me. It\u2019s good to rely on instinct, right? It\u2019s what you need to do in a life or death situation, there\u2019s no time to think, just act. But it\u2019s as though my instinct is \u2026 broken. Why does it always lead me to do stupid things?\u201d He took some sips of the water she offered, and thanked her, his hand casually touching hers, and lingering there a little. \u201cUntil now, I always thought that it didn\u2019t matter - if I got hurt, if I lived or if I died -  as long as I didn\u2019t come back having failed. But now \u2013 with you, Naka-chan \u2013 it changes things. And with Uncle Genji too. For the first time I feel like I want to live, that it matters what happens to me. That it matters to you, and that it matters to the Hizashi clan. And it took getting stabbed in the gut to make me realise that.\u201d He gave a kind of humourless laugh. \u201cI guess that sounds pretty stupid\u2026\u201d he added, his voice trailing off into silence. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Kojuro went quiet as those words hung in the air. Maybe she had meant it light-heartedly but it hit a little too close to home. He sighed. \u201cSometimes,\u201d he said in low voice, \u201cI scare myself too. I think \u2013 I\u2019m starting to think \u2013 there\u2019s something wrong with me. It\u2019s good to rely on instinct, right? It\u2019s what you need to do in a life or death situation, there\u2019s no time to think, just act. But it\u2019s as though my instinct is \u2026 broken. Why does it always lead me to do stupid things?\u201d "}, "post-77797": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1515706511000", "message": "Her smile would soon fade as she noticed what her simple joke had brought forth. She had meant to ease the mood in the room, but she had only made it even heavier. She listened to his words carefully before she could even try and muster up a response. \"Your instincts aren't broken Kojuro. You have a gentle heart that believes it has to protect the people around him and that exact believe is what makes you, you. You didn't have to come and rescue me all by yourself, yet you did because you believed I might be harmed if you waited too long. Maybe the only thing you need to do is learn to value your own life as much as you do that of others.\" she said to him with a soft voice, almost as soft as a whisper. As if she was talking about a small secret that just the two of them seemed to share.She then bends over him and pressed her lips gently against his own, engaging in a kiss that was full of love and with just a little bit of longing towards him. She wanted him to know how much she cared for him, how afraid she had been that she would never have been able to kiss his lips again. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Her smile would soon fade as she noticed what her simple joke had brought forth. She had meant to ease the mood in the room, but she had only made it even heavier. She listened to his words carefully before she could even try and muster up a response. \"Your instincts aren't broken Kojuro. You have a gentle heart that believes it has to protect the people around him and that exact believe is what makes you, you. You didn't have to come and rescue me all by yourself, yet you did because you believed I might be harmed if you waited too long. Maybe the only thing you need to do is learn to value your own life as much as you do that of others.\" she said to him with a soft voice, almost as soft as a whisper. As if she was talking about a small secret that just the two of them seemed to share."}, "post-77800": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1515708213000", "message": "His expression softened and relaxed somewhat as Nakatani\u2019s kind and gentle words reached him. Whether she was right or not, the fact that she said those things, that she believed them of him, made him enormously grateful to her, for being there and for loving him as much as he loved her. \u201cNaka-chan\u2026\u201d he began, before she leaned down towards him, little tendrils of hair falling against his face before her lips met his. He returned her kiss, with all of his love for her, so inexpressible in words. He didn\u2019t want it to end, as he reached his hand to stroke the soft silkiness of her hair. He wasn\u2019t sure what he had done to deserve someone like Nakatani but he silently thanked whatever gods he could think of for bringing her to him. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "His expression softened and relaxed somewhat as Nakatani\u2019s kind and gentle words reached him. Whether she was right or not, the fact that she said those things, that she believed them of him, made him enormously grateful to her, for being there and for loving him as much as he loved her. \u201cNaka-chan\u2026\u201d he began, before she leaned down towards him, little tendrils of hair falling against his face before her lips met his. He returned her kiss, with all of his love for her, so inexpressible in words. He didn\u2019t want it to end, as he reached his hand to stroke the soft silkiness of her hair. He wasn\u2019t sure what he had done to deserve someone like Nakatani but he silently thanked whatever gods he could think of for bringing her to him. "}, "post-77805": {"user": "Ryuzo Hizashi", "user_num": 2746, "timestamp": "1515712476000", "message": "The mansion hallways immediately felt homely to Ryuzo and a slight smile appeared on his face in spite of the circumstances as he approached the door that led into Kojuro's room. He was likely sleeping or in other ways resting in order to get better. Well he hoped, and at least Yamazaki hadn't given him the impression that he was about to die. Somewhere in Ryuzo's heart that felt good to know, and right before he touched the door to slide it open, the thought that he might have been blaming Kojuro for more than what was fair crossed his mind and he could almost see himself forgiving his son, as he lay there in his bed so peacefully. Ryuzo then carefully opened the shoji door to Kojuro's room, trying not to make too much noise if he was indeed asleep. But what he saw was very different from what he thought he was going to see, but very quickly the pieces snapped together in his mind and any thought of forgiveness or easing up had quickly gone. \"I see..!\" were his two first words spoken assertively but not kindly as he saw the servant girl pressing her lips towards Kojuro's - and Kojuro returning the favor. \"Are you healing well, my son?\" he asked as he took a couple of steps further into Kojuro's room stiffening his upper lip casting a downwards glance at the servant girl. \"You must be Nakatani-san. I've heard so much about you.\" he said, though his voice was cold and his words condescending.\"Is this a way to pay back the trust my brother Genji so graciously handed you when he became ill? Ohh yes I've heard of your little picnic trip and how you managed - in the most shameful way - to get severely injured when you followed the kidnapper of this servant girl deep into the woods along with a single incompetent ronin.\" he said as his voice shook slightly from the repressed anger. \"I know you used to take these kind of reckless decisions when you were younger, but I really had hoped that you had grown up to be a man! And not a boy who...\" he said and shook his head in disbelief. \"... who foolishly chases after a mere servant girl and so easily throws away his duty to his house!\" he said with a hard voice. Somewhere inside Ryuzo he was happy to see Kojuro alive and awake, but his emotions covered any trace of that right now. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The mansion hallways immediately felt homely to Ryuzo and a slight smile appeared on his face in spite of the circumstances as he approached the door that led into Kojuro's room. He was likely sleeping or in other ways resting in order to get better. Well he hoped, and at least Yamazaki hadn't given him the impression that he was about to die. Somewhere in Ryuzo's heart that felt good to know, and right before he touched the door to slide it open, the thought that he might have been blaming Kojuro for more than what was fair crossed his mind and he could almost see himself forgiving his son, as he lay there in his bed so peacefully. "}, "post-77847": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1515756362000", "message": "She wanted their kiss to last forever, but it didn't take long before they were interrupted by a voice coming from the doorway. She had not even heard the door slide open. She immediately jumped and looked up at the man standing there with big eyes. She didn't know the men she saw there, but his presence already suggested that he should not be messed with. She would awkwardly, but carefully move away a little bit from Kojuro. Letting his head rest on his own pillow again instead of on her lap. Her whole face was bright red even all the way to her neck from the embarrassment she felt. They had been caught, and likely they had been caught by the wrong person. When he spoke her name she nodded, though she didn't speak. She averted his eyes and only looked at the floor directly in front of her. Only when he spoke about his brother had Nakatani's mind found out who exactly was in front of them. This was Kojuro's father. She clenched her fist a little bit, feeling slightly angry at herself. Kojuro was now in big trouble and it was her fault. She couldn't even defend herself right now as she was sure that if she dared to speak, he would just call her out as disrespectful towards her superiors. After all, she was just a servant, more clearly than ever.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She wanted their kiss to last forever, but it didn't take long before they were interrupted by a voice coming from the doorway. She had not even heard the door slide open. She immediately jumped and looked up at the man standing there with big eyes. She didn't know the men she saw there, but his presence already suggested that he should not be messed with. She would awkwardly, but carefully move away a little bit from Kojuro. Letting his head rest on his own pillow again instead of on her lap. Her whole face was bright red even all the way to her neck from the embarrassment she felt. They had been caught, and likely they had been caught by the wrong person. "}, "post-77896": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1515846884000", "message": "Kojuro heard the words \u201cI see,\u201d and instantly recognised the voice he had not heard for five years. When Nakatani hastily replaced herself with a pillow and sat to one side, he had the first look at his father in all that time. His hair was greyer, and he looked somewhat older than Genji, but still a man the prime of his mature years and healthy. However there was a look about him that Kojuro did not like, already seeing that Ryuzo was angry and as usual somewhat disappointed. It didn\u2019t seem like it would be any kind of happy reunion between the two, as much as Kojuro might have hoped for such a thing, eventually. \u201cNakatani, this is my father,\u201d he said simply. Kojuro stayed silent throughout Ryuzo\u2019s damning critique of his behaviour, his head turned away and eyes averted. Since Ryuzo entered, he had visibly tensed, the muscles in his jaw clenched. His wound seemed to hurt more and more and he struggled to keep the pain from his face and show any more weakness in front of Ryuzo as he gave his dressing down. Kojuro didn\u2019t speak right away, instead absorbing all the harshness of Ryuzo\u2019s words, and when he did, his voice was quiet. \u201cYou\u2019re right,\u201d he said at last, seeming to take Ryuzo\u2019s criticisms to heart. And he did. \u201cI can\u2019t deny I\u2019ve made some questionable decisions.\u201d Why was Ryuzo here now, after five years? Just waiting for the moment when he felt his criticisms would hit home most painfully? But if Kojuro was upset, he was also angry. He turned his head directly towards Ryuzo and met his eyes squarely. \u201cBut,\u201d he continued,  \u201ca person who abandoned their clan in a fit of pique and refused to attend his older brother\u2019s wedding has forfeited his right to lecture me in matters of honour and duty. \u201cAs it stands now, the best thing I can do to serve the clan right now is to rest as much as possible and recover quickly, and your presence here is not conducive to that. So please leave.  If you have anything else to say to me, put it in writing and hand it to the guards - I will read it later.\u201d As far as he was concerned, the audience was over. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Kojuro heard the words \u201cI see,\u201d and instantly recognised the voice he had not heard for five years. When Nakatani hastily replaced herself with a pillow and sat to one side, he had the first look at his father in all that time. His hair was greyer, and he looked somewhat older than Genji, but still a man the prime of his mature years and healthy. However there was a look about him that Kojuro did not like, already seeing that Ryuzo was angry and as usual somewhat disappointed. It didn\u2019t seem like it would be any kind of happy reunion between the two, as much as Kojuro might have hoped for such a thing, eventually. \u201cNakatani, this is my father,\u201d he said simply. "}, "post-77908": {"user": "Ryuzo Hizashi", "user_num": 2746, "timestamp": "1515877103000", "message": "\"Kojuro..?!?\" Ryuzo said surprised after receiving the slightly unforeseen scolding and dismissal from his son. Ryuzo would however not raise his voice further and quite contrary to what could be expected he calmed down. He would however not let Kojuro's accusations pass as truths as they were spoken from a point of ignorance. \"You know as well as me that Genji niisan did not ask a question with two viable answers. I was forced to leave the clan if not to live a life in shame - partly because my son and daughter never took my side.\" he said and narrowed his eyes. \"Regarding Genji's wedding, my work at the Shrine of Reason doesn't grant me 'holidays'.\" he said in a slightly condescending manner. \"... But when I heard that Genji had fallen ill for the second time I pleaded to be allowed to leave and visit the house again and Ezia-dono reluctantly let me.\" he said and observed Kojuro's expression.\"I am here to serve my clan too in its time of need. As a former lord I know exactly what happens when you show the slightest bit of weakness, then someone will try to usurp your position. And though I received no such support from you when I needed it, I am here because I will not allow any vultures to seize such opportunity.\" he said determined. Ryuzo had all but ignored that Kojuro asked him to leave and found that it was a request that was best left ignored for the sake of the clan and Kojuro himself. \"Kojuro... What are your plans after you've healed? How will you make Kiyonai strong and prosper? I've heard about the border tensions and rumor says that you have a large army stationed there. And this mentality of yours... I've seen how you've acted on a whim all you life, but how will you keep that in check? And this...\" he said and looked at Nakatani before looking back at Kojuro. \"... This bachelor mentality is not aiding you in finding a wife like a proper lord should.\" he insisted, trying at least somewhat to take into account Nakatani's feelings in the way he spoke. As far as Ryuzo was concerned Kojuro had likely seduced this servant with untold promises of a better future and ascending from her position as a servant - something you could hardly blame a servant for wishing for. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Kojuro..?!?\" Ryuzo said surprised after receiving the slightly unforeseen scolding and dismissal from his son. Ryuzo would however not raise his voice further and quite contrary to what could be expected he calmed down. He would however not let Kojuro's accusations pass as truths as they were spoken from a point of ignorance. "}, "post-78067": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1516024349000", "message": "Nakatani would remain quiet, she knew that the last thing she should do now was to open her mouth and speak. Even if emotions were running rapid in her mind. All she could do was watch Kojuro as he was being scolded by his father and during the answer she gave him. She could see the tension in his body, especially his jaw, and worried about the possibility of his wounds opening up if he would put much tension on his stomach. Al she could do for now was making sure that he stayed down in bed and wouldn't try to get up. She listened to both their words and figured out fast that there was a past of their relationship that Nakatani knew nothing about. The tension between them was greater than she ever imagined it possibly be. Her secret images of everyone having the loving family that she missed out on certainly wasn't in place here. Even when she herself was mentioned in Ryuzo's words she remained quiet, just staring down at the floor near where Kojuro was laying. Making sure he stayed laying down. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Nakatani would remain quiet, she knew that the last thing she should do now was to open her mouth and speak. Even if emotions were running rapid in her mind. All she could do was watch Kojuro as he was being scolded by his father and during the answer she gave him. She could see the tension in his body, especially his jaw, and worried about the possibility of his wounds opening up if he would put much tension on his stomach. Al she could do for now was making sure that he stayed down in bed and wouldn't try to get up. "}, "post-78306": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1516314965000", "message": "His stomach was hurting so badly by now that he could hardly concentrate on his father's words. Not that he was interested in hearing Ryuzo's excuses, and in fact his expression indicated he was particularly unimpressed when Ryuzo scrutinised it. Kojuro didn't feel he could raise his voice above Ryuzo's to cut him off, and just waited rather impatiently for a break in his extensive monologue, staring at the wall, before he could get a word in edgewise. However, his ears pricked up when Ryuzo began to talk about someone vultures waiting to usurp this who show weakness. Was he \u2026 unconsciously revealing his true intentions? Had Ryuzo come back now, because he sensed weakness because of Genji's illness, and wanted to take his place once again as the head of the clan. Kojuro felt cold run through him. Maybe he was being overly suspicious, and he pushed that thought down inside himself before he took advantage in the natural break to speak once again. \"You think I'm not aware of that? Why do you suppose we've kept Lord Genji's illness a secret for these last months?\" his question was practically snapped at Ryuzo as his eyes flashed towards him. \"Father. If you truly wish to serve the clan, you need to start by learning to accept orders.\" Kojuro turned to Nakatani who sat beside him, her worry for him obvious. \"Nakatani-san, please go and ask the guards to escort Ryuzo-dono out.\" If she did so, the guards would soon appear behind Ryuzo and make it very clear that they were going to remove him willingly or unwillingly. Why now was Ryuzo deciding to take an interest in his marriage prospects? He'd had seventeen years to arrange a potential match before he left for the House of Reason, but Kojuro's future hadn't seemed to be of any concern to him then. It was quite possible he was only mentioning it at all because Nakatani was there, trying to needle them both. Kojuro was under no illusion that he would have to marry a woman for the clan's sake, and would have had no reason or impulse to refuse had his father or Genji found a match for him. \"Fine, make a list of suitable candidates. And of potential husbands for Anzen and wives for yourself too while you're at it.\" Perhaps giving him something to do would keep him from meddling in anything more important. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "His stomach was hurting so badly by now that he could hardly concentrate on his father's words. Not that he was interested in hearing Ryuzo's excuses, and in fact his expression indicated he was particularly unimpressed when Ryuzo scrutinised it. Kojuro didn't feel he could raise his voice above Ryuzo's to cut him off, and just waited rather impatiently for a break in his extensive monologue, staring at the wall, before he could get a word in edgewise. However, his ears pricked up when Ryuzo began to talk about someone vultures waiting to usurp this who show weakness. Was he \u2026 unconsciously revealing his true intentions? Had Ryuzo come back now, because he sensed weakness because of Genji's illness, and wanted to take his place once again as the head of the clan. Kojuro felt cold run through him. Maybe he was being overly suspicious, and he pushed that thought down inside himself before he took advantage in the natural break to speak once again. \"You think I'm not aware of that? Why do you suppose we've kept Lord Genji's illness a secret for these last months?\" his question was practically snapped at Ryuzo as his eyes flashed towards him. \"Father. If you truly wish to serve the clan, you need to start by learning to accept orders.\" "}, "post-78477": {"user": "Ryuzo Hizashi", "user_num": 2746, "timestamp": "1516448371000", "message": "Ryuzo's face showed his surprise when Kojuro suddenly asked Nakatani to go fetch the guards. This wasn't within the scope of what Ryuzo had believed Kojuro would do.\"You can just stay there, I'm on my way out anyway.\" he said with a stern sidelong glance directed towards the servant girl. This way hopefully he wouldn't have to suffer the shame of the guards coming to lead him out. \"Kojuro my son. You don't need to show me your determination, I always knew you had it. But I'm disappointed that you won't listen to reason.\" Ryuzo said as an answer to this act and partly to his last comment about marriage candidates, that he would find rude and thus not comment on directly. \"I'll be seeing you Kojuro.\" he said but pausing on his way to the door as he looked towards the servant girl. \"And you should probably get used to spending less time with my son.\" he added before finally leaving Kojuro and Nakatani alone in Kojuro's room. This end wasn't to Ryuzo's liking at all.\u00a0[Exit: Main Gate]", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Ryuzo's face showed his surprise when Kojuro suddenly asked Nakatani to go fetch the guards. This wasn't within the scope of what Ryuzo had believed Kojuro would do."}, "post-78547": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1516551764000", "message": "Even Nakatani was slightly surprised when Kojuro seemed to order her to go fetch the guards. It showed the amount of irritation Kojuro was suffering under his father. She slightly agreed, thinking the stress and anger he might be experiencing now was anything but beneficial to his health. So she was about to get up on her feet when Ryuzo told her to stay in her place, so she sat back down again and placed her hands on her lap. She was more then a little bit stressed herself and more than anything she had questions. As soon as the door closed Kojuro would hear her exhale a deep breath. She hadn't noticed until now but the meeting had gotten her heart pounding and she had apparently been holding her breath as if his father would disapprove of her even inhaling the air around Kojuro. She then made her way over to Kojuro again, hoping her presence would help him relax a bit more and lose the tension that was in his body. She wasn't sure what to say to him and it took her a while to open her mouth at all. \"Your father seems like a big personality, Kojuro,\" she said with a small smile. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Even Nakatani was slightly surprised when Kojuro seemed to order her to go fetch the guards. It showed the amount of irritation Kojuro was suffering under his father. She slightly agreed, thinking the stress and anger he might be experiencing now was anything but beneficial to his health. So she was about to get up on her feet when Ryuzo told her to stay in her place, so she sat back down again and placed her hands on her lap. She was more then a little bit stressed herself and more than anything she had questions. "}, "post-78563": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1516566071000", "message": "Kojuro watched the door after Ryuzo left, as though expecting him to come back in with \"one more thing\", before he finally accepted his father had gone. \"Damn it!\" he cursed quietly to himself, frustrated. He felt like he hadn't handled the situation well at all, but Ryuzo was at least gone, and that was the main thing. As he put his right hand to his wound, hoping to quell the pain a little, he noticed his left had clenched itself into a fist. He heard Nakatani sigh out a deep breath, and looked over to her as she came closer. When she spoke, a returned smile, equally as small, appeared and his face relaxed a little. He gave a quiet laugh. \"Thats \u2026 certainly true,\" he replied. \"I'm sorry you had to witness that,\" he added. Ryuzo's disapproval could be quite hard to take and he hadn't exactly gone easy on Nakatani, but moreover he felt as though he shouldn't have lost his temper in front of her either. \"If you wouldn't mind\u2026 can you ask them not to let anyone else in here without my permission, except you and Anzen-onee-san?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Kojuro watched the door after Ryuzo left, as though expecting him to come back in with \"one more thing\", before he finally accepted his father had gone. \"Damn it!\" he cursed quietly to himself, frustrated. He felt like he hadn't handled the situation well at all, but Ryuzo was at least gone, and that was the main thing. As he put his right hand to his wound, hoping to quell the pain a little, he noticed his left had clenched itself into a fist. He heard Nakatani sigh out a deep breath, and looked over to her as she came closer. When she spoke, a returned smile, equally as small, appeared and his face relaxed a little. He gave a quiet laugh. \"Thats \u2026 certainly true,\" he replied. \"I'm sorry you had to witness that,\" he added. Ryuzo's disapproval could be quite hard to take and he hadn't exactly gone easy on Nakatani, but moreover he felt as though he shouldn't have lost his temper in front of her either. \"If you wouldn't mind\u2026 can you ask them not to let anyone else in here without my permission, except you and Anzen-onee-san?\""}, "post-78565": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1516566786000", "message": "As soon as they were done laughing about her little comment she looked down at the floor in front of her again. A part of her knew that his father was right and that her attempt to be by Kojuro's side was a foolish one at best. But another part of her refused to believe that she had been a bad influence on him. Sure he did have to come rescue her, but she had stopped blaming herself for being kidnapped. Though she still did blame herself for Kojuro's wounds. She nodded to him and got up from her spot and walked out of the door. She told the guards outside that nobody was allowed to enter the room except for her and Anzen and immediately instructed them to let Anzen know that her brother had awakened and her father had returned. She then made a small detour and gathered some of the numbing herbs that Anzen had given to her. She then entered the room again and closed the door shut behind her. \"I am sorry for getting you in so much trouble with your father,\" she said apologetic and handed him the little pouch with ground up herbs in it along with another glass of water. \"Take this, it will help against the pain. But you really should try to not rile yourself up Kojuro,\" she said with worry in her voice. She wanted to ask him many questions but most of them stayed stuck in her throat. \"I asked the guards to inform Anzen about your father's arrival as well.\" was all she could say.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "As soon as they were done laughing about her little comment she looked down at the floor in front of her again. A part of her knew that his father was right and that her attempt to be by Kojuro's side was a foolish one at best. But another part of her refused to believe that she had been a bad influence on him. Sure he did have to come rescue her, but she had stopped blaming herself for being kidnapped. Though she still did blame herself for Kojuro's wounds. "}, "post-78569": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1516568371000", "message": "\u201cIt\u2019s hardly your fault,\u201d he responded, \u201cHe disapproves of most things I do. No doubt he would have been disappointed whether you were there or not.\u201d He took the herbs and water from her and swallowed them dutifully. \u201cYes, you\u2019re right,\u201d he said with a sigh. \u201cThat would probably be the right thing to do,\u201d but it was easier said than done. \u201cI suppose I lost control of myself a little there\u2026\u201d and yet he didn\u2019t really see how he had had any other choice but to get angry other than back down and beg his father\u2019s forgiveness, and somehow that seemed worse. At least now under Nakatani\u2019s calm influence he was starting to relax a bit. \u201cIt seems our secret\u2019s out now,\u201d he said with a wry smile, \u201cBut maybe that doesn\u2019t need to be such a bad thing\u2026\u201d ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cIt\u2019s hardly your fault,\u201d he responded, \u201cHe disapproves of most things I do. No doubt he would have been disappointed whether you were there or not.\u201d He took the herbs and water from her and swallowed them dutifully. \u201cYes, you\u2019re right,\u201d he said with a sigh. \u201cThat would probably be the right thing to do,\u201d but it was easier said than done. \u201cI suppose I lost control of myself a little there\u2026\u201d and yet he didn\u2019t really see how he had had any other choice but to get angry other than back down and beg his father\u2019s forgiveness, and somehow that seemed worse. At least now under Nakatani\u2019s calm influence he was starting to relax a bit. \u201cIt seems our secret\u2019s out now,\u201d he said with a wry smile, \u201cBut maybe that doesn\u2019t need to be such a bad thing\u2026\u201d "}, "post-78570": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1516568763000", "message": "Nakatani bit her lip a little bit. She felt like she wanted to reassure him, tell him that it was normal to feel that way with your parents. But the truth was that she didn't know. She had never had parents, she had been adopted right away into a Geisha house at a very young age. The people there weren't your parents, they were the ones who put you to work and beat you for your wrongdoings. And now it seemed that Kojuro's and his father's relationship seemed to somewhat resemble that. \"Sometimes even your best isn't enough. All we can do is try to do the right things and work the hardest we could.\" it was a thing she had often needed to tell herself when she had received a beating over spilled tea or overboiling rice. It had felt unfair back then and she was sure that it felt unfair to Kojuro as well. \"Was he always this way?\" she dared to ask. Hoping it would not rile Kojuro up once again. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Nakatani bit her lip a little bit. She felt like she wanted to reassure him, tell him that it was normal to feel that way with your parents. But the truth was that she didn't know. She had never had parents, she had been adopted right away into a Geisha house at a very young age. The people there weren't your parents, they were the ones who put you to work and beat you for your wrongdoings. And now it seemed that Kojuro's and his father's relationship seemed to somewhat resemble that. "}, "post-78572": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1516569953000", "message": "\u201cSometimes its hard to know what the right thing is,\u201d he said, frowning. What he thought was the right thing and what Ryuzo thought were often very different, and while Ryuzo could be abrasive, often his critcisms were justified. This time though, he felt more sure than usual that a lot of them were not, which had him doubting the rest. All he really wanted now was to go back to sleep but the thoughts swirling around in his head were not going to let him. At least the herbs were helping to numb the pain a little. \u201cAlways? No \u2026 I suppose he always had high standards for us but \u2026 I don\u2019t think I\u2019ve seen him quite this angry. It\u2019s been five years since we\u2019ve seen each other so I suppose he had a lot to get off his chest. I wasn\u2019t always the easiest of sons to raise.\u201d", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cSometimes its hard to know what the right thing is,\u201d he said, frowning. What he thought was the right thing and what Ryuzo thought were often very different, and while Ryuzo could be abrasive, often his critcisms were justified. This time though, he felt more sure than usual that a lot of them were not, which had him doubting the rest. All he really wanted now was to go back to sleep but the thoughts swirling around in his head were not going to let him. At least the herbs were helping to numb the pain a little. \u201cAlways? No \u2026 I suppose he always had high standards for us but \u2026 I don\u2019t think I\u2019ve seen him quite this angry. It\u2019s been five years since we\u2019ve seen each other so I suppose he had a lot to get off his chest. I wasn\u2019t always the easiest of sons to raise.\u201d"}, "post-78703": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1516701391000", "message": "She patted him softly through his hair, listening to the things he was saying. She was still feeling quite uncomfortable, unsure what were the right things to say or do. She simply didn't have anything to compare the situation too. \"I am sorry...\" was all she could say, wondering if maybe if she had decided not to kiss him at that right moment, things would have been better between them. That maybe his father had not been quite as angry with him and their secret would have stayed exactly that. A secret. \"Should I go? You could get some more sleep and I will bring you food later.\" she said in a soft hushed voice. She simply didn't see how she could turn the conversation around, how she could make Kojuro feel more comfortable about what had just happened and that was making her uncomfortable as well. She had always known what to say to men to make them feel the right way, make them feel happy. But now that she had become this close to one, she was at a loss for words to comfort him. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She patted him softly through his hair, listening to the things he was saying. She was still feeling quite uncomfortable, unsure what were the right things to say or do. She simply didn't have anything to compare the situation too. \"I am sorry...\" was all she could say, wondering if maybe if she had decided not to kiss him at that right moment, things would have been better between them. That maybe his father had not been quite as angry with him and their secret would have stayed exactly that. A secret. \"Should I go? You could get some more sleep and I will bring you food later.\" she said in a soft hushed voice. She simply didn't see how she could turn the conversation around, how she could make Kojuro feel more comfortable about what had just happened and that was making her uncomfortable as well. She had always known what to say to men to make them feel the right way, make them feel happy. But now that she had become this close to one, she was at a loss for words to comfort him. "}, "post-78969": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1517175403000", "message": "Kojuro thought that Nakatani seemed more than a little troubled by Ryuzo's visit. \"It is what it is,\" he replied when she apologised. \"Nothing to be sorry for.\" It was just something to be accepted, Ryuzo was his father and he owed him his respect, if not his direct obedience. Duty to one's father was important, even if it came after duty to one's lord. He just lay and let her play with his hair for some moments, finding her presence and touch to be reassuring. When she asked if she should go, he opened his eyes again, and looked to her. \"You could stay a little while longer. I'd like that,\" he answered, but not wishing to be too selfish, added, \"but if there are things you need to do \u2026 or you probably need to get some rest yourself\u2026\" If she wanted to go, she could, but Kojuro hoped she would stay, her presence helping to relax him more after the disturbance his father had caused. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Kojuro thought that Nakatani seemed more than a little troubled by Ryuzo's visit. \"It is what it is,\" he replied when she apologised. \"Nothing to be sorry for.\" It was just something to be accepted, Ryuzo was his father and he owed him his respect, if not his direct obedience. Duty to one's father was important, even if it came after duty to one's lord. He just lay and let her play with his hair for some moments, finding her presence and touch to be reassuring. When she asked if she should go, he opened his eyes again, and looked to her. \"You could stay a little while longer. I'd like that,\" he answered, but not wishing to be too selfish, added, \"but if there are things you need to do \u2026 or you probably need to get some rest yourself\u2026\" If she wanted to go, she could, but Kojuro hoped she would stay, her presence helping to relax him more after the disturbance his father had caused. "}, "post-78974": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1517177680000", "message": "\"No, I have already finished most of my chores,\" she said calmly, still fiddling his hair. She purposefully didn't answer his question about her needing a rest. She was tired and there were probably visible dark rings under her eyes. She had stayed up for long nights hoping Kojuro would wake up. Even when she had tried to lay her head down on the table, she had found it very hard to fall asleep, Rushing back to conscious as soon as Kojuro moved just a slight bit. \"I will stay a bit longer then.\" she then said, managing a smile. There was a small bit of silence before she finally brought herself to ask the question that was on her mind. \"Your father said that I should get used to spending less time with you. What do you think he meant with that?\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"No, I have already finished most of my chores,\" she said calmly, still fiddling his hair. She purposefully didn't answer his question about her needing a rest. She was tired and there were probably visible dark rings under her eyes. She had stayed up for long nights hoping Kojuro would wake up. Even when she had tried to lay her head down on the table, she had found it very hard to fall asleep, Rushing back to conscious as soon as Kojuro moved just a slight bit. \"I will stay a bit longer then.\" she then said, managing a smile. There was a small bit of silence before she finally brought herself to ask the question that was on her mind. \"Your father said that I should get used to spending less time with you. What do you think he meant with that?\" "}, "post-79020": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1517259607000", "message": "Kojuro was glad to have Nakatani decide to stay, returning her smile. As she was silent for a while, he found himself able to rest a bit more, and drifted back towards sleep. After a short time he heard her speak and his eyes re-opened. He was a little annoyed that Ryuzo had caused her to worry about such things, as if she hadn't had enough disturbance in her life recently. \u201cI don't think he approves of us. But its only a threat, don't take it to heart.\u201d Whatever his father was planning, if anything, he wouldn't get far with it. \u201cTry not to think about it,\u201d he added, advice that he was trying to take himself, but not doing very well at as he lay exhausted and craving rest but wide awake for now. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Kojuro was glad to have Nakatani decide to stay, returning her smile. As she was silent for a while, he found himself able to rest a bit more, and drifted back towards sleep. After a short time he heard her speak and his eyes re-opened. He was a little annoyed that Ryuzo had caused her to worry about such things, as if she hadn't had enough disturbance in her life recently. \u201cI don't think he approves of us. But its only a threat, don't take it to heart.\u201d Whatever his father was planning, if anything, he wouldn't get far with it. \u201cTry not to think about it,\u201d he added, advice that he was trying to take himself, but not doing very well at as he lay exhausted and craving rest but wide awake for now. "}, "post-79045": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1517304389000", "message": "As Yasuke made it up the stairs towards Kojuro's room, he found that a guard was blocking his way. \"Hey what is this for?\" Yasuke asked the guard surprised as he was not immediately allowed to walk in. \"I need to speak with Hizashi-dono immediately, this is very important! It's about Ryuzo-dono, his father!\" Yasuke explained to the guard. He would frown a bit and stare the guard down to put pressure on him to at least make Kojuro know that he was there. He had other means to gain access to Kojuro's room, but though he was impatient he'd better not start anything right now. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "As Yasuke made it up the stairs towards Kojuro's room, he found that a guard was blocking his way. "}, "post-79121": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1517439827000", "message": "One of the guards looked at Yasuke, scrutinising him, and his expression softened minutely. \u201cYou\u2019re Sou Yasuke, aren\u2019t you?\u201d he asked. He had been there on the day that Yasuke had returned home with a semiconscious Kojuro and took charge of keeping him alive until Anzen-hime arrived. Clearly Sou Yasuke was loyal to their lord, and performed a great service to the Hizashi that day. There was a note of respect in the guard\u2019s voice as he addressed Yasuke. \u201cI will ask Hizashi-dono if he will permit you to enter.\u201d This guard left his post to get permission while the second guard remained standing on alert. When the guard entered the room, Kojuro was surprised to hear that Yasuke was at the door, but not unpleasantly so. It would be good to see another friendly face after Ryuzo, especially since he was awake for the time being. Perhaps it would give both he and Naka a distraction that they both needed. He had no inkling of Nakatani\u2019s wariness of Yasuke, and maybe if he had, he wouldn\u2019t have let him in just now. Kojuro was a little less enthusiastic, and then fledgling smile on his face faded, when the guard mentioned he had something urgent to talk about concerning Ryuzo. \u201cLet him in,\u201d he instructed, and the guard bowed and went to fetch Yasuke. \u201cWhat could this be about?\u201d he asked Nakatani, mostly rhetorically, as an image flashed through his mind of Ryuzo having keeled over from a heart attack brought on by his indignation at his son\u2019s terrible behaviour. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "One of the guards looked at Yasuke, scrutinising him, and his expression softened minutely. \u201cYou\u2019re Sou Yasuke, aren\u2019t you?\u201d he asked. He had been there on the day that Yasuke had returned home with a semiconscious Kojuro and took charge of keeping him alive until Anzen-hime arrived. Clearly Sou Yasuke was loyal to their lord, and performed a great service to the Hizashi that day. There was a note of respect in the guard\u2019s voice as he addressed Yasuke. \u201cI will ask Hizashi-dono if he will permit you to enter.\u201d This guard left his post to get permission while the second guard remained standing on alert. "}, "post-79182": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1517558428000", "message": "Yasuke tensed up and clenched his fists when he was asked his name. The reaction just suddenly emerged, remembering what usually happened when his name was recognized. But not this time, and when the guard said he was going to ask Kojuro, he noticed the tone of respect in the guard's voice. \"Ah yeah... Of course.\" he muttered trying to straighten up a bit trying to relax a little again, telling himself that there was no need to be alert right now. The guard returned quickly to let Yasuke in and he bowed slightly to both of them before entering. If he had eased up a little, he returned to a slightly more tensed up state when he saw that Nakatani was with Kojuro too. \"Oh, hello Kojuro-dono... And Nakatani-san.\" Yasuke said promptly, though slightly surprised by her being there. And then again maybe not, as exactly that might have been why Ryuzo had found out and gone to such measures. \"It's good to see you recovering.\" Yasuke said politely as he stepped a bit closer. \"I was having an 'audience' with Yamazaki-san and Ryuzo-dono just before...\" Yasuke said. He wasn't quite sure of Kojuro's relationship with his father and was hesitant to speak his mind directly and he was visibly struggling to pick the right words. \"After them asking me all kinds of questions about our mission to save Nakatani-san here... I rested outside the room and accidentally overheard a few things.\" Yasuke said trying to put on a grimace that would fit. \"Even though I kept my mouth shut, he seems to know about you two. And he's taking steps to get Nakatani transferred to Jeoncho with the excuse, that she isn't safe here due to the ronin who abducted Nakatani is still on the lose.\" Yasuke said, trying to shape his words in a way, that Kojuro might consider finding the culprit an urgent priority. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Yasuke tensed up and clenched his fists when he was asked his name. The reaction just suddenly emerged, remembering what usually happened when his name was recognized. But not this time, and when the guard said he was going to ask Kojuro, he noticed the tone of respect in the guard's voice. "}, "post-79429": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1517911799000", "message": "When she heard the guards mention Yasuke\u2019s name, Nakatani tensed up. Kojuro probably wouldn\u2019t notice as his face was turned towards the guards instead of her. She didn\u2019t speak up however as she still didn\u2019t know what caused her uneasyness around him. She had her suspicion, but still felt like they were based on nothing at al. \u201cI don\u2019t know what he could be here for\u2026\u201d she said carefully to Kojuro\u2019s question. When he would eventually enter the room she would once again shuffle back from Kojuro and let his head rest back on the pillow. She didn\u2019t feel comfortable showing her affection towards him with Yasuke around, even though she knew that he was well aware of their relationship together. Her body felt tense and at no point she would look up at him, just look towards the ground in front of her knees. She simply listened carefully to what they were talking about. When the mention eventually came of Ryuzo\u2019s plan she looked up at Yasuke, looking for the sencirity in his eyes. A part of her wanted to say that even Ryuzo couldn\u2019t be this cruel, but he did say that she better not get used to hanging around Kojuro. It seemed that he was planning to make this the truth. \u201cBut.. He can\u2019t force me to leave! I am employed under lord Genji.\u201d Was all she could manage. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "When she heard the guards mention Yasuke\u2019s name, Nakatani tensed up. Kojuro probably wouldn\u2019t notice as his face was turned towards the guards instead of her. She didn\u2019t speak up however as she still didn\u2019t know what caused her uneasyness around him. She had her suspicion, but still felt like they were based on nothing at al. \u201cI don\u2019t know what he could be here for\u2026\u201d she said carefully to Kojuro\u2019s question. "}, "post-79489": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1518127221000", "message": "Kojuro was glad to see Yasuke, and gave him as much of a smile as he could muster when Yasuke spoke to him. \u201cThanks,\u201d he replied. It was in no small matter thanks to Yasuke that he was recovering at all, and was grateful to him for that as well as many other things. The smile quickly faded though when Yasuke started talking about hearing Ryuzo talking with Yamazaki. He listened to what he had to say in silence, weighing his words. \u201cI know you wouldn\u2019t have said anything, Yasuke, I\u2019m afraid he found out from us\u2026\u201d Kojuro said, passing a glance to Nakatani. Ryuzo planned to have Nakatani transferred to Jeoncho. How could he expect to do such a thing, she wasn\u2019t his to command, and where in Jeoncho would he wish to send her? Indignation at his father\u2019s gall to do such a thing, vied with a small voice in his head that told him that it was an undeniable fact that he had let his feelings for Nakatani distract him from his duty. Perhaps Ryuzo had a good point in trying to separate them, as much as he, Kojuro, did not want that to happen. Was it selfish of him to want to keep her near? Hearing Nakatani protest, he looked back to her again and reached out his hand. \u201cNo, he can\u2019t,\u201d he assured her. Focusing back on Yasuke once more, \u201cThere\u2019s no need to be coy about it, tell me what else they said,\u201d he asked, then listened as Yasuke relayed everything he had heard about their conversation. \u201cHomura-dono won\u2019t be easily swayed by such a request,\u201d he said at last. \u201cAnd it will take a while for him to receive it. I\u2019ll write to him too \u2013 I need to do so anyway \u2013 and it should arrive before Ryuzo\u2019s letter. In the meantime, it\u2019s best for you to stay out of his way as much as possible,\u201d he said to Nakatani. While Ryuzo technically had no authority in the mansion, he could still wield his rank over a servant and not many would object.\u201cYasuke, thank you for telling me all this. I\u2019m glad I can count on you,\u201d he said. Yasuke had revealed himself to truly be a reliable person. Undoubtedly he had saved Nakatani from a much worse ordeal, and Kojuro knew that without Yasuke\u2019s assistance he may not have made it back to the mansion alive. \u201cThis masked ronin, you haven\u2019t caught him yet? I seem to remember you vowed something of the sort\u2026?\u201d a half smile came to his face as he couldn\u2019t resist slightly teasing Yasuke, but he was quickly serious again, when he added, \u201cI need you to find him. Take whatever resources you need \u2013 men, horses, gold \u2013 and bring him back here alive, or bring back his head, I don\u2019t care which. Regardless of what my father has in mind, it is bad for the clan to have this villain on the loose. It makes us look weak to have him hit the clan right at its heart then give us the run-around. I know you can do it, Yasuke.\u201d He said, putting his faith in him to lead the mission on the hunt for the masked ronin. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Kojuro was glad to see Yasuke, and gave him as much of a smile as he could muster when Yasuke spoke to him. \u201cThanks,\u201d he replied. It was in no small matter thanks to Yasuke that he was recovering at all, and was grateful to him for that as well as many other things. The smile quickly faded though when Yasuke started talking about hearing Ryuzo talking with Yamazaki. He listened to what he had to say in silence, weighing his words. \u201cI know you wouldn\u2019t have said anything, Yasuke, I\u2019m afraid he found out from us\u2026\u201d Kojuro said, passing a glance to Nakatani. "}, "post-79518": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1518204612000", "message": "Kojuro was definitely looking better and somehow his positive attitude towards Yasuke helped him compose himself a bit again. Obviosuly Kojuro wanted to know the whole story and though Yasuke liked to be selective about certain bits of truth, there was nothing he wanted to filter away from what he had heard from Ryuzo. Judging from Kojuro's attitude he wasn't the best of friends with his father - a feeling he could certainly get behind. \"I know how... you know those dads can be...\" he said shifting a little back and forth on his feet before he gave Kojuro a couple of strained pads on the shoulder and an awkward smile. \"I guess my own father could be pretty...\" Yasuke said and paused as his mind flicked back to when his dad had tossed his teddy bear into the fire to 'make a man' out of Yasuke. \"Strict... yeah pretty strict...\" he said stifled a sniff and seemed to return from a slight daze before taking a couple of steps back again. \"My impression was that he was trying to use your 'safety' as an argument.\" Yasuke said to Nakatani before returning back to Kojuro. \"Ehh no... I haven't caught him yet, but I wanted to speak with you about it...\" he said seeing the half smile on Kojuro's face. What was this about again? Belittling his effort in front of Nakatani? Yasuke still wasn't sure about Kojuro's intentions. Either way Kojuro arrived at the conclusion Yasuke had hoped he would with next to no persuasion. \"Yes... Thank you. That was what I wanted to suggest. If we catch the culprit Ryuzo will have no arguments left of coercing anyone to have Nakatani deported. Oh yeah, and you'll finally have peace, Nakatani-san.\" Yasuke said and nodded politely at Nakatani. Kojuro was obviously willing to expend a fair amount of resources to catch this guy - Yasuke couldn't screw it up, he had to find somehow who would reliably fit into the context of being the culprit. If only he had pointed him out as being one of the dead guys in the forest, but then again this was a chance to rise further in standing.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Kojuro was definitely looking better and somehow his positive attitude towards Yasuke helped him compose himself a bit again. Obviosuly Kojuro wanted to know the whole story and though Yasuke liked to be selective about certain bits of truth, there was nothing he wanted to filter away from what he had heard from Ryuzo. Judging from Kojuro's attitude he wasn't the best of friends with his father - a feeling he could certainly get behind. "}, "post-79757": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1518687364000", "message": "Nakatani stayed quiet throughout the conversation between the two. She sighed with relief when Kojuro reassured her that Ryuzo had no power to transfer her. She wanted nothing less them to leave the mansion, even when she still felt very uncomfortable around Yasuke. However, as the conversation went on she got even more confused then she had before. Yasuke seemed genuine in his effort to want to catch the culprit. Something that would be a weird thing to be so sure about if he was the one who did this to her as she thought he had. Her mind swirled and a small bit of the rest of the conversation was lost to her as her thought occupied her thinking. She then looked up at Yasuke out of the blue, her eyes probably the most serious then he had ever seen them of her. She needed to pressure him, she needed to know his responds. \u201cAre you sure you can find the culprit?\u201d It was very out of her character, but she had been plagued by this feeling for a long while. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Nakatani stayed quiet throughout the conversation between the two. She sighed with relief when Kojuro reassured her that Ryuzo had no power to transfer her. She wanted nothing less them to leave the mansion, even when she still felt very uncomfortable around Yasuke. "}, "post-79801": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1518971718000", "message": "Kojuro accepted Yasuke's shoulder pats, although he wasn't sure what had awoken a sympathetic response in him, and quite without prompting he was talking about his own father \u2026 very unusual. From both Nakatani and Yasuke's reaction he got the impression that they found Ryuzo to be a little unreasonable. He was inclined to agree, but still, the man was his father. He still felt very conflicted, but he knew without a doubt, that he would not allow Ryuzo to take Nakatani away, selfish or not. He was tired, all this talking and thinking was a little too much for him at the moment, and he felt an exhausted sleep clawing at him, but still he tried to stay awake at least until this was resolved. \u201cGood,\u201d he said as Yasuke accepted his task, completely assured that Yasuke would carry it out to the best of his ability. As Yasuke mentioned Ryuzo would have no more arguments left, Kojuro looked uncomfortable but for Nakatani's sake didn't say anything. If this was what he wanted to happen, the lack of one excuse would not prevent the searching for another. Nakatani would have to be put out of his reach once and for all. When Nakatani spoke up to question Yasuke, he turned his head to her. \u201cNakatani-san?\u201d he blinked. But of course, she would be worried that the man might attempt to finish what he started. \u201cI'm sure Yasuke-san can find him. Once he turns him in you'll be able to see for yourself.\u201d ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Kojuro accepted Yasuke's shoulder pats, although he wasn't sure what had awoken a sympathetic response in him, and quite without prompting he was talking about his own father \u2026 very unusual. From both Nakatani and Yasuke's reaction he got the impression that they found Ryuzo to be a little unreasonable. He was inclined to agree, but still, the man was his father. He still felt very conflicted, but he knew without a doubt, that he would not allow Ryuzo to take Nakatani away, selfish or not. He was tired, all this talking and thinking was a little too much for him at the moment, and he felt an exhausted sleep clawing at him, but still he tried to stay awake at least until this was resolved. \u201cGood,\u201d he said as Yasuke accepted his task, completely assured that Yasuke would carry it out to the best of his ability. As Yasuke mentioned Ryuzo would have no more arguments left, Kojuro looked uncomfortable but for Nakatani's sake didn't say anything. If this was what he wanted to happen, the lack of one excuse would not prevent the searching for another. Nakatani would have to be put out of his reach once and for all. When Nakatani spoke up to question Yasuke, he turned his head to her. \u201cNakatani-san?\u201d he blinked. But of course, she would be worried that the man might attempt to finish what he started. \u201cI'm sure Yasuke-san can find him. Once he turns him in you'll be able to see for yourself.\u201d "}, "post-79804": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1518984418000", "message": "\"Hmm?\" Yasuke said surprised as he looked into a much more serious expression from Nakatani than he was used to. Was he sure, that he could find the culprit? What did she mean by that?\"Nakatani-san, you should rest easy. You are safe in the mansion for now as the guards are very aware of anyone they don't recognize.\" Yasuke said with a slightly patronizing tone trying to dismiss her concerns and turned to Kojuro. \"You know Yamazaki-san right? He would question you about your heritage after a haircut!\" he said and laughed, trying to divert the subject from Nakatani's question. To be frank he was quite disturbed that she would intrude like that... it was almost as if she wanted to test him and Yasuke knew he couldn't allow those questions to get to him. One wrong word could set a chain of events in motion that Yasuke didn't dare think about. There was too much as risk. Yasuke nodded with a smug smile. \"I can't guarantee I'll get him alive though. Those buggers tend to do everything they can to avoid getting caught.\" Yasuke said casually trying again to lighten the mood. \"Well yeah, it's always nice to put a face on the culprit I guess. It's unfortunate that you didn't get a glimpse of the guy though... you'd hardly be able make the distinction between the right and wrong guy.\" Yasuke said and scratched his chin. \"But don't worry, I'll make sure we get enough evidence to prove that it was indeed the right guy.\" Yasuke said with a wide grin intending to reassure Nakatani, though he was starting to doubt how much he could sway her with words. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Hmm?\" Yasuke said surprised as he looked into a much more serious expression from Nakatani than he was used to. Was he sure, that he could find the culprit? What did she mean by that?"}, "post-79925": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1519288035000", "message": "His answer did not reassure her in the slightest. She wasn\u2019t worried about the people being unable to get inside the mansion, she was worried about the person who was within the walls. She would let her question go for now, as she had no solid ground to stand on with the suspicions she had of Yasuke, but she also wouldn\u2019t give an answer back. She just completly dismissed it as if she question and the answer had never even existed. But when she started talking again, the things he was saying seemed odd to her. \u201cI guess they would do anything to not get caugt\u2026\u201d she said, her mind slowly wandering. Was he admitting to his own efforts to stay out of view from everyone? Even if he was, she might be the only one who had a suspicion for that statement. Was he talking courage to himself by saying she wouldn\u2019t recognize the culprit even if he was standing right in front of her? Was he standing right in front of her now? The more he spoke, the more desperatly she wanted to call him out. To tell Kojuro that she suspected him and that he should be questioned immidiatly. But this same man had saved Kojuro\u2019s life\u2026 If she was wrong she wouldn\u2019t be able to live with herself. So she stayed quiet, her face back to the floor and her smile lost from her face. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "His answer did not reassure her in the slightest. She wasn\u2019t worried about the people being unable to get inside the mansion, she was worried about the person who was within the walls. She would let her question go for now, as she had no solid ground to stand on with the suspicions she had of Yasuke, but she also wouldn\u2019t give an answer back. She just completly dismissed it as if she question and the answer had never even existed. "}, "post-80065": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1520113640000", "message": "Although he was not convinced that it would put an end to Ryuzo\u2019s plans, Yasuke\u2019s assurances that he would find the masked ronin put Kojuro\u2019s mind somewhat at ease. As the next few days passed, Kojuro still spent a lot of time asleep as he continued to heal, disturbed as that sleep often was by half remembered dreams and pain from his wound. But although it seemed to him that time passed slowly, he was still healing much faster than one could normally expect, thanks to his sister\u2019s magic, and Nakatani\u2019s care. Whenever he woke up, either she was there or she would enter the room shortly after, brightening what otherwise would be quite unpleasant days. As he began to recover, he began to process more of what had happened. While he still resented Ryuzo\u2019s attempt to underhandedly snatch Nakatani away, he also recognised that his father was right in many ways, but it was also a conclusion he was coming to himself, with or without his father\u2019s influence. His life was not his own, and he needed to stop treating it as such. It belonged as much to the Hizashi clan as it did to him, and throwing it away needlessly was not only stupid and reckless \u2013 words he had heard applied to himself so many times they ceased to mean anything, but a dereliction of his duty too. He started to receive reports of what was happening outside. As soon as he was able to he had dictated a letter to Homura, asking him to ignore Ryuzo\u2019s request, among other things. Now, it was time to start thinking about the future of the clan, and he needed to talk to Sayuri. He had sent a request for her to come, and waited, propped upright in bed as he sat next to the open doors to the garden that his room looked out into, letting the summer breeze into the chamber.  ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Although he was not convinced that it would put an end to Ryuzo\u2019s plans, Yasuke\u2019s assurances that he would find the masked ronin put Kojuro\u2019s mind somewhat at ease. As the next few days passed, Kojuro still spent a lot of time asleep as he continued to heal, disturbed as that sleep often was by half remembered dreams and pain from his wound. But although it seemed to him that time passed slowly, he was still healing much faster than one could normally expect, thanks to his sister\u2019s magic, and Nakatani\u2019s care. Whenever he woke up, either she was there or she would enter the room shortly after, brightening what otherwise would be quite unpleasant days. "}, "post-80259": {"user": "Sayuri Hirayama", "user_num": 2379, "timestamp": "1520416778000", "message": "Once the request was send, it would only take a few hours for Sayuri to respond. With Genji having fallen ill and Kojuro having been injured all the tasks of leading the clan and making vital decision had suddenly landed on her shoulders. This, along with the burden of her early pregnancy had left her exhausted and stressed. She knew a fair bit about politics, but had hoped to learn a lot more then she knew from Genji before she had ever needed to make decisions for the sake of the clan. She would enter the room in an elegant matter. She was wearing a kimono in the colours of the clan with beautiful golden details embroidered into it. Her hair fall around her like a blanket. Even after this exhausting period it was still beautifully soft and well taken care of. The only thing that pointed towards her exhaustion was small dark rings under her eyes. \"I am glad to see you are doing better, Kojuro-san.\" she said with a motherly smile. She had meant to visit him sooner, but had found her unable to find the time. Now that he had actually requested her presence it had become part of her duty, something she had to make time for. She would give a bow to him before sitting down close to him. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Once the request was send, it would only take a few hours for Sayuri to respond. With Genji having fallen ill and Kojuro having been injured all the tasks of leading the clan and making vital decision had suddenly landed on her shoulders. This, along with the burden of her early pregnancy had left her exhausted and stressed. She knew a fair bit about politics, but had hoped to learn a lot more then she knew from Genji before she had ever needed to make decisions for the sake of the clan. "}, "post-80407": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1520852552000", "message": "Sayuri, entering the room, looked almost more beautiful and elegant than ever. Dressed in the clan's colours, she was making a statement about her status and purpose that Kojuro hadn't failed to notice. Kojuro himself was dressed in a white sleeping yukata with a mid green summer haori draped over his shoulders, small white dragonflies dancing about the hem as the green deeped from pale to dark. Outside, the real insects hovered and darted too and fro in the garden. \u201cThank you,\u201d he replied, with a small but genuine smile. After it faded, a serious look returned to Kojuro's face. \u201cSayuri-dono, I owe you an apology. It seems for all my intent back in the war room, I did not prove to be reliable after all.\u201d It bothered Kojuro that he had pledged his services so and completely failed to deliver what he had promised. \u201cI let the entire burden fall on you. It won't happen again,\u201d he assured her. \u201cHow fares my lord uncle?\u201d he asked with great concern. Genji had been, while not well, at least taking a more active role and seemingly recovering, when Kojuro had gone to rescue Nakatani, but from what she had said, Genji had again lapsed into serious illness, causing more concern for everyone. \u201cI would also like to ask you to tell me what has been happening in clan affairs while I've been out of action. Has my father given you any difficulty?\u201d ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Sayuri, entering the room, looked almost more beautiful and elegant than ever. Dressed in the clan's colours, she was making a statement about her status and purpose that Kojuro hadn't failed to notice. Kojuro himself was dressed in a white sleeping yukata with a mid green summer haori draped over his shoulders, small white dragonflies dancing about the hem as the green deeped from pale to dark. Outside, the real insects hovered and darted too and fro in the garden. \u201cThank you,\u201d he replied, with a small but genuine smile. After it faded, a serious look returned to Kojuro's face. \u201cSayuri-dono, I owe you an apology. It seems for all my intent back in the war room, I did not prove to be reliable after all.\u201d It bothered Kojuro that he had pledged his services so and completely failed to deliver what he had promised. \u201cI let the entire burden fall on you. It won't happen again,\u201d he assured her. "}, "post-80411": {"user": "Sayuri Hirayama", "user_num": 2379, "timestamp": "1520853279000", "message": "Sayuri stayed quiet for a little bit, considering what he had said. She watched the flowers in the garden dance in the breeze and spotted the bird that was singing a beautiful melody in the background. \"Your apology is more than accepted, Kojuro-san. Love makes us do strange things,\" she said, giving him a knowing smile. She had known about their little secret since the first time she had seen them look at each other. But she had also accepted that it was none of her business to mettle in their affairs. Keeping their secrets was no big trouble for her. \"I would certainly appreciate your help in the future, however.\" she said and bowed to him in respect. \"I am afraid your uncle is not doing very well. His illness had a relapse and he is once again unconscious. They are trying to keep him strong and healthy with sugared water and honey, but nobody knows what the future might hold for him.\" her hand unconsciously slipped to her stomach as she talked about Genji. \"I can assure you that the best doctors are watching over him, including your younger sister.\"\"Clan affairs have been calm, luckily. I have managed to explain your uncle's absence to anyone who was unaware of his illness. I didn't think it wise for word to spread. Someone might feel like it would be the best opportunity for power. I have mostly been busy making sure our borders are preserved, that our farmers are having good stocks and that the people are happy. Your father seemed to have been fine staying in the background for now, though I suspect he might pay me a visit soon.\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Sayuri stayed quiet for a little bit, considering what he had said. She watched the flowers in the garden dance in the breeze and spotted the bird that was singing a beautiful melody in the background. \"Your apology is more than accepted, Kojuro-san. Love makes us do strange things,\" she said, giving him a knowing smile. She had known about their little secret since the first time she had seen them look at each other. But she had also accepted that it was none of her business to mettle in their affairs. Keeping their secrets was no big trouble for her. \"I would certainly appreciate your help in the future, however.\" she said and bowed to him in respect. "}, "post-80421": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1520858672000", "message": "\u201cHmm, I suppose so,\u201d he replied, straight faced, although he couldn't help a slight blush creeping onto his cheeks. He returned her bow with a small nod of the head. It was, of course, worrying to hear about Genji's condition, although the news not unexpected. \u201cAlthough I do not know exactly how he intended to go about it, I intend to complete Lord Genji's plans for the Hizashi and have his banner flying above the Shogun's Palace by the time winter comes, whatever the future holds.\u201d Although he didn't say the words, it was obvious to them both that Kojuro's intention was to complete Genji's plans while Genji still lived, that he could see the result of his own work. The quiet confidence of his words was a far cry from his nervousness in the war room when he had conservatively set their troops into a holding pattern and begged his elders for their advice. Something had changed, and part of it was that Kojuro finally realised that the future of the Hizashi was in his own hands.  Kojuro wasn't oblivious to the gesture that Sayuri made, although she herself did not seem to notice it. He felt a spark leap inside him. Better not to jump to a conclusion, but if what he suspected was true, there was no way he couldn't mention it. \u201cSayuri-dono, is there something else that the future holds?\u201d he asked her with a glint in his eye. \u201cIs there some other news about the clan that I should know?\u201d ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cHmm, I suppose so,\u201d he replied, straight faced, although he couldn't help a slight blush creeping onto his cheeks. He returned her bow with a small nod of the head. It was, of course, worrying to hear about Genji's condition, although the news not unexpected. \u201cAlthough I do not know exactly how he intended to go about it, I intend to complete Lord Genji's plans for the Hizashi and have his banner flying above the Shogun's Palace by the time winter comes, whatever the future holds.\u201d Although he didn't say the words, it was obvious to them both that Kojuro's intention was to complete Genji's plans while Genji still lived, that he could see the result of his own work. The quiet confidence of his words was a far cry from his nervousness in the war room when he had conservatively set their troops into a holding pattern and begged his elders for their advice. Something had changed, and part of it was that Kojuro finally realised that the future of the Hizashi was in his own hands.  "}, "post-80422": {"user": "Sayuri Hirayama", "user_num": 2379, "timestamp": "1520859752000", "message": "A smile would appear on her face as Kojuro suddenly talked filled of confidence. He suddenly looked much older then he had done the last few months she had gotten to know him. Maybe a new battle scar had been the thing needed for him to get his bed together. After all, there is a lot of things you can think about when you are bound to bed. \"You will have to tell me all about your plans, Kojuro-san. I will aid you in any way I can. I too wish to see Lord Genji's plan come true.\" When Kojuro asked her about any other things the future might hold, she suddenly became very aware of the hand she had put upon her belly. It was her time to blush, something that made her look much younger then she was, even if she wasn't even that old. \"Lord Genji's and mine marriage seems to have been blessed on our wedding night. I found out his child is growing inside of me as we speak.\" she paused a bit, trying to get the blush to disappear from her cheeks and getting her normal formal posture back in order. \"It has left me with morning sickness and fatigue. The pregnancy might be in my way to aid you fully during this trying time, but I promise I will do whatever is within my ability to help you where I can.\" she placed the hand back upon her belly. \"I want this child to grow up in a world that his father would have wished for him.\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "A smile would appear on her face as Kojuro suddenly talked filled of confidence. He suddenly looked much older then he had done the last few months she had gotten to know him. Maybe a new battle scar had been the thing needed for him to get his bed together. After all, there is a lot of things you can think about when you are bound to bed. \"You will have to tell me all about your plans, Kojuro-san. I will aid you in any way I can. I too wish to see Lord Genji's plan come true.\" "}, "post-80431": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1520866908000", "message": "He broke into a grin. \u201cI offer you my congratulations, if it is not too soon to do so, Sayuri-dono.\u201d His happiness at the news was plain to see and he did not try to conceal it. He hoped that Sayuri had been able to tell Genji and that he had been in a state to hear and receive her words. \u201cThis is the best possible news the clan could have right now, and it makes the task of completing Genji's plans all the more urgent, so that his child can succeed him. How many people know about this?\u201d Although Kojuro had been prepared to take responsibility for the future of the clan, the fact that a child of Genji's would some day be the heir in his place did make him feel happier for the long term future of the Hizashi. \u201cPlease don't trouble yourself too much. It is more important for you to be safe and well.\u201d Kojuro looked down thoughtfully for a moment, partly still not wanting to say what he was about to, even though this was one of the very reasons he had asked Sayuri to come, and now was as good a time to say it.  \u201cActually, this could be of help to you too, perhaps...\u201d he began. \u201cI wanted to ask your permission, on behalf of Lord Genji and yourself, if I could. I know it is exceptionally impertinent to ask this favour of you but, I would like your permission to take Nakatani as my official consort.\u201d He bowed as much as he was able and lowered his eyes, as his heart leapt in his chest. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "He broke into a grin. \u201cI offer you my congratulations, if it is not too soon to do so, Sayuri-dono.\u201d His happiness at the news was plain to see and he did not try to conceal it. He hoped that Sayuri had been able to tell Genji and that he had been in a state to hear and receive her words. \u201cThis is the best possible news the clan could have right now, and it makes the task of completing Genji's plans all the more urgent, so that his child can succeed him. How many people know about this?\u201d Although Kojuro had been prepared to take responsibility for the future of the clan, the fact that a child of Genji's would some day be the heir in his place did make him feel happier for the long term future of the Hizashi. \u201cPlease don't trouble yourself too much. It is more important for you to be safe and well.\u201d "}, "post-80433": {"user": "Sayuri Hirayama", "user_num": 2379, "timestamp": "1520871376000", "message": "\"You are free to congratulate me, Kojuro-san, thank you. The two of us are the only people to know about it and I would appreciate it if this would be kept a secret for a small while longer. Some people might not believe that our first night together would have proven fruitful. I do not wish to cause any more problems for the Hizashi clan then we already have to deal with. I kept your little secret, now you keep mine.\" she said with a smile and hint o a wink at the end of her sentence. Her smile would disappear however when his next question was answered. She would look at him for a small while he bowed down for her, something she knew must be painful for him due to his wounds. \"You are aware that you are expected to marry someone the Hizashi clan sees fit when the time comes? You know that when that time comes you are expected to be a husband to this lady? Have you made Nakatani-san fully aware of what it would mean to be your consort?\" she asked, a bit of a stern tone in her voice, though it wasn't out of displeasure to the question. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"You are free to congratulate me, Kojuro-san, thank you. The two of us are the only people to know about it and I would appreciate it if this would be kept a secret for a small while longer. Some people might not believe that our first night together would have proven fruitful. I do not wish to cause any more problems for the Hizashi clan then we already have to deal with. I kept your little secret, now you keep mine.\" she said with a smile and hint o a wink at the end of her sentence. "}, "post-80438": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1520876860000", "message": "\u201cOf course,\u201d he said, seriously. It felt like a privelege to be let into a private confidence like that, and he had no reason to tell anyone about it. \u201cAnd I would prefer to keep Lord Genji's illness a secret too, until the time is right...\u201d he added. On hearing Sayuri's questions, Kojuro exhaled slowly, before he answered, in what seemed a considered way. \u201cYes, I am aware of that, and I have been for all my life. However, so far no suitable candidates have presented themselves, either to my father, to Lord Genji, or to me. Possibly the Omaharu daughter but \u2026 I shall need to talk to you of that later. Of course, I am willing to marry whoever the clan sees fit. Nakatani is aware of that too, she is not na\u00efve, nor have I attempted to deceive her into thinking otherwise.\u201d Not that he suspected that Sayuri thought so, but his father certainly had. \u201cThis particular secret has run its course. People are aware or begin to suspect of the nature of our relationship. To be my consort rather than a servant of the house provides Nakatani more protection, as well as halting any rumours that this is somehow improper. It renders the information that her abductor took as useless to any of our enemies. If I am to be acting as lord of the clan, I will need someone to look after the household, and Nakatani is ably suited to that position. Many of her duties would be similar to those she has now. She could also be of great assistance to you, Sayuri-dono, as a companion and lady in waiting throughout your pregnancy. I haven't yet actually asked her how she would feel about being my consort \u2013 it seemed wise not to raise the possibility unless I already had your permission. As it stands, she is your servant after all, and I will abide by whatever decision you see fit to make.\u201d ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cOf course,\u201d he said, seriously. It felt like a privelege to be let into a private confidence like that, and he had no reason to tell anyone about it. \u201cAnd I would prefer to keep Lord Genji's illness a secret too, until the time is right...\u201d he added. "}, "post-80439": {"user": "Sayuri Hirayama", "user_num": 2379, "timestamp": "1520877702000", "message": "Once her questions were answered she returned to her normal sweet smile. She hadn't asked them because she didn't approve of the request he had asked of her, simply because she wasn't to make sure both of them had thought things through. \"It seems you had plenty of time to think while being forced to lay down in bed Kojuro-san. I will give you my blessing and release her from Lord Genji's services, but only if Nakatani indeed agrees to become my companion and aid me in my tasks throughout my pregnancy. In return, I will try my best to teach her about the proper way to interact with nobility. I am sure she has a good grasp of this already, but interacting with nobility as a servant is very different then interacting with them as someone from an equal stature, which she would become if she agrees to your proposition.\" she placed a hand on Kojuro's knee. \"I care a lot about the girl her safety as well and her kidnapping only taught us more about how to perform our duties and protect the once within the Hizashi mansion even better. Don't beat yourself up over what happened in the past, but focus on the future.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Once her questions were answered she returned to her normal sweet smile. She hadn't asked them because she didn't approve of the request he had asked of her, simply because she wasn't to make sure both of them had thought things through. "}, "post-80440": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1520879747000", "message": "\u201cYes, it seems so,\u201d he said and gave a small chuckle, \u201cI will try to remember to do it when I'm not forced to lie in bed as well. That will be the real challenge. Thank you, Sayuri-dono,\u201d he bowed once again, \u201cI am deeply indebted to you, and I am sure Nakatani would take well to your instruction. I will be sure to talk to her about it soon.\u201d A legitimacy to their relationship, and a chance to build something stronger than snatched moments and furtive outings. Perhaps it would be looked down upon by others of the nobility but it wasn't as though it was completely unprecedented. It was the best protection he could give her, not just from those forces outside the clan, but within it too. Ryuzo wouldn't be abandoning his plans just because his first play had been thwarted. But that was a thought for another day. He smiled at Sayuri as she put her hand on his knee. Motherhood would suit her he was sure. She already took a somewhat motherly role with him despite being only a few years older. Something he didn't mind at all. It was good to have a more feminine presence around the mansion since for many years, besides Anzen, all the senior clan members had been male. \u201cYes, and as to that future...\u201d It was time to return talk to the plans for the Hizashi clan. \u201cI've had word from our eyes and ears in Tokhung. It seems the Omaharu clan has fallen, and a new clan has conquered Mustunobe. According to Yamazaki's heraldry records, it looks to be the Yukimoto, a rather minor presence in the past. It means that, if Omaharu did send the bandits to Kiyonai, then we need no longer be concerned about it. However, we know little about this new clans intentions. This is why we need to progress our advance on Xuandao as quickly as possible. We can't have an enemy on both fronts. While the Yukimoto establish their foothold in Tokhung we need to act against Ogino. It will take them a while to secure the province before they can move against Kiyonai. There's no word from Kaen yet, perhaps he will be able to find out more. \u201cHomura-dono and I have been in touch about strategies that will speed up this conflict. We need to begin preparing, and as soon as I've healed enough we'll begin the advance on the capital. For the time being, I want it to appear to everyone that I am not recovering as quickly or as well as I am. Discounting Anzen's abilities, a wound like this could well prove fatal or if not, take months to heal. That is what I want those outside of the mansion to believe is happening in this room. While we seem paralysed by inactivity, with no head to the clan we will be planning our move and acting on it.\u201d ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cYes, it seems so,\u201d he said and gave a small chuckle, \u201cI will try to remember to do it when I'm not forced to lie in bed as well. That will be the real challenge. Thank you, Sayuri-dono,\u201d he bowed once again, \u201cI am deeply indebted to you, and I am sure Nakatani would take well to your instruction. I will be sure to talk to her about it soon.\u201d A legitimacy to their relationship, and a chance to build something stronger than snatched moments and furtive outings. Perhaps it would be looked down upon by others of the nobility but it wasn't as though it was completely unprecedented. It was the best protection he could give her, not just from those forces outside the clan, but within it too. Ryuzo wouldn't be abandoning his plans just because his first play had been thwarted. But that was a thought for another day. "}, "post-80441": {"user": "Sayuri Hirayama", "user_num": 2379, "timestamp": "1520880532000", "message": "\"You are very welcome, Kojuro-san.\" she bowed back to him, though not as deeply. \"The Yukimoto, apparently not such a minor presence anymore if they were able to bring down a clan like Omaharu. Do you know if there are survivors? Have any samurai sought sanctuary in Kiyonai since then? Because if they are the Yukimoto might seem more obligued to focus their powers on us earlier. In their eyes we would be harboring the enemy.\" In the meanwhile a young and shy servant knocked on the door. Sayuri would motion her that she could come in. She was holding a tray with a teaset on it, pouring them both a cup before leaving again. Sayuri didn't mind the drink while they talked about serious matters. \"It shouldn't be that difficult to find a way to make your recovery seem slower then it has proven to be. Word about your injuries had already spread far and wide in the area. Many guards and even some townfolk saw you that day. There has even been talk about your passing away, something I have been able to stop, but nobody has been told about the seriousness of your injuries. It would however not be the best plan for you to leave the mansion and risk being seen. You will need to stay outside view of even most of the guards. They might be loyal, but a man easily talks when in his drinks.\" She sipped her tea. \"How is the communication with Homura-dono? Are you making sure intercepted messages would not give any clues to an outsider? The borders between Kiyonai and Jeoncho have been known to be dangerous. People believe the Hizashi clan is taking their borders and claiming their lands. I have already had two samurai return injured because of attacks around the borders.\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"You are very welcome, Kojuro-san.\" she bowed back to him, though not as deeply. "}, "post-80576": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1521237920000", "message": "He listened to Sayuri\u2019s concerns. \u201cThat\u2019s true. No information has reached Kiyonai yet through any of the official channels. The villagers have ways of getting news out much quicker than anyone else. But that doesn\u2019t mean we won\u2019t see refugees attempting to cross, if the Yukimoto haven\u2019t yet taken Gangshu fortress. We should place someone reliable there, and detain anyone attempting to cross to Kiyonai at Reisui prison - for their own safety as much as our security. We still don\u2019t know if the Omaharu were behind those bandit attacks, there\u2019s no reason we should accept any of their samurai who flee. But we shouldn\u2019t be too hasty about sending them back either, not until we've had a chance to gain more information about the Yukimoto.\u201d The crossing between Tokhung and Kiyonai was a bottleneck \u2013 the mountains were almost entirely impassable - and heavily guarded as all Kiyonai\u2019s borders were. Nevertheless, it was an additional problem he hadn't considered. He thanked the servant but said nothing further until she had left the room. The tea was welcome, a chance to pause from business, and he held the cup and breathed in the fragrant steam before taking a sip. \u201cI agree. It\u2019s best I keep to the family\u2019s private quarters for a reasonable time. If I need to leave, I will do so in disguise, but even then \u2013 that won\u2019t be for a while yet,\" he may have been recovering more quickly than could be expected but he wouldn't be getting up and running around for a while. \"I haven't seen many visitors, I asked the guards not to let anyone in without permission.\" That would work in his favour for this plan, but the reason for it needed to be addressed too. \"About Ryuzo-dono. I'd rather he was kept unaware of all of this.\" Looking with concern towards Sauyri he added, \"Please remember my father has no authority here, you do not owe him any answers, no matter how much he insists. He may try to gather supporters to himself. I'm not sure what he wants but be wary of him.\" He felt the need to warn her only because he had already seen Ryuzo's attempts to machinate behind his back, and because he was half-certain that his aim was to usurp control of the clan from Genji.Kojuro wasn't sure what to make of the rumours that he was dead. In a way, it was as much amusing as it was disturbing. \"We can use all those rumours to our advantage. You needn\u2019t worry there, Homura-dono is always the picture of discretion. Even I can be subtle when its called for,\u201d he smiled to her.  On her next point, what the people believed wasn\u2019t exactly wrong; the Hizashi clan were taking their land. As long as it was confined to a bit of scuffling between local Shogunate-loyal samurai near the border, and Hizashi clan men then that wasn\u2019t anything to worry about. \u201cLet them, it will irritate the Shogunate, and in their annoyance, they\u2019ll be more likely to drawn to where we want them.\u201d It was good to talk to Sayuri, and her updates on clan business had been useful in rebuilding the bigger picture in his mind. It gave him a lot more to think about. He was finding himself getting tired at the long discussion, it happened all too easily as his body still needed most of its energy for healing. \u201cThank you for this. Is there any other clan business we need to discuss?\u201d he asked, hoping there would be nothing else that needed urgent attention, but ready to hear it if there was.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "He listened to Sayuri\u2019s concerns. \u201cThat\u2019s true. No information has reached Kiyonai yet through any of the official channels. The villagers have ways of getting news out much quicker than anyone else. But that doesn\u2019t mean we won\u2019t see refugees attempting to cross, if the Yukimoto haven\u2019t yet taken Gangshu fortress. We should place someone reliable there, and detain anyone attempting to cross to Kiyonai at Reisui prison - for their own safety as much as our security. We still don\u2019t know if the Omaharu were behind those bandit attacks, there\u2019s no reason we should accept any of their samurai who flee. But we shouldn\u2019t be too hasty about sending them back either, not until we've had a chance to gain more information about the Yukimoto.\u201d The crossing between Tokhung and Kiyonai was a bottleneck \u2013 the mountains were almost entirely impassable - and heavily guarded as all Kiyonai\u2019s borders were. Nevertheless, it was an additional problem he hadn't considered. He thanked the servant but said nothing further until she had left the room. The tea was welcome, a chance to pause from business, and he held the cup and breathed in the fragrant steam before taking a sip. "}, "post-80674": {"user": "Sayuri Hirayama", "user_num": 2379, "timestamp": "1521486115000", "message": "\"Yes, it would be wise to place someone in Gangshu fortress. Nobody directly springs to my mind but I take it you would have someone in mind? If so we need to set this in motion quickly before the Yukimoto might move before us.\" \"Just make sure that healing your own wounds comes first, Kojuro-san. Let me take the lead for just a small bit longer, I will discuss anything of importance with you directly. But it is important to rest up.\" she said with a concern on her face. At his request to keep silence towards his father Sayuri couldn't help but be slightly surprised. \"If that is your wish Kojuro-san, but know that he will probably search audience with me. I can't stay silent about everything, but I will try to keep the conversation general and interesting enough for him to not question my genuineness.\" She smiled. \"I serve Lord Genji, not his brother. You shouldn't worry about me Kojuro-san. I know where my loyalties lie.\" When their conversation started to draw to a close, Sayuri would get up on her feet. Even this early in her pregnancy she had been having aches in her lower back. Sitting for long times had become uncomfortable for her. \"I believe that was all you needed to know, but I will make sure to inform you if anything comes to mind. Get some rest Kojuro-san. We will talk soon.\" she would bow to him with respect before making her way towards the door.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Yes, it would be wise to place someone in Gangshu fortress. Nobody directly springs to my mind but I take it you would have someone in mind? If so we need to set this in motion quickly before the Yukimoto might move before us.\" "}, "post-80677": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1521491137000", "message": "\u201cYes, I will,\u201d he smiled back, \u201cIt's good to know you have everything in hand.\u201d He would take the time to rest, there was no point pushing himself and risk worsening his condition right now, but he would not be sitting idly by either. There were many things he could do even from his own room. He was glad to hear Sayuri's words \u2013 they spoke of her strength and resolve as well as loyalty. Genji had chosen his wife well. He had a sudden moment of realising that he had entrusted Ryuzo with looking for potential brides for himself. At least they would only be suggestions.\u201cThank you, for everything,\u201d he replied to Sayuri as she was about to leave, \u201cyou make sure to take care of yourself too, Sayuri-dono. If you do need anything, don't worry about disturbing me.\u201d He bowed in return, as much as he could and then leaned back on the folded futon he had as a back rest. He smiled softly to himself as he closed his eyes. Soon, he and Nakatani would be together, maybe not as husband and wife but as close to that as possible, assuming she would agree of course... ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cYes, I will,\u201d he smiled back, \u201cIt's good to know you have everything in hand.\u201d He would take the time to rest, there was no point pushing himself and risk worsening his condition right now, but he would not be sitting idly by either. There were many things he could do even from his own room. He was glad to hear Sayuri's words \u2013 they spoke of her strength and resolve as well as loyalty. Genji had chosen his wife well. He had a sudden moment of realising that he had entrusted Ryuzo with looking for potential brides for himself. At least they would only be suggestions.\u201cThank you, for everything,\u201d he replied to Sayuri as she was about to leave, \u201cyou make sure to take care of yourself too, Sayuri-dono. If you do need anything, don't worry about disturbing me.\u201d He bowed in return, as much as he could and then leaned back on the folded futon he had as a back rest. He smiled softly to himself as he closed his eyes. Soon, he and Nakatani would be together, maybe not as husband and wife but as close to that as possible, assuming she would agree of course... "}, "post-80700": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1521543177000", "message": "Nakatani would spend the rest of her day doing her duties. She wore a smile on her face, glad to know that Kojuro was recovering and doing well. She enjoyed their daily moments together, the times they sat down to drink tea, the times she was able tob ring him food, she even made sure to always bring him some of his favorite sweets when she brought his afternoon tea. They were the same sweets they had eaten together the first time they went into Kiyonai together. It was a nice break from everything. Even if she wasn\u2019t ready to forget her ordeal with Yasuke, it had been long enough now that she didn\u2019t feel in imidiate danger anymore. She still didn\u2019t leave the mansion and had abondened her daily visits to the shrine, but within the mansion she felt safe. She was always around people, so even if Yasuke tried to harm her, there would always be somewhere there to see. Even Ryuzo didn\u2019t worry her that much, as Kojuro had promised to take care of him. And this time as well, she would walk towards Kojuro\u2019s room with a tray with a teapot, two cups and a small plate of sweets. She would bow to the guard at the door and would be led through without any hesitation. \u201cKojuro-san. I brought tea.\u201d ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Nakatani would spend the rest of her day doing her duties. She wore a smile on her face, glad to know that Kojuro was recovering and doing well. She enjoyed their daily moments together, the times they sat down to drink tea, the times she was able tob ring him food, she even made sure to always bring him some of his favorite sweets when she brought his afternoon tea. They were the same sweets they had eaten together the first time they went into Kiyonai together. It was a nice break from everything. "}, "post-80976": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1522183157000", "message": "When Nakatani entered the room, Kojuro was found with a inked brush in his hand, paper resting on his lap. He seemed to be quite intently in the middle of writing something. More sheets of paper lay next to him, already marked with strong black brush strokes. All  of them appeared to say the same thing:He looked up as Nakatani came in, giving her a smile as he put down the brush. He was excited to tell her his news, and wanted to mention it to her as soon as possible, yet at the same time, he was a little nervous to consider what her reaction would be. For now he would simply enjoy her company, the words that he had written reminded him that he would need to talk to her about that thing before she left. \u201cNakatani-san, its good to see you,\u201d he greeted her, and noticed as she brought in the tea that the bruises had finally faded from her wrists. Even though he still had very little appetite he appreciated that Nakatani would bring him things to eat that she knew he usually enjoyed, and he made an effort to eat what he could, even if he didn't feel much like it, in order to get his strength back. The sweets she had brought with the tea were just like those they had eaten together when they first got to know each other, in that tiny tea shop in Kiyonai. It seemed so long ago, yet in reality only a few scant months had passed. He remembered her sadness, and the way she had talked of love, and how he hadn't understood it, not really. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": ["https://farm1.staticflickr.com/891/41056532331_9a7ba8e0ae.jpg"], "html": "When Nakatani entered the room, Kojuro was found with a inked brush in his hand, paper resting on his lap. He seemed to be quite intently in the middle of writing something. More sheets of paper lay next to him, already marked with strong black brush strokes. All  of them appeared to say the same thing:"}, "post-81002": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1522247174000", "message": "A smile was immidiatly on her face when he greeted her. She felt like peeking over his shoulders at the papers that he was making her kanji on, but decided against it. She shouldn't be that curious. She had always learned it was not a good trait to have. So instead she placed the tray down on the table close to them and started to pour the tea in the small cups she had brought along. The tea smelled of jasmine along with the refreshing smell of lemon. It was an odd combination, but she had been experimenting with her tea flavors in her free time and found it oddly refreshing. She wondered if Kojuro might think the same. \"It is very good to see you too, Kojuro-san.\" So she handed him his cup and would make herself comfortable close to him. The sun would be shining lightly into the room, warming her skin. Her bruises had healed and even the yellow marks had left her skin. She had started to feel like herself again and most of her fear had started to fade away. Her confidence was surely back at the right spot. And the same seemed for Kojuro. Every single day she saw him becoming stronger and more alert. \"You seem to be doing well!\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "A smile was immidiatly on her face when he greeted her. She felt like peeking over his shoulders at the papers that he was making her kanji on, but decided against it. She shouldn't be that curious. She had always learned it was not a good trait to have. So instead she placed the tray down on the table close to them and started to pour the tea in the small cups she had brought along. The tea smelled of jasmine along with the refreshing smell of lemon. It was an odd combination, but she had been experimenting with her tea flavors in her free time and found it oddly refreshing. She wondered if Kojuro might think the same. \"It is very good to see you too, Kojuro-san.\" "}, "post-81090": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1522528838000", "message": "He took the cup of tea from Nakatani, and their hands touched casually as she passed it to him. He breathed the scented steam and its notes of jasmine and lemon. \"Is this one of your own recipes, Naka-chan?\" he asked before tasting it. If she was feeling creative again perhaps the trauma of her ordeal was lessening somewhat, he hoped. She looked happy, certainly. \"Yes,\" he replied, \"I'm feeling a lot better. It must be the tea you bring every day.\" The papers were scattered somewhat and if she was to sit close by they may have obstructed her. \"You can move those if they're in the way,\" he said, obviously not in the least concerned that they were private at all. \"Calligraphy is supposed to be the closest art to swordsmanship, so while I can't do the one I've been practising the other.\" He showed her the paper that was the last he had been working on. \"I've been looking at that scroll every day,\" he looked up towards the alcove where the scroll in question hung. \"Anzen-onee-san painted it for me. It says 'Kouun Ryusui', to go like clouds and flow as water. I always liked the phrase. But,\" he paused, with a small frown that quickly came and went as he smiled to Nakatani again, \"I can't be the floating cloud right now, I need rather to be the torrent that sweeps aside all obstacles in its path. Of course, I'm not anywhere close to being as good as Onee-san in skill, but this phrase 'Yuuou Maishin' to boldly go forward without fear.\" He glanced from the paper in front of him to Nakatani, wondering what she made of it. \"Which of these do you think is best?\"  All the variations were written in a bold, square style, quite unlike Anzen's more feminine cursive script, perhaps matching somewhat the meaning of the text. If Nakatani looked like she thought they were all terrible then maybe he would rethink putting his work on the wall in place of Anzen's. He took another sip of the tea, enjoying its unusual but refreshing taste. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "He took the cup of tea from Nakatani, and their hands touched casually as she passed it to him. He breathed the scented steam and its notes of jasmine and lemon. \"Is this one of your own recipes, Naka-chan?\" he asked before tasting it. If she was feeling creative again perhaps the trauma of her ordeal was lessening somewhat, he hoped. She looked happy, certainly. \"Yes,\" he replied, \"I'm feeling a lot better. It must be the tea you bring every day.\" The papers were scattered somewhat and if she was to sit close by they may have obstructed her. \"You can move those if they're in the way,\" he said, obviously not in the least concerned that they were private at all. "}, "post-81299": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1522921107000", "message": "She nodded proudly when he asked her if it was her own recipe, hoping he would like it. She would then gather up most of the papers that were around them and arrange them in a perfect stack on the table. When he talked about it she couldn't help but smile. It was nice to see that Kojuro had found something to occupy his time again, as well as that he was feeling well enough to do more than just lay in bed and rest. She would take a close look at the calligraphy he had painted and to the one that was hanging on the wall from Anzen-sama. It was clear to see which one was made by a male and which was by a female. \"I think your style of calligraphy fits perfect for a phrase like 'Yuuou Maishin', Kojuro-san. It shows ambition, it shows that you aren't afraid to put your stamp on the world. It shows that you aren't afraid to change your way.\" She would then look up at his, place her finger gently under his chin and lift it up to look straight into her eyes. \"But don't change completely, Kojuro-san. Be a floating cloud whenever you can. Flow like the water when it feels right. Stay yourself when you are with you. You can be bold when you are required to be the leader. But I want the real you.\" she said softly to him, a slight blush on her face. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She nodded proudly when he asked her if it was her own recipe, hoping he would like it. She would then gather up most of the papers that were around them and arrange them in a perfect stack on the table. "}, "post-81450": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1523306551000", "message": "\u201cIt\u2019s good,\u201d he replied at her nod. He had never thought it was possible to be so creative with something as simple as tea. He had tried more different types of tea since Nakatani had arrived at the mansion than in his entire life before then. It exemplified something special about her, though he was not sure how to express it - an appreciation that even the most humble thing did not need to be taken for granted. He broke one of the manju in half and offered a half to Nakatani. If she ate the half he offered, he would eat his. He waited as she she scrutinised the calligraphy, pleased that she was actually taking the time to look properly at both his and Anzen\u2019s work and form an opinion before answering. He looked with her, trying to see the work from her perspective, and he nodded quite thoughtfully. His eyes widened a little at her unexpected touch, as she turned his head toward hers. A smile grew on his face at her words. \u201cOf course,\u201d he said, \u201cI\u2019m still me after all. And if I ever start to become something I shouldn\u2019t be, I know you\u2019ll call me back.\u201d He brought his hand to her cheek and drew her into a kiss. Before long, he released her lips and leaned back. \u201cNaka-chan,\u201d he had a pensive look about him again, \u201cI need to ask you something. I want you to give your honest answer even if its not what I want to hear.\u201d He looked over at her through the hair that fell in front of his eyes, partly concealing the look in them that searched her face. There were so many ways he could phrase the question, or talk to her of what could and couldn\u2019t be between them, or ask her obliquely about how happy she was with her current status, but after all, he went for something quite straight forward. \u201cI would like very much if you would become my official consort. How would you feel about that?\u201d ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cIt\u2019s good,\u201d he replied at her nod. He had never thought it was possible to be so creative with something as simple as tea. He had tried more different types of tea since Nakatani had arrived at the mansion than in his entire life before then. It exemplified something special about her, though he was not sure how to express it - an appreciation that even the most humble thing did not need to be taken for granted. He broke one of the manju in half and offered a half to Nakatani. If she ate the half he offered, he would eat his. "}, "post-81516": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1523443776000", "message": "She accepted his kiss without any hesitation, satisfied with her reply to her. She didn't want him to change. Even if he had to play the part of the lord of this part of the worlds, she wanted him for who he was, not for the titles and wealth he might carry. He would always be just Kojuro to her and even if he was a simply farmers son she would have loved him for that part of him. And in a way he had reassured her that maybe love was above honor after all for him. Now that things had calmed down, she had been able to hear the whole story about her rescue from the perspective of other people. Guards liked to talk while she was cleaning their room, almost as if it was the only female attention they hoped the get. She had learned the way he had not hesitated to search for her despite the danger. He had not thought of his role as a lord, he had thought the part of a lover. So even though it had taken her a long while to figure that part out, it told her one thing. The answer he gave her on their first trip to Kiyonai together had been at least half false. She knew that at some points honor would have to go before her and in a way she had learned to accept that. She knows knew that Isao had no choice when he left her the way he did, but she also felt reassurance in knowing that at other points love would have the upper hand. Even then his proposition surprised her. She had never thought that it would have been possibly for him to ask her such a question. To want to let the world know about them. Even if he had to take a wife now, she would always be by his side and it would be accepted too. Her mind flashed to the things she had learned during her time in Geisha training. She had learned about the word consort in a special way. It was one of the final goals along the path they had needed to take. Being a consort meant independence from your house, more money then you could have wished for and above all you would be ranked as one of the most succesfull geisha of your time. Being the consort of a lord would have made her valuable above all else. But as fast as those thoughts entered her head, as fast they left it again. She wasn't a Geisha anymore, she had nothing to prove. This wasn't about status, this wasn't about fame. This was about love. But because it was about love it made her feel unsure. She opened her mouth to answer him, but simply had no reply. For a short while she just fidgeted her fingers around her teacup, trying to find the right words to say. \"I don't mean to offend you Kojuro-san... But could you tell me a bit more about what would be expected of me if I accept?\" She looked at him with a blush on her cheeks but her eyes showed her uncertainty. All of her had wanted to shout out and say yes to him, but she simply needed to know the details first.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She accepted his kiss without any hesitation, satisfied with her reply to her. She didn't want him to change. Even if he had to play the part of the lord of this part of the worlds, she wanted him for who he was, not for the titles and wealth he might carry. He would always be just Kojuro to her and even if he was a simply farmers son she would have loved him for that part of him. "}, "post-81518": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1523446141000", "message": "He laughed. Well, it would make sense for her to know the details of what she would be agreeing to, even if privately hoped she would just have said a straight-out \u201cyes\u201d. Although it was more usual for a woman of the samurai class to be a consort, then was nothing unprecedented about taking a former geisha into the role. \u201cWell, simply enough, it is similar to being a wife, in many ways.\u201d He gave her a sideways look to see how that played out, before continuing more seriously in a lower tone, \u201cOnce I have been found a suitable wife, I will still have to marry. That's never been a secret to either of us. And when I do, she will outrank you, as a woman of high status, and most likely, it would be her children that would inherit whatever is mine. It will not be an easy thing I imagine.\u201d He gave a small sigh as he thought of the idea of Ryuzo choosing him a bride, and hoped that no one suitable would come along any time soon.\u201cBut until that time, you will be, in everything other than title, a wife. It means our relationship is officially recognised, you would no longer be a servant. Your duties would remain quite similar in many ways \u2013 you would run my household, entertain our guests, supervise the servants, and you would act as a lady in waiting to Sayuri-dono.\u201d He let her consider those details, letting his eyes glance away from her to his tea, not wanting her to feel scrutinised. He hadn't really considered the next step if she would say no... ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "He laughed. Well, it would make sense for her to know the details of what she would be agreeing to, even if privately hoped she would just have said a straight-out \u201cyes\u201d. Although it was more usual for a woman of the samurai class to be a consort, then was nothing unprecedented about taking a former geisha into the role. \u201cWell, simply enough, it is similar to being a wife, in many ways.\u201d He gave her a sideways look to see how that played out, before continuing more seriously in a lower tone, \u201cOnce I have been found a suitable wife, I will still have to marry. That's never been a secret to either of us. And when I do, she will outrank you, as a woman of high status, and most likely, it would be her children that would inherit whatever is mine. It will not be an easy thing I imagine.\u201d He gave a small sigh as he thought of the idea of Ryuzo choosing him a bride, and hoped that no one suitable would come along any time soon."}, "post-81519": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1523446500000", "message": "She couldn't help but breath out in relief. The doubt that had been in her eyes moments ago left like clouds before the sun and she smiled brightly at him. He did want her just for her and that was a big reassurance for her. She should have known that from the start that this was the intention but she just had to make sure. So when he looked away from her to her tea she placed her hand gently upon his knee so he would look at her. \"Ask me again, Kojuro-san.\" she said with a smile. This time she would be able to give him the answer he was hoping for.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She couldn't help but breath out in relief. The doubt that had been in her eyes moments ago left like clouds before the sun and she smiled brightly at him. He did want her just for her and that was a big reassurance for her. She should have known that from the start that this was the intention but she just had to make sure. "}, "post-81521": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1523449482000", "message": "When he felt her hand upon his knee he looked back over to her, catching the light that was in her eyes and her smile. Obviously what he had said wasn't displeasing to her \u2026 \u201cHmm? But I already asked you once, you shouldn't really make me repeat myself,\u201d he teased her. \u201cYou didn't forget the question already, did you?\u201d But he saw that he shouldn't delay too long as she looked as though she was about to burst. Instead he fixed a more serious expression on his face, and took the hand she had placed upon his knee in his own. He looked her in the eyes and said, \u201cHow would you like to become my consort, Nakatani-san?\u201d ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "When he felt her hand upon his knee he looked back over to her, catching the light that was in her eyes and her smile. Obviously what he had said wasn't displeasing to her \u2026 \u201cHmm? But I already asked you once, you shouldn't really make me repeat myself,\u201d he teased her. \u201cYou didn't forget the question already, did you?\u201d But he saw that he shouldn't delay too long as she looked as though she was about to burst. Instead he fixed a more serious expression on his face, and took the hand she had placed upon his knee in his own. He looked her in the eyes and said, \u201cHow would you like to become my consort, Nakatani-san?\u201d "}, "post-81522": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1523449905000", "message": "She gave him a bit of a scowl when he started to tease her, thought it wasn't meant to be mean. But as soon as he turned more serious again and asked her the questions she smiled again, a big blush creeping into the cheeks. \"Yes!\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She gave him a bit of a scowl when he started to tease her, thought it wasn't meant to be mean. But as soon as he turned more serious again and asked her the questions she smiled again, a big blush creeping into the cheeks. \"Yes!\" "}, "post-81593": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1523635758000", "message": "Kojuro put his arm around her and gently drew her closer, resting his lips against the silken hair on the top of her head. For a moment he just held her to him silently. \u201cNaka-chan, I\u2019m glad.\u201d He couldn\u2019t offer marriage as he might if they were both common common folk, nor a life of happiness when war and battle were on the horizon, but she had accepted what he could give, flawed as it was. As his consort she would be guarded and protected as one of the Hizashi family, no rumours of inappropriate relations could harm them, and nothing Ryuzo could do would be able to separate them. Perhaps he would be looked upon by some as weak and foolish for falling in love with a woman but the idea of it didn\u2019t bother him. Love and duty needn\u2019t conflict, at least not right now, and it was this fleeting moment he wanted to capture and hold. War would come again for him soon enough. \u201cI already asked Sayuri-dono for you to be released from Lord Genji\u2019s service,\u201d he told her, anticipating that at some point she would recall she was still bound into her employment. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Kojuro put his arm around her and gently drew her closer, resting his lips against the silken hair on the top of her head. For a moment he just held her to him silently. \u201cNaka-chan, I\u2019m glad.\u201d He couldn\u2019t offer marriage as he might if they were both common common folk, nor a life of happiness when war and battle were on the horizon, but she had accepted what he could give, flawed as it was. "}, "post-81598": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1523640976000", "message": "She would nestle herself against him. Enjoying his warmth and the his breath again the top of her head. This was her life and no matter what she was going to follow her heart. When he eventually mentioned her being discharged from service she blushed a beet red from embarassement. Not even a moment had she considered her already existing tasks and duties toward Genji and Sayuri-sama. She wouldn't move from her position against Kojuro. \"I-i'm glad Sayuri-sama agreed.\" She said, though the tone in her voice spoke way to well for how she felt. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She would nestle herself against him. Enjoying his warmth and the his breath again the top of her head. This was her life and no matter what she was going to follow her heart. "}, "post-81799": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1524052884000", "message": "He held her to him, enjoying their quiet moment together. When she spoke, he grinned. \u201cDid you completely forget about that?\u201d he asked, but he could see why she had, and in a strange way he was pleased that she was so excited to be with him that any thought of practicalities had passed her by completely. \u201cShe knew about us, you know. I think perhaps we we are not too good at keeping secrets.\u201d He wanted to tell Nakatani now about Sayuri's pregnancy, but he had agreed to say nothing to anyone, and wouldn't break that confidence, even to Naka. Sayuri would tell her herself soon enough, if she wished Nakatani to help her. There was only one last comfort that he couldn't give to Nakatani yet, and that was about the masked ronin. Yasuke had not given a report in several days and Kojuro wondered how the search was progressing. He didn't doubt that Yasuke could find the man, and once he did, he would know that Nakatani could truly safely relax into her new role. Whatever Ryuzo decided to throw in their path he figured he could handle. \u201cOnce everything is settled,\u201d he mused aloud, \u201cyou and I should do something special together.\u201d ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "He held her to him, enjoying their quiet moment together. When she spoke, he grinned. \u201cDid you completely forget about that?\u201d he asked, but he could see why she had, and in a strange way he was pleased that she was so excited to be with him that any thought of practicalities had passed her by completely. \u201cShe knew about us, you know. I think perhaps we we are not too good at keeping secrets.\u201d He wanted to tell Nakatani now about Sayuri's pregnancy, but he had agreed to say nothing to anyone, and wouldn't break that confidence, even to Naka. Sayuri would tell her herself soon enough, if she wished Nakatani to help her. "}, "post-82481": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1525286005000", "message": "She nodded, still red with embarrassment. Though she couldn't help but giggle when he mentioned that Sayuri-sama knew about them. \"It doesn't surprise me.\" she said with a small smile as she looked up to Kojuro. \"Any time she saw us together, there was a certain look on her face. She is a wise woman for her age. I believe she will be good for Lord Genji.\" she added to it. She somehow was glad that Sayuri was here to stay and even more glad that she would get to spend more time with the woman. She had never had a conversation with Sayuri, but something about the woman's presence had made Nakatani feel better. She had brought a warmth to the mansion that wasn't there before. There was another moment of quiet, one which she enjoyed. She could hear Kojuro's breathing as well as his heartbeat. She closed her eyes, concentrating on the soft rhythm of the beating. It brought a calmness over her that she hadn't felt since her kidnapping. It was only broken when Kojuro spoke up again. She looked up at him again an blushed, giving her cheeks a soft pink hue. \"I would like that.\" she said softly. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She nodded, still red with embarrassment. Though she couldn't help but giggle when he mentioned that Sayuri-sama knew about them. \"It doesn't surprise me.\" she said with a small smile as she looked up to Kojuro. \"Any time she saw us together, there was a certain look on her face. She is a wise woman for her age. I believe she will be good for Lord Genji.\" she added to it. She somehow was glad that Sayuri was here to stay and even more glad that she would get to spend more time with the woman. She had never had a conversation with Sayuri, but something about the woman's presence had made Nakatani feel better. She had brought a warmth to the mansion that wasn't there before. "}, "post-83412": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1528753519000", "message": "Summer rain pattered down on the veranda, and weighed down the leaves of the sakura tree outside. It began to form pools on the gravelled areas and the deer-scarer could be heard making its hollow bamboo clack at twice the speed. Kojuro left the sliding doors open to the garden regardless. The droplets that splashed into the room brought a pleasant coolness. The day before yesterday, Yasuke had made good on his promise and brought in the body of the man who had kidnapped Nakatani, bringing that fateful incident to a timely close. There was a release of tension around the mansion, although one couldn\u2019t say an air of celebration, as the head of the bandit was mounted on a spike at the gates as a warning to others. Kojuro had appeared briefly in the main courtyard to witness that the kidnapper had been brought to justice, mainly for the sake of Nakatani, but aside from a few formal words to Yasuke, he had not thanked him properly yet. Yasuke would be let in by the guards at the door, who were still keeping everyone out of Kojuro\u2019s quarters, except those few he chose to admit, Sayuri and Nakatani being the most recent. Again they treated him with some deference and respect as he was allowed to pass through. Kojuro was once again giving an audience from bed, though he was sitting up and looking relatively alert. When he saw Yasuke, he smiled. \u201cYasuke-san, come in. It seems we have a few things to discuss.\u201d ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Summer rain pattered down on the veranda, and weighed down the leaves of the sakura tree outside. It began to form pools on the gravelled areas and the deer-scarer could be heard making its hollow bamboo clack at twice the speed. Kojuro left the sliding doors open to the garden regardless. The droplets that splashed into the room brought a pleasant coolness. The day before yesterday, Yasuke had made good on his promise and brought in the body of the man who had kidnapped Nakatani, bringing that fateful incident to a timely close. There was a release of tension around the mansion, although one couldn\u2019t say an air of celebration, as the head of the bandit was mounted on a spike at the gates as a warning to others. Kojuro had appeared briefly in the main courtyard to witness that the kidnapper had been brought to justice, mainly for the sake of Nakatani, but aside from a few formal words to Yasuke, he had not thanked him properly yet. "}, "post-83445": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1528790345000", "message": "What was this all about being called into Kojuro's private chambers like this? The job was handled and Gihei's head was mounted on a pike in front of the gate. \"I hope he doesn't want to talk about facial resemblances...\" Yasuke muttered on his way up to Kojuro's room. Well the rain, the birds and the general handling of the head when mounting it meant it was unlikely anyone would get any ideas about the two looking like each other. Yasuke wasn't THAT ugly. Yasuke nodded slightly to the guards in front of Kojuro's door. He recognized both of them from the day when he brought Kojuro back having been stabbed - and they recognized him. It seemed that most samurai around the mansion were starting to acknowledge Yasuke's presence and were - at least to some point - more mindful of their behavior around him. Yasuke however would have preferred the opposite, because even though he understood why, he still felt like they were distancing themselves from him. As Yasuke entered he was met with the sight of Kojuro sitting on the bed and to Yasuke's relief he didn't look like someone who were about to ask difficult questions. \"Oh... I guess so, Hizashi-dono.\" Yasuke with a slightly confused frown and stepped forward. \"Been... doing well?\" he asked trying to make awkward casual conversation knowing full well that being stabbed like that meant you weren't doing particularly well for a while after. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "What was this all about being called into Kojuro's private chambers like this? The job was handled and Gihei's head was mounted on a pike in front of the gate. "}, "post-83532": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1528968204000", "message": "\u201cWell enough, considering the circumstances,\u201d Kojuro replied. \u201cThanks in no small part to your efforts. Sit down, Yasuke,\u201d he offered. Yasuke seemed incredibly uncomfortable, and he wasn't entirely sure why. Maybe he felt like being summoned by his superiors meant he was going to be admonished for something, Kojuro thought, reliving moments of being ordered to see his father and then being handed a dressing-down for some stupidity he had performed. Or perhaps it was the just the setting making him antsy. It wasn't usual to be invited into the private chambers, although Yasuke had been here before on a couple of occasions.  \u201cSorry for the informal setting,\u201d he said, \u201cbut I didn't want to wait to see you. I want to thank you properly, for everything you've done for me personally, for Nakatani, and for the Hizashi clan. Without your quick thinking I'd likely be dead on the side of the road. Who knows what might have happened to Nakatani if you had not spotted her abduction and alerted me? And then you found the culprit and took revenge on the clan's behalf. These are no small matters, and you've proved yourself to be a most reliable person.\u201d He shifted his position a little and leaned back a bit more on his rolled futon backrest as he gave a small pause. When he continued he was looking straight ahead rather than at Yasuke. \u201cAfter we returned from destroying the bandits in Shimokawa, I had Yamazaki look up the name you gave me in the clan records. He didn't find any mention of a 'Sou Yasuke' in there. He was about ready to commit seppuku there and then when I suggested your name might have been left out in error...\u201d He glanced back at Yasuke. Without asking anything, it seemed he wanted some clarification from Yasuke himself. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cWell enough, considering the circumstances,\u201d Kojuro replied. \u201cThanks in no small part to your efforts. Sit down, Yasuke,\u201d he offered. Yasuke seemed incredibly uncomfortable, and he wasn't entirely sure why. Maybe he felt like being summoned by his superiors meant he was going to be admonished for something, Kojuro thought, reliving moments of being ordered to see his father and then being handed a dressing-down for some stupidity he had performed. Or perhaps it was the just the setting making him antsy. It wasn't usual to be invited into the private chambers, although Yasuke had been here before on a couple of occasions.  \u201cSorry for the informal setting,\u201d he said, \u201cbut I didn't want to wait to see you. I want to thank you properly, for everything you've done for me personally, for Nakatani, and for the Hizashi clan. Without your quick thinking I'd likely be dead on the side of the road. Who knows what might have happened to Nakatani if you had not spotted her abduction and alerted me? And then you found the culprit and took revenge on the clan's behalf. These are no small matters, and you've proved yourself to be a most reliable person.\u201d "}, "post-83560": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1529091809000", "message": "\"Eh... Thanks I guess.\" Yasuke said and took a seat at the spot he was standing. Yasuke's eyes dotted somewhat from side to side as Kojuro rained down praise on him and his recent deeds. Either he was in for one hell of a scolding afterwards or Kojuro would be having a good laugh about it later and thinking about how he tricked him into believing he was some kind of hero. \"I...\" Yasuke said at first and paused. What was he thinking of course Kojuro was sincere. After all Yasuke had played his part perfectly and there was absolutely no way Kojuro would be suspicious. This was his time to shine and now that Gihei was out of the way for good there were absolutely no one - no one - that could ruin it. He should just relax fro once and enjoy the praise and even though wasn't quite obtained through the deeds Kojuro listed, he had indeed worked hard and if he tried just a little he could imagine the praise being for his hard work in general. \"Thank you Lord Kojuro!\" Yasuke said with his usual brutish smile and bowed slightly. It actually did feel good and almost well deserved to smile and thank Kojuro for his praise. \"I'm just trying to serve m... your best interest Lord Kojuro!\" Yasuke said swallowing the 'my' as quickly as a toad pulled in a fly. This went okay, but he had to cut those mistakes down to zero even it meant affiliating with the samurai doing poetry. Well almost. Maybe he'd cut out his tongue before that happened actually. At this point Yasuke felt pretty confident of the direction the conversation was going, and with a little luck he'd get some kind of reward he could convert to money easily. The Corner Dragon had probably been building both a basement and added another floor with gold rimmed stairs since last time he went there with the gold he was supposed to use to catch 'the assailant' with. Damn lucky they were. But hopefully Kojuro had forgotten all about that gold since he actually seemed to have completed the mission as best as possible. Yasuke's smile stiffened up as Kojuro started to talk about his name and how it wasn't included in the books. \"Ahh... Erhm... Damn that Yamazaki-san..!\" Yasuke said carefully and punched his palm with rather unconvincing force. \"Well, mistakes happen I guess, and I assumed he could just like... add it right? If there's room and it's not too much to ask?\" Yasuke went unsure how to properly handle this touchy subject. What if Kojuro decided he wanted to know more about Yasuke's ancestry and it was required for being enlisted there? A drop of sweat slowly made its way down Yasuke's forehead while his mind raced through everything that could potentially go wrong right now. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Eh... Thanks I guess.\" Yasuke said and took a seat at the spot he was standing. Yasuke's eyes dotted somewhat from side to side as Kojuro rained down praise on him and his recent deeds. Either he was in for one hell of a scolding afterwards or Kojuro would be having a good laugh about it later and thinking about how he tricked him into believing he was some kind of hero. "}, "post-83575": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1529147857000", "message": "Kojuro appeared not to have noticed Yasuke's little slip of the tongue. \u201cIt's appreciated,\u201d he replied. When it came to the matter of Yasuke not appearing in the ledgers, Kojuro listened to Yasuke's nervous response and nodded. Everyone was capable of making a mistake, even Yamazaki, despite his thoroughness. \u201cI thought that perhaps you might have signed up under a pseudonym,\u201d Kojuro said, \u201cseeing as how uncomfortable you were discussing your heritage. But if that's not the case \u2026 I imagine it just slipped through the net when Lord Genji was taking in so many ronin, or,\u201d he gave a smile with a hint of slyness as he eyeballed Yasuke, \u201cperhaps you never even signed up officially.\u201d Letting that hang in the air for a moment, he continued with a small laugh. \u201cHonestly, Yasuke, it doesn't matter to me where you came from or what your lineage is. Your deeds have spoken louder than your ancestry. I can have Yamazaki add 'Sou Yasuke' to our register, but its up to you if you want to use that name or start again with another.\u201d Knowing that his past was not something he was proud of, though he didn't know the reason, he left that decision up to Yasuke. \u201cLet me know and I will write it onto this.\u201d Kojuro reached to his side and picked up a folded paper sealed with the crest of Clan Hizashi. He held it out for Yasuke to come forward and receive. \u201cI'm awarding you a stipend of 50 koku, and the right to build a modest house in the noble district of Kiyonai. You will be listed as a direct Hizashi clan retainer.\u201d Fifty koku was not a huge amount for a samurai estate, but it was probably more than Yasuke had received in income in his life. One koku was the equivalent amount of rice to feed a family for a year. It made the gold he had squandered in the Corner Dragon somewhat of a pittance. \u201cYou have to supply your own equipment, horses, and servants out of that too,\u201d he added, eagerly awaiting Yasuke's reaction. \u201cThat circular space will be for your new clan crest. There is a book of designs that you can choose from \u2013 or make your own if you're feeling creative. That will also be listed in our ledgers alongside your name.\u201d ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Kojuro appeared not to have noticed Yasuke's little slip of the tongue. \u201cIt's appreciated,\u201d he replied. When it came to the matter of Yasuke not appearing in the ledgers, Kojuro listened to Yasuke's nervous response and nodded. Everyone was capable of making a mistake, even Yamazaki, despite his thoroughness. \u201cI thought that perhaps you might have signed up under a pseudonym,\u201d Kojuro said, \u201cseeing as how uncomfortable you were discussing your heritage. But if that's not the case \u2026 I imagine it just slipped through the net when Lord Genji was taking in so many ronin, or,\u201d he gave a smile with a hint of slyness as he eyeballed Yasuke, \u201cperhaps you never even signed up officially.\u201d "}, "post-83580": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1529161621000", "message": "\"Ehrm... Well yes I don't have a very long... heritage.\" Yasuke said paused before adding. \"I think what you want it to say is Shisou Yasuke.\" Yasuke said and nodded a bit to himself. \"Ohh...! Lord Hizashi I assure you I went all formal and...!\" he said reacting to Kojuro's taunt, though he quickly saw through it. \"Ahhh yes... You're pulling a fast one on me there!\" Yasuke said and pointed his finger at Kojuro with a wry smile. However this one was too close to home. \"You're... not?\" Yasuke asked baffled and scratched his chin. \"Wh-what? Fifty koku?!?\" Yasuke exclaimed louder than what was probably appropriate as he learned forward pushing his fists into the ground with eyes wide open. Compared to the gold Kojuro had given him to gamb... catching the assailant it was a huge, huge amount and made Yasuke's head spin. But these funds were not to gamble away, rather he was to build a house! And with servants, crest and horses and... all sorts of responsibility! Yasuke felt like all this was quite a lot to take in but well... a mansion. Wasn't that what he had dreamt of all those years? A life in luxury and people to cater to his every whim? He was starting to become \"someone noticable\" for sure. And people said crime didn't pay - surely the words of the bitter poor. Yasuke sat down again an composed himself straightening out his hakama as faint smile appeared on his face.\u00a0\"Well thank you a lot, lord Hizashi. I'm truly honored!\" Yasuke said trying hard not to exclaim something akin to 'hell yeah' or otherwise blemish himself so that Kojuro would think about pulling the funds and privileges back.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Ehrm... Well yes I don't have a very long... heritage.\" Yasuke said paused before adding. \"I think what you want it to say is Shisou Yasuke.\" Yasuke said and nodded a bit to himself. \"Ohh...! Lord Hizashi I assure you I went all formal and...!\" he said reacting to Kojuro's taunt, though he quickly saw through it. \"Ahhh yes... You're pulling a fast one on me there!\" Yasuke said and pointed his finger at Kojuro with a wry smile. However this one was too close to home. "}, "post-83729": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1530048046000", "message": "\u201cShisou Yasuke? That\u2019s your real name? You\u2019ll have to show Yamazaki how to spell it so that he can write it on your grant properly.\u201d Kojuro was pleased at Yasuke\u2019s reaction. He had hoped that he would be pleased, and he also looked more than a little shocked. As Kojuro watched, his face seemed to change colour a few times as he took in all the ramifications. When he composed himself and looked back at Kojuro he would find a smile there answering his own. \u201cThey say duty is its own reward, but an actual reward never hurt either, right?\u201d he joked in response to Yasuke\u2019s uncharacteristically formal thanks. \u201cYasuke, I\u2019m also assigning you to a new position which is more in keeping with your status. I want you in my personal guard. There will be war soon, and I need men I can trust by my side. I promised a few people that I wouldn\u2019t be taking too many unnecessary risks,\u201d he said, looking slightly disappointed, although he knew that this was the sensible thing to do. Even though he had made the decision to be more responsible, Yasuke\u2019s position would likely involve saving Kojuro from himself as much as getting between him and enemies\u2019 pointy bits. Generally speaking it was a reasonably safe position on the battlefield unless things were already going badly or underhanded tactics were being employed, as the command centre tended to be near the back with a large number of men between the enemy army and the leaders. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cShisou Yasuke? That\u2019s your real name? You\u2019ll have to show Yamazaki how to spell it so that he can write it on your grant properly.\u201d Kojuro was pleased at Yasuke\u2019s reaction. He had hoped that he would be pleased, and he also looked more than a little shocked. As Kojuro watched, his face seemed to change colour a few times as he took in all the ramifications. When he composed himself and looked back at Kojuro he would find a smile there answering his own. \u201cThey say duty is its own reward, but an actual reward never hurt either, right?\u201d he joked in response to Yasuke\u2019s uncharacteristically formal thanks. "}, "post-83774": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1530204007000", "message": "\"Yeah.\" Yasuke said and nodded with a smile. Well it was almost his true name, but Kojuro didn't need to know more than that - and neither did Yamazaki. \"Oh... well I can't say I was expecting anything, but a reward is always welcome.\" Yasuke said. Faking humility was always the most difficult lie he thought, but Kojuro was luckily rarely one to question his words. \"Well umm... Of course I'd accept that. Thank you!\" Yasuke and nodded. 'Personal guard', this was another step up but also one that could lock him down a bit more. It would be harder to go gambling unnoticed along with similar sorts of interests. But closer to power had to be better, Yasuke told himself. \"I will make sure your enemies take a risk coming close to you.\" Yasuke said with a wry smile. Kojuro had shown that though he was a noble snoot, he was less snooty than most and had proved a stream of power and income to Yasuke that he had never imagined possible. Although Yasuke was not yet ready to use the word 'friend', he was however ready to protect this source wealth and influence fiercely and could tell Kojuro with a clean conscience. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Yeah.\" Yasuke said and nodded with a smile. Well it was almost his true name, but Kojuro didn't need to know more than that - and neither did Yamazaki. \"Oh... well I can't say I was expecting anything, but a reward is always welcome.\" Yasuke said. Faking humility was always the most difficult lie he thought, but Kojuro was luckily rarely one to question his words. "}, "post-83812": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1530453929000", "message": "Kojuro laughed, \u201cA big risk, with you in between. I\u2019m sure you\u2019ll make them regret being so heedless,\u201d he said, glad to see Yasuke\u2019s enthusiasm for his new appointment. It seemed that he was truly pleased to be acknowledged and valued, exactly as he had hoped. Surely everyone wanted some kind of recognition and thanks from others, regardless of whether duty demanded it or not? \u201cYou\u2019ll probably want to begin all your preparations soon, make sure your armour is ready and your spear sharpened. With any luck if you start getting your house built now, you can move in when we return from war.\u201d The sound of the rain outside and the frantic clacking of the deer-scarer filled the silence between them for a few moments, as Kojuro lay back and closed his eyes for a moment, putting his hand to his stomach. His wound was bothering him a little, and he was reluctant to ask Anzen for every little thing knowing she had enough on her plate with Uncle Genji. But it reminded him of some unfinished business. There was something he hadn\u2019t talked to Yasuke about yet, and though he\u2019d thought about it, he didn\u2019t think he\u2019d get any answers except from Yasuke himself. \u201cWho\u2019s Hanbei?\u201d he asked, opening his eyes once again and looking at Yasuke. \u201cI remember, after I got stabbed, I heard you call my name, and then you called out \u2018Hanbei\u2019. What was that about?\u201d ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Kojuro laughed, \u201cA big risk, with you in between. I\u2019m sure you\u2019ll make them regret being so heedless,\u201d he said, glad to see Yasuke\u2019s enthusiasm for his new appointment. It seemed that he was truly pleased to be acknowledged and valued, exactly as he had hoped. Surely everyone wanted some kind of recognition and thanks from others, regardless of whether duty demanded it or not? \u201cYou\u2019ll probably want to begin all your preparations soon, make sure your armour is ready and your spear sharpened. With any luck if you start getting your house built now, you can move in when we return from war.\u201d "}, "post-83818": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1530516603000", "message": "Yasuke considered Kojuro's words about moving in and the war preparations. \"Well I guess I should see to it then.\" he simply said and smiled. Yasuke was looking forward to bringing his spear to battle again, there was something beautiful about punching holes in an enemy who couldn't reach you - it was almost as good as being up close and personal with your fists. And the house was definitely a bonus he was looking forwards to, but who was going to build it and design it? He certainly didn't know much about building a house much less designing it. Maybe a dungeon? No, that would be silly. \"Lord Kojuro, who do I talk to if I want a bit of...\" Yasuke stopped reluctant to say 'help'. \"... a bit of sparring about designing it?\" he asked.It seemed like Kojuro's wound was still bothering him and Yasuke thought perhaps this was as much as Kojuro could take. Just when Yasuke was about to form his lips asking if it would be best he left, Kojuro asked him about Hanbei. 'Fucking Hanbei..!' Yasuke thought, as little pearls of sweat immediately started running down his forehead when Kojuro helped him recall his blunder. \"I... haha, that's a weird question, Lord Kojuro!\" Yasuke said and faked a smile. \"But since you seem interested, I can tell you that it's a localized swear word from my home town meaning something akin to being quite displeased over the unfortunate turn of events.\" Yasuke said and chuckled. \"I am trying hard to lay off my crude northern dialect, but right there it just flew out!\" Yasuke said and chuckled while making gesticulations and mentally patting himself on the shoulder. 'Nice improvised answer! Good Yasuke, go gamble and and drink tonight, you've earned it!'. Hopefully this would sate Kojuro's curiosity. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Yasuke considered Kojuro's words about moving in and the war preparations. "}, "post-83853": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1530806256000", "message": "Yasuke seemed reluctant to ask for help but he was a stubborn kind of man and Kojuro was not surprised, although his way of putting it was amusing and he kept a straight face with difficulty. \u201cMorishita Nobuyoshi was in charge of putting the extensions on the Hizashi Mansion before Sayuri-dono arrived. He can probably point you in the right direction.\u201d He could easily have gone to Yamazaki as well, but Kojuro had the distinct impression that there was some kind of friction between those two. \u201cHmm,\u201d he replied, on hearing Yasuke\u2019s explanation, looking none too convinced. Frowning he said, \u201cI\u2019ve been up north a number of times, but I\u2019ve never heard that.\u201d Although he didn\u2019t think the story rang true, he couldn\u2019t really get a handle on why. He\u2019d had a fantasy that Yasuke had a secret ninja accomplice working in the shadows, and was mildly disappointed. At any rate, he didn\u2019t feel much like questioning Yasuke further, filing away the Hanbei question in the back of his mind for another time. There wasn\u2019t anything else he needed to talk to Yasuke about urgently. \u201cI\u2019ll let you get back to your duties, it seems I\u2019ve given you a lot more to do,\u201d he said, with an apologetic smile. \u201cDon\u2019t forget that,\u201d he added, indicating the deeds that he\u2019d given to Yasuke. \u201cGet Yamazaki\u2019s scribes to fill it in before it falls into the wrong hands and someone else gets a promotion\u2026\u201d he suggested, letting Yasuke take his leave. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "<br>Yasuke seemed reluctant to ask for help but he was a stubborn kind of man and Kojuro was not surprised, although his way of putting it was amusing and he kept a straight face with difficulty. \u201cMorishita Nobuyoshi was in charge of putting the extensions on the Hizashi Mansion before Sayuri-dono arrived. He can probably point you in the right direction.\u201d He could easily have gone to Yamazaki as well, but Kojuro had the distinct impression that there was some kind of friction between those two. <br/><br/>\u201cHmm,\u201d he replied, on hearing Yasuke\u2019s explanation, looking none too convinced. Frowning he said, \u201cI\u2019ve been up north a number of times, but I\u2019ve never heard that.\u201d Although he didn\u2019t think the story rang true, he couldn\u2019t really get a handle on why. He\u2019d had a fantasy that Yasuke had a secret ninja accomplice working in the shadows, and was mildly disappointed. At any rate, he didn\u2019t feel much like questioning Yasuke further, filing away the Hanbei question in the back of his mind for another time. There wasn\u2019t anything else he needed to talk to Yasuke about urgently. \u201cI\u2019ll let you get back to your duties, it seems I\u2019ve given you a lot more to do,\u201d he said, with an apologetic smile. \u201cDon\u2019t forget that,\u201d he added, indicating the deeds that he\u2019d given to Yasuke. \u201cGet Yamazaki\u2019s scribes to fill it in before it falls into the wrong hands and someone else gets a promotion\u2026\u201d he suggested, letting Yasuke take his leave. <br/></br>"}, "post-84545": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1534866968000", "message": "Yasuke walked with brisk steps towards the main building where Kojuro had his private quarters and caught the glance at of one of the guards at the main gate. A scowl met his as the guard stepped in front of the door.\"No one is getting in unless they have a specific purpose.\" the guard said casting a glance on the sack Yasuke had draped over his back. \"And what is in that bag?\" he asked none too pleased. Yasuke leaned in slightly towards the gate guard so they could just feel each other's breath and narrowed his eyes and frowned. \"Do I look like a someone who has the time to show you Lord Hizashi's clean laundry? And do I look like I enjoy doing a servant's job?\" Yasuke asked back, the guard looking slightly disturbed by Yasuke's aggressive answers. \"I was the one who freakin' saved him and now I come to see him so... Let. Me. In!\" Yasuke said as he repeatedly pointed his finger at the guard's chest. Looking less than pleased the guard exhaled annoyed and stepped to the side to let Yasuke enter the main building. 'Luckily I didn't have to explain the fake beard in the back' Yasuke thought as he made his way to Kojuro's room and stopped outside the door as was customary. \"Oi, please tell Hizashi-dono that Sou Yasuke wants to deliver his clean undergarments.\" Yasuke announced with a straight face tapping his foot impatiently. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Yasuke walked with brisk steps towards the main building where Kojuro had his private quarters and caught the glance at of one of the guards at the main gate. A scowl met his as the guard stepped in front of the door."}, "post-84547": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1534871536000", "message": "Kojuro heard Yasuke's voice outside the door and was glad for the interruption. Spending most of the time alone in his private quarters wasn't exactly fun even though it was an important part of the war strategy. At least he had been back swinging a bokken about and taking some exercise. At the moment though he was reading \u2013 a small volume on little known sword techniques that he had bought months ago when he visited the bookshop in town with Nakatani. He put the book down and looked towards the door. \u201cCome in Yasuke-san,\u201d he called, not waiting for the guards to relay the information. The guards stepped aside to admit Yasuke and once he was inside Kojuro looked suspiciously at the sack with a smile on his face. \u201cI don't believe for a moment that you really brought laundry with you, so what's in there?\u201d he asked, obviously hoping the was going to be some entertaining reason for the strange bundle, and that shenanigans of some kind was afoot. Frankly he was bored, and whatever happened he was going to trap Yasuke here for conversation or entertainment for as long as possible. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Kojuro heard Yasuke's voice outside the door and was glad for the interruption. Spending most of the time alone in his private quarters wasn't exactly fun even though it was an important part of the war strategy. At least he had been back swinging a bokken about and taking some exercise. At the moment though he was reading \u2013 a small volume on little known sword techniques that he had bought months ago when he visited the bookshop in town with Nakatani. He put the book down and looked towards the door. \u201cCome in Yasuke-san,\u201d he called, not waiting for the guards to relay the information. The guards stepped aside to admit Yasuke and once he was inside Kojuro looked suspiciously at the sack with a smile on his face. \u201cI don't believe for a moment that you really brought laundry with you, so what's in there?\u201d he asked, obviously hoping the was going to be some entertaining reason for the strange bundle, and that shenanigans of some kind was afoot. Frankly he was bored, and whatever happened he was going to trap Yasuke here for conversation or entertainment for as long as possible. "}, "post-84548": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1534873959000", "message": "The guard at the door looked curiously at Yasuke but almost immediately he heard Kojuro's voice demanding them to let him in. Yasuke quickly trotted inside.  \"Good afternoon Hizashi-dono!\" Yasuke said with a wry smile and put the sack on the ground making sure the guards had properly closed the doors before he dove into it. \"This... Hizashi-dono...\" he said and mangled his arm around inside the sack. \"... is my magic sack! It will make people disappear for a while!\" he explained as he pulled out a fake full beard, shaking it a few times to get the dust off it. It had been a while since he had used it, but it had yet to fail to disguise him when he had been in a tight spot. \"I was... performing as an actor a short while before joining clan Hizashi.\" Yasuke explained and tossed unceremoniously it to Kojuro. Well, it wasn't completely wrong and he had stolen it from an actor too. Yasuke then pulled up a rice hat that the farmers usually wore and launched it at Kojuro much like a frisbee seeing if Kojuro still had his reflexes in proper order. \"Take this one too, we're going to have you look like someone not even your dad would recognize!\" Yasuke said with a grin. He had passed the building many times and reckoned that even though Kojuro was being treated by the best - and a quack sister who claimed to be able to speed up the process healing him through thin air - he would not be at his best very fast, if he didn't go see something else than those four walls once in a while. Yasuke would glance shortly at a few pages of calligraphy work that lay around - surely it was a sign of utter boredom and a scream for help when you started doing calligraphy of your own accord. \"I know you're not supposed to, but we're going anyway!\" Yasuke almost commanded, as he pulled up an olive green kimono that few would consider from wealthy stock. In his eagerness Yasuke had still not told Kojuro where they were going or what they would be doing though. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The guard at the door looked curiously at Yasuke but almost immediately he heard Kojuro's voice demanding them to let him in. Yasuke quickly trotted inside.  "}, "post-84550": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1534883807000", "message": "\u201cHm? I thought you didn't believe in magic,\u201d he said raising an eyebrow, although he was aware Yasuke was only joking. \u201cSounds like Wuppo's bag.\u201d He stood up and walked over to the sack to peer inside, only to be hit in the face by a dusty fake beard that Yasuke pulled out. He took a step back and sneezed,  letting Yasuke shake the rest of the dust out. \u201cYou, an actor?\u201d he replied, scrutinising Yasuke to see if he was being serious, and fighting the urge to laugh. \u201cDo you do acrobatics and comedy turns too?\u201d he asked, before catching the beard that was thrown to him. He ran his fingertips over the hair. What was it made from? Straw? Real hair? It was quite convincing for a fake. His attention was taken off the beard quite quickly though as a hat was thrown in his direction and he snatched it out of the air. \u201cOh? These are for me, are they?\u201d he said, returning Yasuke's grin conspiritorially. Somewhere in his quarters there was a mirror. He went to a chest and started opening drawers until he found the rare item in a brocade bag and propped it up. He held up the beard in front of his face and tried out a variety of expressions. \u201cAh Yasuke. You'll probably have to give me a few pointers on how to act...since you're a former professional,\u201d he said, pulling a stern looking face that seemed to go well with the beard. \u201cWhat about this? Is this good?\u201d He turned to show Yasuke his new expression. \u201cFine,\u201d he said decisively. \u201cWherever we're going, lets go. This is just what I need... you're some sort of genius.\u201d An excuse to get out of here was even better than keeping Yasuke here to entertain him, and while he didn't know what Yasuke intended for them to do he didn't really care. Kojuro set about gettingg the elements of the disguise together, taking to this new activity with great enthusiasm. He took off his obi and outer kosode, putting on the roughspun olive kimono that Yasuke had brought him. Since his hair didn't match the colour of the beard at all, he pulled it back into a short ponytail, and donned the fake beard by whatever method Yasuke advised. Next, the hat. Then he looked at his sword rack. He definitely was not going to go out unarmed. Choosing a katana, which was not his normal weapon of choice and was a little plainer he decided it would be better to rewrap the hilt with a spare bit of cloth just to disguise its obvious value a bit. \u201cIs this right?\u201d he asked Yasuke, facing him and giving him a full look at his new disguise. The beard was rather itchy and he scratched at it. \u201cSo \u2026 I suppose I need a false name? How about Kakusaki Ichishiro?\u201d ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cHm? I thought you didn't believe in magic,\u201d he said raising an eyebrow, although he was aware Yasuke was only joking. \u201cSounds like Wuppo's bag.\u201d He stood up and walked over to the sack to peer inside, only to be hit in the face by a dusty fake beard that Yasuke pulled out. He took a step back and sneezed,  letting Yasuke shake the rest of the dust out. \u201cYou, an actor?\u201d he replied, scrutinising Yasuke to see if he was being serious, and fighting the urge to laugh. \u201cDo you do acrobatics and comedy turns too?\u201d he asked, before catching the beard that was thrown to him. He ran his fingertips over the hair. What was it made from? Straw? Real hair? It was quite convincing for a fake. His attention was taken off the beard quite quickly though as a hat was thrown in his direction and he snatched it out of the air. \u201cOh? These are for me, are they?\u201d he said, returning Yasuke's grin conspiritorially. Somewhere in his quarters there was a mirror. He went to a chest and started opening drawers until he found the rare item in a brocade bag and propped it up. He held up the beard in front of his face and tried out a variety of expressions. \u201cAh Yasuke. You'll probably have to give me a few pointers on how to act...since you're a former professional,\u201d he said, pulling a stern looking face that seemed to go well with the beard. \u201cWhat about this? Is this good?\u201d He turned to show Yasuke his new expression. "}, "post-84555": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1534958294000", "message": "\"Pwah..! This is real magic I tell you!\" Yasuke said and chuckled. \"Put it on and you'll see right away!\" he said fondling inside the bag. Yasuke frowned a bit over Kojuro mocking him about his actor alibi. Kojuro apparently couldn't help being snooty from time to time anyway but he fact that Yasuke never had been an actor meant he took at less personal - though you could say Yasuke had become a permanent actor when he entered the ranks of the samurai. \"I wager you've seen most of my acrobatic moves in the dojo, Hizashi-dono.\" he said dismissively and continued to look for more clothes. \"And I'm not a jester either. As I said it was only for a short notice because they needed a stand in.\" Yasuke said remembering all too well that he had had to knock the lead actor unconscious as he didn't want to part with his costume. However the local authorities were looking for Yasuke, so he had little time to discuss such trivial matters as 'who needed them the most'.Yasuke briefly raised his head seeing Kojuro inspect the beard. \"Horse tail.\" he explained briefly, but what the hell did he know. It sounded plausible.Pointers on acting? Hadn't he just told him it was only for a short while? Well he had his samurai acting which had worked out quite well until now. \"Well my friend, acting is the art of trying really, really hard not to be caught...\" he said and quickly added. \"By the audience of course. Because then they won't attend your next show and you'll lose the money you need to survive for. So the stakes are high and that's why one MUST act convincingly!\" Yasuke explained with a wide grin feigning confidence. \"You look like a real badass ronin, Hizashi-dono!\" he complimented Kojuro as he himself studied his own facial features in the mirror - a thing he had rarely had the chance to do before. \"Perhaps... you're under my tutelage as a new samurai of clan Hizashi? How about that?\" he suggested strongly liking that idea. He also quite liked the notion of being called a genius.Yasuke took a glance at the 'new Kojuro' and nodded acknowledging.\u00a0\"You could almost fool me with that!\" Yasuke said. \"Ichishiro Kakusaki you say?\" said and bit his tongue. It wasn't very creative nor believable, but where they were going it didn't matter too much. Few people were very credible there and a lot went under cover names. \"That will do!\" Yasuke concluded and finally started feeling increasingly eager to get going. \"So I think if we go through the window to the courtyard garden we can get past without any of the nosy guards asking us too many questions!\" Yasuke reckoned and was about to hop out the window as he looked back at Kojuro. \"Of course that's a security breach I need to close when I get back and this will be a good test to see if I'm right!\" Yasuke said with a devilish smile.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Pwah..! This is real magic I tell you!\" Yasuke said and chuckled. \"Put it on and you'll see right away!\" he said fondling inside the bag. Yasuke frowned a bit over Kojuro mocking him about his actor alibi. Kojuro apparently couldn't help being snooty from time to time anyway but he fact that Yasuke never had been an actor meant he took at less personal - though you could say Yasuke had become a permanent actor when he entered the ranks of the samurai. "}, "post-84569": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1535034869000", "message": "\u201cSure,\u201d said Kojuro, enjoying the idea of this new persona that Yasuke was helping him devise. \u201cSo, I'm a ronin whose been living in cave, practicing self-control by standing under a waterfall and reciting sutras. And that's why I grew such a huge beard, it's cold out there.\u201d He stroked the beard. When Yasuke questioned the name of Kakusaki Ichishiro, Kojuro frowned. \u201cHm... you're right. I think there's a nobleman somewhere in Jeoncho who's named Kakusaki Ichishiro. I must have got that name from him. Alright! Kawasaki Ichiro! That will do. Should I try to do an accent?\u201d There was something appealing about the idea of going out in disguise, as long as he wasn't caught as Yasuke rightly advised against. \u201cWait, it's not necessary,\u201d he said, shaking his head as Yasuke made plans to escape unseen. \u201cAside from anything else the entrances around the courtyard lead into other private spaces. There will be guards everywhere. No mansion will be that easy to break into or out of, or we'd all just live in farmers' huts. Besides, the guards here will need to know I'm not around, think of what would happen if they discover I'm not here? That would probably mean instant death for them for losing me, and cause all kinds of problems for everyone else. I'll inform the guards I'm leaving with you, and they will make sure to tell anyone who comes to the door that I'm asleep. That will get us through the private quarters. If anyone further along stops us, tell them you were taking Kawasaki Ichiro on a tour or something. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cSure,\u201d said Kojuro, enjoying the idea of this new persona that Yasuke was helping him devise. \u201cSo, I'm a ronin whose been living in cave, practicing self-control by standing under a waterfall and reciting sutras. And that's why I grew such a huge beard, it's cold out there.\u201d He stroked the beard. When Yasuke questioned the name of Kakusaki Ichishiro, Kojuro frowned. \u201cHm... you're right. I think there's a nobleman somewhere in Jeoncho who's named Kakusaki Ichishiro. I must have got that name from him. Alright! Kawasaki Ichiro! That will do. Should I try to do an accent?\u201d There was something appealing about the idea of going out in disguise, as long as he wasn't caught as Yasuke rightly advised against. "}, "post-84579": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1535054091000", "message": "Yasuke nodded as he folded his arms. \"Yeah ronin... living in a cave and stan...\" he said and stopped abruptly. \"Why? Why would he stand under a waterfall? He needs help to act ill?\" Yasuke asked and chuckled. But whatever, he had heard weirder stories in his time so it might just work. Yasuke smiled hearing the new name. \"Kawasaki... san. Right?\" he said with a glint in his eyes. \"Accent? Well I think you at least have to ditch that noble pronounciation Hizashi-dono... well Kawasaki-san.\" he said amused. Kojuro was really getting into it. Yasuke was almost half way out of the window when Kojuro explained it would hardly be needed. \"Oh I see...\" Yasuke said sounding almost disappointed. It's not like he had ENJOYED planning the escape and looking forward to seeing it happen. Nope, he would never admit to that. \"Okay then... It's probably for the best then...\" Yasuke said reluctantly - though of course Kojuro's logic was sound in this case. Things could go bad quite fast and it wasn't worth that kind of trouble just for a drink. \"Lead on then, Kawasaki-san!\" Yasuke said, trying to divert his thoughts from the plan that was never going to be completed. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Yasuke nodded as he folded his arms. "}, "post-84787": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1535898657000", "message": "\u201cHe\u2019s standing under a waterfall to get closer to enlightenment. Don\u2019t you remember that story of that monk ronin? He stood under a waterfall until he passed out and got washed away by the current. Some boys found him and dragged him out of the water, taking care of him until he woke up. But then as soon as his eyes opened he rushed back to stand under the waterfall again. And then as the story goes on \u2026 this happens a few more times \u2026 and then eventually he becomes the famous priest who founded the Xianhai temple. It would certainly be cold enough to need a beard like this,\u201d Kojuro mused, stroking the fake beard. Probably he couldn\u2019t grow one himself, he had never been particularly hairy, but it felt somewhat dignified. \u201cNoble pronunciation? What do you mean,\u201d he asked. \u201cShould I roll my Rs like a yakuza?\u201d \u201cIt is for the best,\u201d Kojuro assured him, then went to have a quick word with the guards to his room, and to the guards on the entrance to the family wing. \u201cI\u2019ll be back by morning. Right, Yasuke?\u201d The guards didn\u2019t have any reason to object to their orders. They all knew that by this point Kojuro was only feigning illness for the sake of the war strategy. \u201cRight you\u2019d better take us from here, and lets hope Yamazaki-san isn\u2019t at the gates on the way back in because I don\u2019t have any papers in the name of Kawasaki Ichiro,\u201d he laughed. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cHe\u2019s standing under a waterfall to get closer to enlightenment. Don\u2019t you remember that story of that monk ronin? He stood under a waterfall until he passed out and got washed away by the current. Some boys found him and dragged him out of the water, taking care of him until he woke up. But then as soon as his eyes opened he rushed back to stand under the waterfall again. And then as the story goes on \u2026 this happens a few more times \u2026 and then eventually he becomes the famous priest who founded the Xianhai temple. It would certainly be cold enough to need a beard like this,\u201d Kojuro mused, stroking the fake beard. Probably he couldn\u2019t grow one himself, he had never been particularly hairy, but it felt somewhat dignified. \u201cNoble pronunciation? What do you mean,\u201d he asked. \u201cShould I roll my Rs like a yakuza?\u201d "}, "post-84789": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1535909685000", "message": "\"The only thing he gets closer to is a damn cold...\" yasuke remarked muted otherwise nodding at Kojuro with a fake smile. Yasuke considered Kojuro's accent and eventually nodded. \"Yeah... I think that would actually work well. Just don't overdo it, we don't want to become confused with one... lest of course you fancy your drinks along with a bit of fisticuffs?\" Yasuke said enthusiastically, almost hoping him to say yes, though he quickly reversed into a neutral and much less excited facial expression. \"I'm just kidding, the Yakuza and Triads from Jeoncho seem to have had a few clashes in the city, so it's wise not to get involved.\" Yasuke said and shrugged. It was somewhat of a bummer not being able to carry out his rather elaborate plan for escaping, but he was sure he was able to lead Kojuro into a bit of fun trouble as the evening progressed. \"Yes, yes... I'll lead.\" Yasuke said and bared his teeth in a smile. [Exit:\u00a0The Streets of Kiyonai\u00a0]", "link_list": ["http://thefantasysandbox.boards.net/thread/2213/streets-kiyonai?page=8"], "image_list": [], "html": "\"The only thing he gets closer to is a damn cold...\" yasuke remarked muted otherwise nodding at Kojuro with a fake smile. Yasuke considered Kojuro's accent and eventually nodded. \"Yeah... I think that would actually work well. Just don't overdo it, we don't want to become confused with one... lest of course you fancy your drinks along with a bit of fisticuffs?\" Yasuke said enthusiastically, almost hoping him to say yes, though he quickly reversed into a neutral and much less excited facial expression. \"I'm just kidding, the Yakuza and Triads from Jeoncho seem to have had a few clashes in the city, so it's wise not to get involved.\" Yasuke said and shrugged. "}}